
Jurassic Park
Michael Crichton


Dragons are hated for their cold bodies, white, scaly color, and dirty fur.
Bad angles, eye counting, bad smells, loud noises, bad seats, bad


poison; therefore their creator did not spare his talents to make more of them."


Linnaeus, 1797


"You can't concentrate on the new way of life."


Erwin Chargoff, 1972
introduction
"InGen said."


In the late twentieth century, gold flowed into science at an astonishing rate:
headlong and furious to be quick to punish the charge. As the company advanced
Quickly - with few external contexts - to scale and the results are drastic.
Complete understanding.

Biotechnology promises the greatest revolution in human history. At the end of this decade, the
Atomic power and computers will have an impact on our daily lives. In the
In the words of an observer, biotechnology will change every aspect of human life: we
Medicine, our food, our health, our entertainment, our very bodies. Nothing ever happens.
Again. It's going to change the face of the world."

But the biotechnology revolution differs from previous science in three important respects
Changes.

First, the bulk is huge. The U.S. entered the nuclear age with one research project.
institution, at Los Alamos. It entered the computer age through the efforts of a dozen people.
companies. But biotechnology research now has more than 2,000
laboratories in the United States alone. Five hundred companies spend $5 billion a year on this
technology.

Second, there isn’t a lot of thoughtful or critical research. Efforts to Make Pearl Truffle
Great views into the river square trees made logging easy and cell scent injections so you
Your favorite perfume will always feel like a joke, but it’s not. Indeed, the fact that
Biotechnology can be applied in traditionally fashion-shifting industries.
such as cosmetics and entertainment;
Powerful new technology.

Third, the work is unsupervised. No one notices. No federal law prohibits it. There is nothing.
Relevant government policies, in the U.S. or anywhere in the world. And because things
From biotechnology to pharmaceuticals to crops to artificial ice, smart policy is hard.

But what is disturbing is that there is hardly any observer among the scientists. it is
Fortunately, any scientist involved in genetic research is also involved in the business
Biotechnology. There are no spectators. Everyone has a responsibility.


The sale of molecular biology is the strangest ethical event in history.
Science, and it happened with great speed. four hundred years from Galilee;
Science continues to evolve as a free and open inquiry into religious matters. scientists
They have always pushed beyond national boundaries, subjugating themselves to temporary concerns
Politics and Wars. Scientists have always kept the secret in research and have
They were fascinated by the idea of ​​creating their discoveries and seeing themselves as working
It’s in everyone’s best interest. And for generations, scientific discoveries had
Special Interest .

When in 1953, two researchers in England, James Watson and Francis Crook,
They explained the structure of DNA and their work was a triumph of the human spirit.
centuries of research to understand the universe scientifically. Waited with confidence.
that their sacrifice goes to the benefit of humanity.

However, it didn’t happen. Thirty years later, nearly all of Watson’s and Crick’s
My neighbors were in a different company altogether. Molecular genetics research
It was once a multi-billion dollar business and its origins can be traced back to
1953. But from April 1976 onwards.

It was a meeting with the now famous Robert Swanson, Robert Swanson, who was an investor.
Approach Herber Boyer, a biochemist at the University of California, Berkeley. The two men agreed to .
He found a commercial company exploiting Boyer’s gene splicing technology. Their new company,
Genentech quickly became one of the largest and most successful genetic engineering startups.


It seemed like everyone wanted to be rich. New companies announced
Almost weekly, scientists have also been targeted for exploitation of genetic research. By 1986, there were 362 scholars.
Of those, 64 are members of the National Academy and sit on advisory boards of biotech companies. The amount of
The proportion of those in public or consulting firms was several times higher.

It’s important to emphasize that this mindset shift is extremely important. In the past, pure
Scholars have taken a business perspective. They were looking for money as an intellectual property.
Not necessary, suitable only for shopkeepers. and do research for industry, even in well-known areas.
Bell or IBM labs, were among the few to have a lab. Thus, the character
Pure scientists were especially critical of the work of applied scientists and industry
In general. Their long-standing offense protected university scientists from contamination.
Industrial relations and when there is a debate on technological issues, scientists who are not interested in
were there to discuss conflicts of interest.

But that’s not true anymore. There are too few molecular biologists and too little research
Entities with which there is no business relationship. The old days are gone. Genetic research continues;
He’s angrier than ever. But it’s done confidentially, quickly, and for free.


In this business climate, it is perhaps unavoidable for an ambitious company like Universal
Palo Alto Genetic Technologies Inc. will make an appearance. It is also not surprising that genetic
The crisis it raised should not have gone unreported. After all, Inghan’s research had been carried out in secrecy; that
The main event occurred in the Central American region, with less than twenty
People were there to witness it. Of these, only a few survived.

Even in the end, when Gene Technologies International sought to maintain Chapter 11 in
The San Francisco Superior Court ruling on October 5, 1989, did not attract the attention of the media. it
appeared so ordinary: InGen is the third small U.S. biotech company to fail
year, and the seventh since 1986.
It was Japanese financial institutions, such as Hamaguri and Dansaka, companies that
Traditionally avoid advertising. To avoid unnecessary disclosures, Daniel Ross, Cowan, Swan, and
Ross, Ingen’s lawyer, also represented Japanese investors. and the rarest
The appeal of Costa Rica’s vice ambassador was heard behind closed doors. Thus it is not a surprise .
that within a month, the problems of Ingen were resolved calmly and cooperatively.

These treaty parties, along with the broader scientific advisory body, signed
A non-transparent contract, and no one talks about what happened, but many
"InGen incident" The people in the "InGen incident" don't sign, and they could have talked about this wonderful
Events leading up to the last two days in August 1989 on a mountain in the far southwest.
Costa Rica.


Jurassic Park
initial:
The raptor's message


Tropical rain fell on the leaves and battered the roof of the hospital building.
It screams through the metal, splattering on the wet floor. Roberta Carter breathed, and
Looked out the window. From the hospital it was impossible to see the beach or the ocean beyond.
It is close to the lowest material. This was not what he expected when he came to the fishing village
Bahja Anasco, on the west coast of Costa Rica, spent two months as a visiting doctor.
Bobby Carter was looking forward to the sunshine and relaxation after two straitened years in his home
Emergency Medical at Michael Reese in Chicago.

He had been in Bahja Anasco for three weeks. And it rained every day.

Everything else was fine. Bahja Anasko enjoyed his seclusion and his friendship.
people. Costa Rica had the twenty best medical systems in the world, and even the best .
On the far west coast the hospital was well organized and well equipped. His nurse, Manuel
Arag6n, was intelligent and well-mannered. Bob was able to use a treatment rate equal to .
Which he did in Chicago.

But the rain! The never-ending rain!


Manuel scratched his head in the exam room. "Listen," he said.

"Believe me, | listen," said Bob.

"No. Listen."

And then he heard it, another sound mixed with the rain, a deep, strained sound and
Out until it became clear: helicopter music. They can’t be, he thought.
Jumping back in time like this.

But the noise grew louder, and then the helicopter exploded in the fog of the ocean.
He shouted overhead, spun around and came back. He saw a helicopter hovering over the water.
near the fishing boats, then go sideways to the wooden hut, and back
beach.

He was looking for a place to land.

It was a giant Sikorsky bird with a blue logo on the side and the words "InGen
construction." That was the name of the construction company building a new resort
Coastal mountains. The resort was said to be very rugged and very difficult; many
Local people were working on the construction, which was going on for two
years. Bob could think of big US resorts with pools and
Tennis court where guests can play games and drink their discreet discreetly
The real life of the nation.

Bobby wondered what was going so fast on this island that a helicopter would fly in here.
weather. Through the windshield, he saw the pilot breathing a sigh of relief as the helicopter landed.
The wet sand of the sea. The men in uniform jumped out and opened the main door. it
He heard screams in Spanish and Manuel punched him.

They were calling a doctor.


Two black sailors carried a crumpled body toward him while a white man barked orders. white
The man was wearing a yellow shirt. Red hair appeared around the edges of his Mets baseball cap. "Is there a
Doctor here?" she called, running to her feet.

"I'm Dr. Carter," he said. Heavy drops of rain fell and battered his head and shoulders. that
The red man scowled at him. He was wearing cut-off jeans and a T-shirt. He had
had a stethoscope for it, and the man shifted from the salt air.

"Ed Regis. We have a sick boy here, doctor."

"Then you better take it to San Jose," she said. San Jose was dominant for just twenty minutes.
With the wind.

"We would, but we can't cross the mountains this time. You'll have to treat him here."

Bobby stood by the injured man's side as they carried him to the hospital. When he was a child, no.
who are older than eighteen years. He lifted the soaked shirt and saw a large cut on his
And another on foot.

"What happened?"

"Bloody accident," Ed yelled. "He fell. A rear wheel ran over him."

The child was pale, shaking, confused.

Manuel stood near the bright green doors of the hospital, clasping his hands. The men brought the night .
and placed it on the table in the center of the room. Manuel started a path through the jungle, and
Bobby shined the light on the child and examined his wounds. Immediately, he could see
That it wasn’t right. The child will surely die.

A huge jolt ran from his shoulders and down his body. at the door of the wound;
The flesh was spoiled. In the middle, the shoulder was broken and the bones were bare. The second
The incision cut through the thickened femoral muscles and was deep enough to expose the femoral pulse.
lower artery. His first thought was that his leg was broken.

"Tell me about that injury again," he said.

"|I didn't see him," Eddie said. "They said Coke killed him."

"Definitely looks like it got hit," Bobby Carter said, looking at the wound. like
Most emergency room physicians could remember in great detail the patients they saw
year before year. He saw two people. One was a two-year-old child who collapsed.
by a Rottweiler dog. Others were drunk circus apprentices who hooked up with
Bengal tiger. Both injuries were related. There was a lightness to Bengal’s attack.


"Molyde?" Ed says. "No, no. It was a back kiss, trust me." Eddie sighed and said. he
was edgy, acts like he did something wrong. Bobby wondered why. If they were workin
Local workers, who do not have experience in the construction of the construction site, are bound to have accidents all the time.

“You want collagen?” Manuel said.

"Yeah," she said. "After you deny it."

He leaned in and traced the wound with his fingers. When the earth is considered.
There was dirt in Jagan's wound. But there is no dirt, just bare secrets.
The smell was observed by the needle, a kind of scent, the smell of death and survival. He was
I've never smelled this before.

"How long ago was this?"

"One hour."

Again, he noticed how strained Ed Regis was. He was one of those nervous and anxious people. and
He wasn’t like a construction manager. He’s like a boss. Obviously, he was on his
depth.

Bobby Carter returned from injury. Somehow he didn't think he was
mechanical injury. He just wasn’t right. The wound site is not contaminated and there is no gastrointestinal tract.
injury component. Any kind of mechanical injury - car crash, factory accident - almost always
He was involved in some perishable things. But there was no one here. Instead, the man was leather.
shredded -ripped-through his shoulder and again through his throat.

It was like a real Molly. On the other hand, most of the bodies were unmarked, which was
which is free from animal attack. He looked at the head again, his hands -

hands.

He felt cold when he looked at the children's drawing. Both had short cuts
forearms and bruised wrists and wrists. He’s worked in Chicago long enough to know
What that means.

"Okay," she said. "Wait outside."

"why?" Eddie said he was worried. He didn't like that.

"Do you want me to help him or not?" he said, pushing her out the door and locking it.
Her face. He didn't know what was going on, but he didn't like it. Manuel hesitated. "|Continued
To wash?”

"Yeah," she said. He reached for his Little Olympus. It took a lot of
Changing the brightness of some injury images for better visibility. Looks like a true wreck, he thought.
The child then screamed and put aside his camera and smiled at him. His lips twitched.
The tongue is heavy.

"Raptor," he said. "Lo Si Raptor..."

At these words, Manuel obviously returned in fear.

"What does that mean?" Bobby said.

Manuel shook his head. "I don't know Dr. 'Lo Sa Rapto'-no Espax "

"No?" It sounded like Spanish. "Then get on with it."

"Yes Doctor." He wrinkled his nose. "Smells bad." And he cut himself.

Bobby looked at the metallic bump on the wound again. He touched her and touched her.
between his fingers. It was like a tooth. .. .

The doors of the injured boy moved. "Raptor," he whispered.

Manuel said in a scared voice, "She screwed up."

"What's wrong?"

"Raptor."

"What's a raptor?" "it

That means hippie."

Bobby frowned. Costa Ricans weren’t superstitious, but he heard rumors
hupia spoken in the West long ago. They were said to be ghosts from the past who
Small children are arrested. According to superstition, Hippia lived on the mountains of
Costa Rica, but settled on the islands off the coast.

Manuel was backing up, talking and cutting himself. "It's not a good thing that smells," she said.
said. "That's hippie."

Bobby was about to tell him to get back to work when the injured young man opened his eyes and sat up
Onto the table. Manuel cried out in fear. The wounded boy groaned and shook his head.


He looks left and right with wide, blood-curdling eyes. He went
Suddenly, her body started shaking and Bobby grabbed her, but she kept shaking.
From the table to the floor. He vomited again. There was blood everywhere. Ed opened his mouth.
door, “What’s going on?” When she saw Joel, she turned to him.
hand to his mouth. Bobby was reaching for the barrel to get inside the boy's open mouth, but even as
He did it, he knew it was hopeless, and he relaxed and relaxed.

She leaned for door to door, but Manuel roughly grabbed her shoulders and pulled her away.
back. "No," she said. "Hoopia will pass."

"Manuel, for God's sake-"

"No." She looked at him fiercely. "No, you don't understand this."

Bobby looked down at the body and realized it was useless; There was no
It can be resurrected. Manuel called for the men, who went back into the house and
The body is removed. Eddie got out and wiped his mouth with the back of his hand as he whispered, "I trust you
Do your best.
He took off and went upstairs.

"That's better," Manuel said.

Bobby was thinking about the boy's hands. They were covered with cuts, in
Defensive wound patterns. He was sure he wasn't dead.
Construction accidents; He was under attack, holding his tentacles at his attacker.
"Where on this island did they come from?" she asked.

"In the ocean. Maybe a hundred and twenty miles off the coast," "Far from the resort."
she said.

Manuel looked at the helicopter. "I hope they never come back."

Well, he figured, he even had pictures. But when he returned to the table, he
That his camera was there.


It finally rained that night. Alone in his bedroom outside the hospital, Bobby put his finger down.
by means of his Spanish dictionary. The boy said "raptor," and although
Manuel’s protests, he suspected, were Spanish words. Of course she found it in
dictionary. It meant "dam" or "bad."

It gave him relief. The meaning of the word was doubtfully close to the meaning of hippie.
Of course, he didn’t open the door. And no demon had cut off those branches. Which was
The boy was trying to tell him?

From next door he heard shouting. A Southern woman was arrested in the first quarter of 2018.
work, and Elena Morales, the local midwife, was looking after her. Bobby was admitted to the hospital.
And he signaled for Elena to step outside for a moment.

"Elena…."

"SJ Doctor?"

"Do you know what a raptor is?"

Elena had gray hair and was in her thirties, a strong woman with a no-nonsense air. In the
Night, under the stars, he looked up and said, "Rapper?"

"Yeah, you know that word?"

" Sj." Elena nodded her head. "That means ... someone who comes in at night and picks up a child."

"The kidnapper?"

"Yes."

"A hippie?"

His whole demeanor changed. "Don't, doctor."

"why not?"

"Don't talk about Hoopia now," Elena said firmly, turning her head towards the murmur.
A working woman. "It's not wise to say that right now."

"But does the retort send and chop its victims?"

"Cut and cut?" Elena said, confused. "No, doctor. Nothing like that. A retort is a man who
A new baby." He seemed irritated by the conversation, impatient to end it. Elena began
Towards the hospital. "I'll call you when I'm ready, Doctor. | Think for another hour, maybe two."


Bobby looked up at the stars and listened to the waves crashing against the shore. In the
In the darkness he saw the shadows of fishing boats on the shore. The entire episode was
quiet, so normal, he felt comfortable talking about vampires and babies.

Bobby returned to his room and remembered that Manuel had insisted that it was not
Spanish words. Out of curiosity, he looked up the Little English Dictionary and came up with,
See the quote there too:


raptor \ n [Dr. of L. Report Ponder, Fr. Raptus]: bird prey.


First iteration


In the early plots of the binary graph, there is little evidence of
The basic mathematical structure will be visible.”


Hi Malcolm
almost
paradise


Mike Bowman happily whistles as he drives a Land Rover across Cabo Blanc
Biological Reserve, southern part of Costa Rica. It was a beautiful morning in July, and
The road ahead was beautiful: kissing a stone, looking out over the forest and blue
The Pacific. According to guidebooks, Cabo Blanco was unspoilt wilderness, paradise-like.
Seeing him now, it made Boman feel like the holidays were back on track.

Bowman, a thirty-six-year-old from Dallas, came to Costa Rica with
His wife and daughter are on vacation for two weeks. The trip was really his wife's idea; Several weeks.
Ellen fills her ears about Costa Rica’s amazing national parks and how much better they are.
be for Tina watching them. Then when they arrived, he mentioned that Ellen had an appointment to see
Painting at the Shore in San Jose. It was the first Mike Bohmer who did a good thing and
Surgery The most affordable surgery is available in Costa Rica, as well as buying all the luxury private hospitals


In fact, they had a big fight and Mike felt like she lied to him and so did he. and set his foot down.
down for this PlayStation business. Anyway, it was funny, Ellen was thirty and
She was a beautiful woman. Hell, she was a princess during her senior year in Russia and
That didn’t happen ten years ago. But Ellen was getting worried and worried. And it looks like
As in recent years, he was concerned about losing his appearance.

That, and everything.

The Land Rover flew into a ditch and kicked up mud. Sitting next to him, Elena said, "Mike
Are you sure this is the right direction? We didn't see anyone else for hours."

"There was another car fifteen minutes ago," he recalled. "Remember the blue car?"

"Going the other way.. ."


"Honey, you just wanted a beach vacation," she said, "and that's what you're going to get."

Elena shook her head doubtfully. "| I hope you're right."

"Yes, Daddy | I hope you're clean" Christina said from the backseat. He was eight years old.

"Trust me, I'm fine." He drove in silence for a while. "Is that okay? Look at the way you look. It's
beautiful."

"It's okay," Tony said.

Ellen left the closet and looked at herself in the mirror and pressed under her eyes. it
He let out a sigh and left the commode.

The track started to go down and Mike Baumer turned his attention to the car. A little surprise.
A flash of black flashed across the street and Tina yelled, "Look at him! Look out!" Then he left, and went
issue.

"What was it?" Ellen asked. "A brain?"

"It can be a joke," Bowman said.

"Can you | guess?" Tina says, taking out her pencil, she kept a list of pets.
In fact, he viewed his trip as a project for the school.

"|I don't know," Mike said with a twinkle.

Tina looked at the pictures in the guidebook. "|Don't think it was a prank," he said.
"| I thought it was another scream." They had seen many howling monkeys on their journey.

"Hey," she said brightly. "According to this book, 'Cloud Blanc's Seas are
Various types of wild animals visit there, including foxes and white-eyed, three-legged lazy pigs.
and Covatamid.' "Do you think we'll ever see a three-legged master, Daddy?"

"|We will."

"really?"

"Just look in the mirror."

"It's too funny."

The path led down through the forest to the sea.


Mike Bowman felt like a star when they reached the edge of the beach: White Two Kilometers
sand, rested. He parked the Land Rover in the shade of the hemlock palm trees.
beach, and out of the box lunches. Ellen changed into her bathing suit and said, "Really | don't
You know how I'm going to lose that weight."

"You're beautiful, darling." Actually, he thought she was too young, but he had learned not to mention it.
that.

Tina was already running along the shore.

“Don’t forget you need your sunscreen,” Ellen called out.

"Later," Tina called over her shoulder. "I'm going to see if there's any laziness.

Ellen Bowman looked out at the beach, at the trees. "You think it's okay?"

"Damn there's nobody here for miles," Mike said.

"What about the snakes?"

"Oh for God's sake," Mike Bowman said. "There are no snakes on the beach."

"Well, maybe . . ."

"Honey," she said firmly. "Snakes are cold-blooded. They're heirlooms. They can't contain them
Body temperature. Ninety degrees on the sand. Once the snake is out, it is cooked. believe
I. There are no snakes on the beach." She watched her daughter run to the beach
A dark dot on white sand. "Let him go. Let him have his good time."

He put his hand on his wife’s waist.


Tina ran until she was exhausted, then threw herself on the sand in excitement.
He walked around the water’s edge. The sea was warm and there was no water at all. He sat down.
For a moment, holding his breath, he then looked back at his parents and the car to see
where he had lived.

His mother looked at his hand and called out to him to come back. Tina happily returned her hand, pretending not to.
understand. Tina didn’t want to put on sunscreen. And he didn't want to go back and listen to her
Mom talks about losing weight. He wanted to stay here and maybe look at a lazy one.

Tina had seen Lazy two days before at the San Jose Animal. Looks like Muppet
condition, and it seemed like no big deal. In any case, he couldn’t move fast enough; He could have easily run away with it.


Now, with her mother calling for her, Tina decided to get out into the sun and come back.
water, to the shade of palm trees. On this side of the beach, mango trees were clinging
tangle of mangrove roots prevented any attempt to enter the mainland. Tina sat down in the sand.
and taste dried mangrove leaves. He noticed several bird tracks in the sand. It was Costa Rica.
He was famous for his birds. Records said there were three times as many birds in Costa Rica as there were in the 1990s.
All over the United States and Canada.

In reality, some of the birds were too small and too small to be
seen. Other roads were wide and cut through the sand. Tina was watching the tracks.
Just then he heard a crack, and then another crack came rustling through the trees.

Did the lazy ones pull out a crust? Tina didn’t think so, but she didn’t believe it. Kurt had
It could be some sea urchin. He waited in silence, without smiling, to hear the noise again, finally.
He saw the source of the noises a few yards away and a dead body emerged from the mangrove roots.
And he tried.

Tina held her breath. New animals on her list! The pig got up on its hind legs and read.
She scratched her head, looking at him. Standing like that, it’s about a foot tall, dark green and
Red bands on the back. Its tiny front legs ended in tiny claw fingers that shook in the air.
The butterfly raised his head and looked at him.

Tina thought it was beautiful. It’s like a giant salmon. He raised his hand and shook it.
Behind the fingers.

The smile wasn’t scary. He walked towards her on hind legs. It was hard.
He was bigger than a chicken, and he waggled his head like a chicken as he walked. Tina thought it would.
Have a good dream.

He noticed that the reptile had left behind three tracks that looked like bird tracks. infant
He approached Tiny. She hugged her body, not wanting to scare the small animal. He was
He was surprised that he could get that close, but then he was reminded that this was a national park. All that
The animals in the park know they are safe. These three were probably adopted. It can be
She was expecting him to give her some food. Unfortunately, he wasn’t having it. Slowly, Tina pulled away.
His hand, open palm, to show he had no food.

The butterfly sighed, raised its head, and dashed away.

"I'm sorry," Tiny said. "I don't have anything."

And then, without warning, the squirrel pounced on his outstretched arm. Tina could imagine.
His tiny paws gripped the skin of his hands, and he felt the strange weight of the animal's body.
Scroll down.

The clown then raised his hand to his face.


"| just wish | could see her," Ellen Bowman said, squinting in the sunlight. "That's it. Just look at her."
her."

"I'm sure it's fine," Mike said as he picked at the hotel's packed lunch. There was
Unappetizing fried chicken and meat-filled buns. Not that Ellen has a cat.
it.

"You think he won't leave the beach?" Ellen said.

"No, ma'am. | Don't."

"| I'm doing myself here," Elena said.

"| I thought that's what you wanted," Mike Bomer said.

"| He did."

"Well, then what's the problem?"

"| I just want | to be able to see him, that's all," Ellen said.

Then, from across the beach, howled by the wind, they heard their daughter’s voice. He was
To cry.


Puntarenas
"I think he's comfortable now," Dr. Cruz said, lowering the plate of the oxygen tank


He curled around Tina and fell asleep. Mike Bowman was sitting on the edge of the bed next to his daughter. Mike thought.
Perhaps Dr. Cruz could have; He spoke English fluently, a result of his training in medicine


Centers in London and Baltimore. Dr. Cruz shares scientific knowledge and Clinical Santa Marja
The new hospital in Puntarenas was far from simple and efficient.

But, still, Mike Bohmer is worried. There is no such thing as an equal.
The daughter was very sick and they were far from home.

When Mike first got to Tina, she was screaming with excitement. His entire right arm was
It was bloody, covered in tiny bites, each the size of a fingerprint. And there was .
On his hand, like tears.

He drove to the beach. Immediately, her hand began to turn red and swollen.
Mike will never forget the car that drove into civilization too soon, a four-wheel-drive Land Rover.
She slips and slides along the dirt road into the mountains, while her daughter screams in terror and
Pain, and his hand was swollen and red. Before they reached the boundary of the park.
The tumor had spread to her neck, and then Tina started having trouble breathing. . . .

"It's going to be okay now?" Ellen said, looking into the oxygen tent.

"| Believe it," said Dr. Cruz. "| Gave him another medicine, and his breathing improved.
It’s very simple. And you can see that the swelling in his arm goes down a lot."

"On those bites..." Mike Bowman said.

"We don't have any identification yet," the doctor said. "| I've never seen anything like that before myself."
But you notice that they are disappearing. It’s already hard to get rid of them. happy |
They took pictures to check. and | He washed his hand to pick up some
Sticky milk – one for analysis here, a second sent to the lab in San Jose, and a third we
It will stay cold if needed. Do you have the picture he drew of you?"

"Yeah," Mike Bowman said. The diagram Tina drew when she answered the doctor.
in questions relating to parents.

"This is the animal that bit him?" Dr. Cruz said as he looked at the wire.

"Yeah," Mike Bowman said. "He said the turtle was green, about the size of a chicken or a crocodile."

"| I don't know of such a thing," said the doctor. "He drew it standing on its hind legs. . . ."

"It's surreal," Mike Baumer said. "She said he was walking on his hind legs."

Dr. Cruz sighed. He looked at the picture for a moment. "| I am not an expert. I asked the doctor.
Gittier is joining us here. He is a senior research fellow at Reserve Biol¢Juco de Carrara, the
towards the sea. "Maybe he can identify the animal for us."

"Isn't someone in Cabo Blanc?" Bowman asked. "It's where you forgot."

"Unfortunately, he's not," Dr. Cruz said. “Cabo Blanco has no permanent employees and no researchers.
He worked there for a while. You may have been one of the first to walk along this beach in the 1990s.
Many months. but | I'm sure you'll find Dr. Gutierrez very knowledgeable."

Dr. Gutierrez identified himself as a bony man in a khaki shorts and shirt. The surprise was
that he was an American. He appeared to the Bowmans, saying in a murmur, "Mr.
And Mrs. Bowman, how are you doing, nice to meet you.” Then she explained that she was a bit of a dragon.
biologist who has worked in Costa Rica for the last five years. Marty Gutierrez
She studied Tina carefully, raising her hand slowly, eyeing each bite.
penlight, then measure them using a small ruler. After some time Gutierrez appeared,
He nods as if he’s realized something. He then checked the polars and
She asked more questions about the mouse, and Cruz told her that it was being tested in a lab.

Finally he turned to Mike Bowman and his wife, who were thinking. "I think Tina will be fine.
| I just want to clarify a few things," she said, making notes in a tight group. "Your
The daughter said she was bitten by a green lizard about a foot long that walked
Standing on the beach from the mangrove water?"

"That's it, yes."

"And the squirrel made some sort of speech?"

"Tina said he was yelling or screaming."

"Like a mouse, you say?"

"Yes."

"Well then," said Dr. Gutierrez, "| Get used to this shit." He explained that one in six thousand
There are dozens of species of turtles in the world, and dozens of species are not in fair travel. Among these species,
There are only four in Latin America. And judging by the colors, the dragon could be one.
In four. "| I'm pretty sure this bat is Basiliscus amoratus, a species of dry bats found here


Costa Rica and Honduras as well. When standing on their hind legs, they can sometimes be as tall as
foot."

"Are they poisonous?"

"No, Miss Bowman, not at all." Gutierrez explained that the swelling in the right arm is
Allergic reactions. "According to the literature, fourteen percent of the population is physically
Dragons, he said, and it looks like your daughter is one of them.

"She was crying, she said it hurt too much."

“That was probably it,” Gutierrez said. "There's serotonin in the adrenal glands, which causes aggression
pain." He turned to Crusoe. "Did his blood pressure go down with histamine drugs?"

"Yeah," Cruz said. "rush."

"Serotonin," Gutierrez said. "No question."

Still, Ellen Bowman wasn’t relaxed. "But why does the dragon bite him in the first place?"

“Trash is very vulnerable to corrosion,” Gutierrez said. “Pet keepers get bitten in animal areas.
period. and sometimes | He heard that a lizard had caught a baby in its cage in Amaloy .
Fifty miles from where you lived. So the damage happens. I’m not sure why your daughter got so many
Bite. What was he doing then?"

"It's nothing. He said he was sitting because he didn't want to scare her."

"I'm sitting pretty," Gutierrez said, looking straight. She shook her head. "Okay. | I don't think we can say
What really happened. Wild animals are unpredictable."

"And what about that tooth on his arm?" Ellen said. "| Keep thinking about the loss. . . ."

"No, no," Dr. Gutierrez said. "Heaven cannot take the press, Ms. Bowman. Your daughter will
She developed an allergic reaction to the bite of a watermelon. There's nothing worse than that."

Mike Boman then showed Gutierrez the picture Tina had drawn. Gutierrez shook his head. "I
He accepts this as a bass drum," he said. "A few rough times, for sure.
The neck is too long, and he fashioned the hind legs with only three toes instead of the bottom.
Too long and too high. But otherwise, this is a shifter that might work
That's what we're talking about."

“But Tina specifically said the language was long,” Ellen Boman confirmed. "And that's
It had three toes."

"Tina is a great observer," Mike Bowman said.

"I'm sure he is," Gutierrez said, smiling. "But | remember your daughter was sent
common basilisk amoratus, and was classified as a highly specialized hertological species. A great time reading with
The treatment is twelve hours. It should be fine in the morning.”


In the present-day laboratory, located on the ground floor of the Clinic Santa Maria, came word that Dr.
Gutierrez identifies the animal that bit the American child as a harmless bass
lizard. Analysis of serum was stopped immediately, although an initial distribution of
It has shown many high molecular weight proteins with unknown biological activities. but
The night technician was busy and placed samples of soup on the tray.
fridge.

The next morning the daily clerk inspected the store for the names of the missing persons.
patients. He found that BOWMAN, CHRISTINA L. was supposed to have left that morning, the .
The secretary threw away the saliva samples. At the end of the day, he noticed that a sample had red
tag meaning that it was intended to be transmitted to the lab at the University of San Jose,. She got the diagnosis
out of the dirt pile and set it on its way.


"Go ahead. Say thanks to Dr. Cruz," Ellen Bowman said, pulling Tina forward.

"Thank you, Dr. Cruz," Tina said. "I'm fine now." He raised his hand and shook the place.
The doctor’s team. Then he said, "You have another drake."

For a moment Dr. Cruz was confused; Then she smiled. "That's it, Tina. When | all work
Night in hospital, morning | Change my shirt.”

"But not your tie?" "No.

It’s my shirt.”

Ellen Bowman said, "Mike told you he was monitoring."

"It really is." Dr. Cruz smiled and vigorously shook the girl's hips. "Enjoy the rest
Happy Costa Rica vacation, Tina."


"I will."

The Bowman family had started to leave when Dr. Cruz said: "Obe, Tina, do you remember
The kid that bit you?”

"H-hi."

"Remember her?"

"H-hi."

"Does he have any legs?"

"Yes."

"How many toes did he have?"

"Three," he said.

"How do you know?"

"Definitely | look," he said. "Anyway, all the birds on the beach made marks in the sand with
He held up his hand, three middle fingers splayed. "And cute
He made those marks in the sand, too."

"Shark made a sign like a bird?"

"Uh-huh," Tiny said. "He also walked like a bird. He was shaking his head like this up and down."
He took a few steps back and shook his head.

After the Bomans left, Dr. Cruz decided to deliver the news to Gutierrez,
Biology Station.

"| Must be willing to accept the girl's story," said Gutierrez. "|We did some investigation
myself. | I don’t believe it was the basil that bit him. He has no credibility."

"So what could it be?"

"No," said Gutierrez, "let's not speak too soon. Anyway, have you ever heard of a
Other bullies at the hospital?"

"No, why?"

"Tell me, buddy, if you do."


beach;


Marty Gutierrez sat on the beach and watched the afternoon sun in the sky until it was .
It shone on the water of the bay, its rays reaching under the palm trees;
He sat among the mangroves on the shores of Cabo Blanca beach. He could decide how he was
She was sitting where the American woman had been two days before.

Although it was true, as he told the Bowmans, that spiders are more destructive.
Gutierrez had never heard of a basilisk biting anyone. And he had never heard of that
Anyone hospitalized for a broken kidney. Then also, the inheritance radius from the right hand
Older than Uncle Basil, when he arrived at Carrara Gate and saw Fit
There’s a research library, but it’s not found on a website about the Basilica heritage. Then he looked
International Bioscience Server, a computer database in the United States, but has not received any licenses
Overdosing on drugs, or going to the hospital for a hamstring injury.

She then called the nurse, Amalo, who found a nine-day-old customer.
Asleep in her crib, her leg was bitten by an animal, her only grandmother.
actually to claim it was a joke. Then her leg swelled up and so did the baby.
He was going to die. The teenager described the bug as green with blue stripes. He was se
Child several times before the woman scared him away.

"Amazing," Gutierrez said.

"No, just like everyone else," the paramedic said, adding that he heard additional cracks.
incidents: A child in V squez, a village on the coast, was bitten in his sleep. and
Another is in Puerta Sotrero. All of this has happened in the past two months. Everyone was
He was among sleeping babies and toddlers.

This distinctive new species led Gutierrez to suspect an ancient presence
Living species unknown. This was especially possible in Costa Rica. Only seventy-five.
Millions of miles narrower, the country was smaller than the state of Maine. However, in the
Given the limited space, Costa Rica had a variety of habitats for fauna: estuaries
Atlantic and Pacific, four separate mountain chains, peaks twelve thousand feet;
and active fires; rainforests, cloud forests, temperate, humid, and dry zones


deserts. This diverse ecosystem has preserved an amazing diversity of plant and animal life.
Costa Rica had three times more bird species than all of North America. It's more
A large species of orchid. There are five major species of insects.

New species have been discovered all the time at an increasing rate in recent years.
For a bad reason. Costa Rica was deforesting as wild species lost their habitats;
They moved to other places, and sometimes the behavior changed.

So new varieties were possible. But with joy of a new kind.
New diseases of concern. Ticks carry bacterial diseases, mostly
It can be transmitted from person to person. The worst was central cerebral edema, or CSE, which
This caused a form of sleeping sickness in humans and horses. Gutierrez felt it was important to
To find this new bug, if possible, test its diseases.

Sitting on the beach, he watched the sunset and sighed. Maybe Tina was too big.
See a new animal and it may not be there. Now, Gutierrez hadn’t done that. Early that morning he was
He picked up the windmill, turned the paint, and went ashore with great determination.
But time was running out. Soon he had to drive up the mountain from the valley;
He didn't want to set off in the dark.

Gutierrez got to his feet and started for the beach. In the distance, it’s a black thing.
yelled the monkey that walked in the doorway of the Red Princess. Gutierrez changed
He goes out to the water. If there was one scream, there were probably others
Above the trees, dry roosters were peeing on the people.

But this screaming monkey seemed to be alone, moving slowly and stopping.
Sitting on his thighs often. There was something at the door of the funeral home. As Gutierrez came
He approached her, eating cheese. The tail and hind legs are separated from the joints.
Even in the distance, Gutteridge could see brown bands on the green.

Gutierrez dropped to the ground and aimed the pistol. Screaming Monkey, familiar.
Those who live in a relatively protected environment are dealing with curiosity. He didn’t even run when the first train
he shouted as he continued. When the second train rushed into the tunnel, the screams
Angry and surprised, he dropped the rest of his food and fled into the woods.

Gutierrez got back to his feet and walked forward. He didn’t care about the friend; that
The dose of tranquiliser was too small to give her anything but a few minutes of dizziness. It was almost over.
She thinks about what to do with her newfound income. Gutierrez himself wrote the first draft, but
The others had to be returned to the United States for a final positive identification
course. To whom should he send it? The most recognized scholar was Edward H. Simpson.
New York, is a professor of veterinary medicine at Columbia University, New York. Handsome old man and
swept-back white hair, Simpson was the world’s leading authority on fur taxonomy. maybe,
Marty decided to send his shirt off to Dr. Samson.


New York


Dr. Richard Stone, Director, Columbia University Medical Laboratory
The Center, he noticed, suggested that the name suggested a much larger area than it actually was. In the
In the early twentieth century, the laboratory occupied the entire fourth floor of the biomedical
In the research building, technical teams worked to eradicate yellow fever outbreaks.
Malaria and tuberculosis. But successful medical and research laboratories in Nairobi and local
Polo-Con has put TDL in a position that is not as important as it once was. Now part of the meaning
At its size, it only employed two technicians full time, and they were interested in
Survey of diseases of New Yorkers who had traveled abroad. The normal laboratory work was
He wasn’t ready for what he found that morning.

"Oh, very interesting," the tropical disease laboratory technician said as he continued to .
Dunne’s sign. "A partially eroded and unknown portion of the Costa Rican Peninsula." It was beautiful.
His nose. "This is all for you, Dr. Stone."

Richard Stone walked past the lab and examined the newcomer. "Is this something Eddie
Simpson's lab?"

"Yeah," she said. "But | I don't know why you sent us a butterfly."


"His secretary called," Stone said. Simpson is traveling in summer Borneo, and
Because the patient has a question with this shift, he asked our lab to go
He took it. Let's see what we've got."

The white plastic cylinder was about half a gallon in size and had a metal lid.
latches and upper screw. It was titled "International Biological Example" and
The stickers and notices are in four languages ​​and the warnings are intended to
cylinder from being opened by suspicious international officials.

The warnings seem to have worked, and when Richard Stone waved the big light, he could see the light.
There were still gasses. Stone put on the air compressors and put on gloves and
Face mask. After all, the lab recently identified contaminated samples from Venezuela
Slow horse, Japanese hepatitis B, Kayasanur thu virus, Langat virus, Mayaro. then
Create heaven.

There was the sound of escaping gas and billowing white smoke. The cylinder has become cold.
cold. Inside, she found a sandwich box that was flattened with a green substance inside. The stone is scattered.
Shaking the bag’s contents. A piece of frozen steak is baked.
table with a loud noise.

"Huh," the tech said. "Looks like he got eaten."

"Yes it does," Stone said. "What do they want from us?"

The technician reviewed sealed records. "Son is tearing up the neighborhood kids.
Questions about species identification and concerns about invasive diseases
bite." He pulled out a picture of a child from the street, signed TINA at the top. "A child is .
Fetal picture."

Stone looked at the picture. "Obviously, we can't test species," Stone said. "But we can
Diagnose diseases easily if we can draw a blood from this medicine. What do they call
This animal?"

"'Basilicus amoratus with three genetic variants,'" she said, reading.

"Okay," Stone said. "Let's get started. While you're waiting for him to show up, do an X-ray and take
Polaroid recorded. Once blood is obtained, we start running antibodies until we have some
Friends. Let me know if there's a problem."


Before lunchtime, the lab got the answer: the dialysis had caused no significant reaction.
Bacterial or bacterial infection. They also did venom profiles and found only one.
Best Friend: Blood was slightly sensitive to the poison of King Kabra. But the same
Cross-reactivity was common between species and Dr. Stone did not think it was normal
which his technician faxed to Dr. Martin Gutteridge that same night.

There was never any question about football’s identity; He was waiting for the doctor to return.
Simpson. He wasn’t back for weeks and his secretary asked if TDL would
Please keep the diagonal at this time. Dr. Stone put him in a box and
He put it in the synagogue.


Martin Gutierrez read Fax from Columbia Medical Center/Trump Diseases Laboratory. it
It had to be: -


Article: Basilica Amortis and the Method of Mathematics
(Submitted from the office of Dr. Simpson)


Properties: _ background, ? partly eaten animals.


Procedures performed. X-ray, microscopy, immunohistochemistry for RTX;
Bacteria, parasites, bacterial infections.


Results: There was no histologic or immunological evidence of previous disease in this case.
Specimens of Basiliscus amoratus.


(Signature)
Richard A. Stone, M.D. . , President


Gittier made two hypotheses based on the model. First, it’s his signature shit
Like the basilisk, it was found by scientists at Columbia University. and secondly, that
The absence of bacterial diseases means the bed bugs are less likely to hatch, sometimes that means no
Serious health risks for Costa Rica. But suppose his first thoughts were correct:
that a species of lizard had been banished from the forest to a new home, and was coming
Friendship with villagers. Gutierrez was confident that within a few weeks, the changes would
settle down and the legacies are over.


In 1990, tropical rain fell on the leaves and battered the flexible roof of the hospital.
Baja Anasco. It was about midnight; Power is lost in the storm, Islander Elena.
Morales was using a flashlight when he heard a scream. Assuming that a
She was so tired she quickly left her mother and went into the next house.
To see the newborn baby. When his hand touched the threshold, he heard a command.
And he relaxed. It was obviously the bird that flew out the window to get out of the rain. Costa
The Rukans said that if a bird came, the newborn baby would bring good luck.

Elena opened the door. The baby was lying in a crib, wrapped in a thin blanket, alone.
The face is clean. Around the edge of the basin, three dragons roared like gargoyles.
When they saw Elena, they raised their heads and looked at her curiously, but did not run. In the
light of her flashlight Elena drew blood from their noses. He curls gently, one smile.
He bent down, quickly expanded his head, and tore off a piece of the boy’s flesh.

Elena rushed forward, screaming, and the needles ran into the darkness. But before the
When she got to the crib, she could see what happened on the baby’s face and she knew
The child must die. The children scattered on the rainy night, screaming and yelling, from
They have three hind legs, like birds.


Information format


Later, after calming down, Elena Morales decides not to report the dragon attack. Although
She felt afraid that she might be bullied for abandoning the child
Nobody is waiting. So he told the mother that the child was blown out and pronounced him dead .
Among the books she sent to San Jose was SIDS: Preventing Infant Deaths . This was a syndrome
unexplained mortality among children; It wasn’t very popular and he lost his rating
Unreceived.

San Jose lab that analyzed Tiny Bowman’s hand mouse
So many amazing discoveries. There were as many syringes as there were. But among
Proteins were a mystery: Molecule was one of the biggest proteins in the 1980s
known. The biological activity was still under study, but it appeared to be a neurotoxic toxin.
Cobra is poisonous, regardless of the formulation.

The lab also detected levels of gamma-amine methibionine hydrolase. because
This enzyme was a marker of genetic engineering and was not found in wild-type animals, Technologists
She thought it was just a simple lab and didn’t mention it when they called Dr. Cruz who runs
Dr. Puntarenas.

The piece of reptile rested in a freezer at Columbia University, waiting for Dr. to return.
Simpson, who was not expected for at least a month. So things could have continued if he had
A technician at the Tropical Diseases Laboratory named Alice Levine enters and sees Tina.
Bowman drawing, and he says "Oh whose son did the dinosaur drawing?"

"what?" Richard Stone said, slowly turning towards her.

"Dinosaurs. Aren't they? My kid draws them all the time."

"This is a joke," Stone said. "From Costa Rica. A girl drew his picture below."

"No," Alice Levy shook her head. "Look. It's very clear. The big skull stands tall
The back tail is thick. For the dinosaur."

"It can't be him. He was only a foot tall."

"So? There were smaller dinosaurs back then," Alice said. "Trust me, | know. | She has two boys.
I am an expert. The smallest dinosaurs were under a foot. Tennisaurus or something like that, | not
know. Those names are impossible. "You'll never learn those names when you're over ten."


"You don't understand," Richard Stone said. "This is a picture of a modern animal. Those
He sent us an animal. It's in the closet now." Stone picked it up and shook it.
Bage.

Alice Levine looked at her frozen leg and shoulder. He didn’t touch her. "|Don't
I know," he said. "But that sounds like a dinosaur to me."

Stone shook his head. "impossible."

"why?" said Alice Levine. "Maybe turtles or turtles or whatever they call it."

Stone was shaking his head. Alice didn’t know; It was technology that
She worked in the bacteriology lab. And he had a clear idea. stone
She remembers the moment when she thought an operations manager was following her. . ..

"You know," Alice Levine said, "if this is a dinosaur, Richard, it could be a big deal."

"It's not a dinosaur."

"Has anyone checked. "No,"

Stone said.

"Well, take it to a museum or something," Alice Levy said. "You're wrong
should."

"I'm ashamed."

"You want me to do it for you?" she said.

"No," said Richard Stone. "|Don't."

"You're not going to do anything?"

"It's nothing." She put the bag back in the freezer and knocked on the door. "It's not
Dinosaurs, that’s a joke. Whatever it is, it can wait until Dr. Simpson returns from Borneo to
You know. That’s the end, Alice. This shit isn't going anywhere."


2nd iteration.


With subsequent drawings of the Frattle Law, sudden changes may appear.


Ian Malcolm
Inland Seaport


Alan Grant tilted his head, his nose an inch off the ground. It was getting too hot.
A hundred degrees. Her knees hurt, even though she was wearing braces. His lungs burned out.
Solid alkaline dust. Sweat trickled down his forehead. But Grant had forgotten
wrath. His attention was focused on the six cardinals of the earth in front of him.
Working patiently with a toothpick and an artist’s brush, she revealed a miniature L-shape
A piece of jawbone. It was only a foot long and no thicker than her thumb. The teeth were


a row of small dots, and included media characteristics] angling. Bone fragments added as in
dig. Grant paused for a moment to paint the bone with cement paste before continuing
be revealed. There’s no question that these are the jaws of a young carnivorous dinosaur.
His owner died thirty-nine million years ago at about two months old. With all the luck.
Granite can also affect the rest of the body. If it does, it will be the first complete skeleton.
Carnivorous Kid -

"Oh God!"

Alan Grant blinked and stared into the sunlight. He took off his sunglasses and wiped them off.
the back of his forehead and hand.

It was on a shipwrecked ship in the hostile country outside of Snakewater, Montana.
Beneath the vast blue sky of fire, mountains lie shattered rocks.
It stretches for miles in every direction. There weren’t any trees or shrubs. Nothing but fake marriage.
The hot sun and howling wind.

Visitors saw the hostile terrain with sadness, but as Grant looked at this landscape, he
He saw something else entirely. This infinite earth was the other and different world.
which had been extinct for eighty million years. In his mind, Grant saw himself
The hot, red sea that became the mouth of a great ocean. This inner sea was
Thousands of miles, stretching all the way from the New Rock Mountains to
Wildcats of the Appalachians. All of South America was under water.

Meanwhile, there were small clouds in the sky that were obscured by smoke nearby.
Tractors. The atmosphere was thick with carbon dioxide. The plants grew very fast.
The seaside. There were no fish in these waters, but there were canoes and sleds. Pterosaurs
swooped down to extract water from the surface. A few carnivorous dinosaurs migrated.
On the banks of the lake they move among the palm trees. There was a small island offshore.
It is about two acres wide. Surrounded by dense vegetation, the island was a pristine sanctuary.
where cannabis herbivores lay their eggs in local ponds and raise them
Let their children cry.

Over the past millions of years, the green alkaline lake deepened and eventually
had disappeared. The exposed earth buckled and cracked under the heat. and the island in the sea with its
Dinosaur eggs ended up in the ruined mountain range in northern Montana that was now Alan Grant
Gosling.

"Oh God!"

She stood with forty men with big chests and beards. She heard the laptop hum.
productive, and the distant sound of a ball cutting through the dense rock on a significant hill.
He saw children working around the bag, removing large round rocks
Looking at them with juices. At the bottom of the hill, he sees six Tipis in his camp, confused
a tent, and a trailer that served as their agricultural laboratory. And he saw Eli waving at him, leaving
Shade of the field laboratory.

"Out!" he called, turning to the east.

Grant is a dusty, blue Ford truck bouncing down the broken road towards
they. He glanced at his watch: right on time. On another hill, the children stood up and waved.
They didn’t get many visitors to Snake Coast, and there was a lot of talk about
The Environmental Protection Agency lawyer wants to see Alan Grant on it.

But Grant knows that paleontology, the study of extinct life, has in recent years
Not exactly what is expected in today’s world. The modem world was changing rapidly and cautiously
Questions often ranged from deforestation, global warming, or ozone layer
Answer, at least partially, with information from the past. Possible information for innovation experts
provide. He was called twice as an expert witness in recent years.

Grant started down the hill towards the car.


The visitor was rewarded with white powder while banging on the car door. "Bob Morris, EPA," he said,
He waves his hand. "I'm in the San Francisco office."

Grant introduced himself and said, "You like, want a beer?"

"Jesus yes." Maurice was in his early twenties, wearing a tie and business casual pants.
He picked up a sack. His shoes crunched on rocks as they walked towards
Thanks.


"When | first came on the island, | I thought this was an Indian tribe," Morris said, pointing out.
to Tipps.

"No," Grant said. "It's a nice way to live here." Grant explained that in 1978, the first
The year of the Gonzalez, they came from the south in a series of expeditions that advanced
available. But the flames were still in the air. They tried other types of tents.
Same answer. Eventually, they began to put in tipis, the inside of which was bigger, more comfortable, and
He thrives in the air. “This is Blackfoot Tipis, built around four platforms,” Grant said. "Sue Tipps is
It is built around three. But this was Black County so we were thinking . . ."

"Uh-huh," Maurice said. "It fits very well." He kept his eyes on the blank space and shook his hand
head. "How long have you been here?"

“About sixty things,” Grant said. When Maurice refused, he explained, "We measure
Time in beer. We’re starting in June with one hundred cases. We’ve been through about sixty so far.”

"Thirty-three, to be exact," said Ellie Sattler, when they reached the car. Grant was kidding.
Look at Morris's eyes. Ellie wore cut-off jeans and a staff tied around her middle. it
She was twenty-four and black. Her blonde hair was pulled back.

"Ellie's letting us go," Grant offered. "He's good at what he does."

"What's he doing?" Morris asked.

"Old plant," said Ellie." "And | to also make arrangements for the show." He opened the door and
They went inside.

The cooler inside the bike didn't drop the temperature down to eighty-five degrees, but
It seemed cool after the day beat down. There were long iron tables and small ones.
The bone specimens were properly identified, labeled and marked. contained the remote and
courses. There was a strong smell of vinegar.

Morris looked at Bones. "I thought dinosaurs were great," he said.

"They were," Ellis said. "But everything you see here is from kids. Snake water is
It’s important because of the number of dinosaur nests here. Until we start this
At work, the dinosaur babies were unknown. Only one soul was missing from him.
The Gobi Desert. We discovered a dozen different nests complete with eggs and bones.
In children."

As Grant walked to the refrigerator, he pointed out the Mauritian acid-collagen containers that were being used
To remove carbons from the bones.

"They're like chicken bones," Morris said, enjoying the inside of the mug.

"Yeah," she said. "They're like birds."

"And what about those?" Morris said, pointing out the bike window at the remains of a large pile of bones.
On the outside, it’s clad in heavy metal.

"It's a throw," Ellis said. "The bones were crushed when we took them out of the ground, old
Some days we would have rejected them, but today we are sending them to the department for testing."

"Math test?" Morris said.

"Take that with you," Grant said, setting a beer down in his pocket. He gave another to Elijah. it
He threw out his long neck. Maurice looked at her.

"We're not anonymous here," Grant said. "Want to come into my office?"

"Yeah," Maurice said. Grant led her to the end of the corridor, where a cracked reader sat a
A well-kept chair, a beaten end table. Grant fell on the couch and screamed.
He then released a cloud of dust. He leaned back and kicked his boots against the end table.
He motioned for Morris to sit in the chair. "Relax."

Grant is a professor of antiquities at the University of Denver and a member of the elite.
researchers for him, but he had never felt comfortable with the social elite. He saw himself .
as an outsider, and knew there would be important activities outside.
and your organizations. Grant had no patience with academics, museum curators, why
He summoned the Teak Dinosaur mocks. And he took some pains to distance himself from the cloth and
A trait that permeates Teacup Dinosaur Hunters, even in its stories in gin and fun.

Grant watched Maurice clear the chair before taking a seat. Maurice
She opened her bag and checked her papers before returning to Ellie, who was doing the lift.
with bones and values ​​from the end of the faucet card, ignore them;
"You're probably wondering why I'm here."

Grant shook his head. "It's been a long road, Mr. Morris."


"Well," Morris said, "to get straight to the point, the EPA is concerned about these jobs
Hammond Foundation. You get some money from them."

"Fifty thousand dollars a year," Grant nodded. "For the last five years."

"What do you know about the band?" Morris said.

Grant raised his hand. "The Hammond Foundation is a well-respected source of educational support. They are."
Research funding Globally, there are a lot of canonical research projects. | Just know they're helping Bob.
Kerry is survived by Tyrell in Alberta and John Weller in Alaska. Probably more."

"Do you know why the Hammond Foundation supports so much dinosaur research?" Maurice
asked.

"Of course. That's probably because John Hammond means dinosaur nose."

"Are you Hammond?"

Grant raised his hand. "Once or twice. He comes here for little visits. He's older, you know.
And eccentric, the way the rich sometimes are. But always very cheerful. why?"

"Well," Morris said, "The Hammond Foundation is a secret organization." he
He pulled out a map of the world marked with red dots and passed it to Grant. “This is
digs funded last year. Notice anything different about them? Montana Alaska
Canada, Sweden .. . They are all in the north. Nothing under forty-five hours."
Morris pulled out a stack of cards. "It's the same every year. There are dinosaur projects in the West, in
In Utah or Colorado or Mexico, you’re not making any money. The Hammond Foundation only helps in the winter.
Time creation. We want to know why."

Grant quickly flipped through the cards. If it is true that the base only supports cold
weather digs, then, a strange act, because some of the best dinosaur researchers were
Use in hot weather, and -

"And there are other friends," Morris said. "For example, the relationship between dinosaurs
To Amber?"

"Amber?"

"Yes. It's a pale yellow dried sap-."

"|You know what that is," Grant said. "But why do you ask?"

"Definitely," Morris said, "in the last five years Hammond has bought a lot of stuff .
Various amounts of amber are found in the US, Europe and Asia, and there are many museums that appreciate
jewelry. The foundation spent seventeen million dollars on Amber. Now they have it .
"It's in the world's largest private collection of this material."

"|It's not his father," said Grant.

“Neither does anyone else,” Morris said. "As far as we can tell, it makes no sense
all. Amber is easily formed. It doesn’t matter how powerful or defensive it is. There was no reason to
Save it. But that's what Hammond did over the years."

"Amber," Grant said, shaking his head.

"And what about his island in Costa Rica?" Morris continued. “It’s been ten years, Hammond.
The organization leased an island from the Costa Rican government. Must create a
Conservation Biology."

"| I don't know anything about it," Grant shrugged.

"| I couldn't find out much," said Morris. The island is about a hundred miles to the west.
coast. It’s very hard, and it’s in an area of ​​the ocean where air and water mix
Make it permanent. They called it Mountain Design. Isla Nublar.
Costa Ricans seem surprised that anyone would want him." Morris urged.
pump. He said, “When | Acknowledge that, according to the records, you were paid .
Counsel's fee relating to this island."

"| Was?" Grant said.

Morris handed Grant a piece of paper. It was a Slack released in March 1984 .
From InGen Inc. All rights reserved. in Farallon Avenue, Palo Alto, California. Recorded by Alan Grant in Haiti.
Twelve thousand dollars. In the bottom corner, the check is marked Advisory.
Services/Costa Rica/Youth Center.

"Obi, now," Grant said. "| Remember that. It was weird as hell, but | Remember that. And he didn't
Everything happens in a club.”


Alan Grant found the first dinosaur herd in Montana in 1979 and several more in 1979.
for the next two years, but it was not until 1983 that he published his results.
His report is about the tens of thousands of dinosaurs living on the shores of the Earth's vast interior.
in the sea, build nests in the mud and raise their young in a herd of dinosaurs
Give an adult every night. Concepts of maternal fitness in dinosaurs and patterns
Cute babies sticking their noses out of eggs was universally captivating. Grant was
Surrounded by interviews, readings and books. Naturally, he converted them all.
He wants to continue his surfing. But that was in the middle of those terrible days.
In the 1980s, Ingen Company approached him for consulting services.

"Have you heard of InGen?" Morris asked. "No."

"How did they get you the book?"

"A phone call. It was a guy named Gennaro or Genino, something like that."

Morris shook his head. "Donald Gennaro," he said. "He's InGen's legal counsel."

"Anyway, he wanted to know about the diet of dinosaurs. And he gave me a fee
“Draw him a paper.”
He is particularly interested in baby dinosaurs. children and adolescents. What they ate. | he thought
Think | I know that."

"Did you know?"

“No, really, no.
Nutrition information. But Genora says she knows we don’t have everything figured out and wants whatever she wants.
We were. And he gave a lot of money. Fifty thousand dollars."

Morris let out a sob and placed it on the end table. "You guess?"

"No, go ahead."

"So Gennard phoned you in 1984. What happened then?"

"No," Grant said. "You see what we're doing here. Fifty thousand people will help for two full summers."
in Gosling. | tell him what I'm doing | could."

"So you agreed to make a book for him."

"Yes."

"On the feeding habits of dinosaur babies?"

"Yes."

"You're Genory's friend?"

"No. Just over the phone."

"Did Jenny say why she wants this information?"

"Yeah," Grant said. "He wanted to create a museum for children and he wanted to show the kids
Dinosaurs. He said he was recruiting and naming education specialists. there
They were archaeologists like myself, a mathematician from Texas named Lane Malcolm, and a couple
Ecologists of. Systems Analyst. Great team."

Morris nodded, making notes. "So you accept the advice?"

"Yes.
We found hadrosaurs."

"What information did you send?" Morris asked.

"Everything: nest behavior, territory ranges, feeding behavior, social behavior. Everything."

"And how did Genora react?"

"It kept getting louder and louder. Sometimes in the middle of the night. Do dinosaurs eat
this? Would they eat that? Should this be in the show? | He couldn't understand why he was
So work. | meaning, | Guess the dinosaurs are important too, but they’re not. They were
Dead for thirty-five million years. You'd think his calls could wait until morning."

"|Look," Morris said. "And fifty thousand dollars?"

Grant shook his head. "I got tired of Genora and gave up on everything. We made up.
twelve thousand. That must have been mid-'85."

Morris made a note. "And InGen? Is there another connection with them?"

"Since 1985."

"And when did the Hammond Foundation start funding your research?"

"I've got to see," Grant said. "But that was then. The mid-'80s."

"And you know Hammond as a die-hard dinosaur lover."

"Yes."


Morris made another note.

"Look," Grant said. "If the EPA is concerned about John Hammond and what he's doing -
Northern Dinosaur Sites , Metal Shopping , Island Costa Rica - Why not ask
Is he about that?”

“At this point, we can’t,” Mohr said. "why not?" Grant said.

“Because we have absolutely no evidence of any foul play,” Monroe said. "But personally | I think it's
John Hammond is clearly running from the law."


"| First met," Morris explained, "by the technology transfer agency. OTT
It oversees the transfer of military-critical U.S. technology. They called.
alleging that InGen had two potential sites for illegal technology transfer. First, Inj sent three.
Cree XMPs to Costa Rica. InGen listed it as a transition into industries and said
They weren’t for sale. But OTT couldn’t imagine why the hell anyone would need this power
In Costa Rica.”

"Three corners," Grant said. "Is it some kind of computer?"

Morris shook his head. "Very powerful computer. To put it more precisely, three crays count
It has more accounting power than any other private company in the US. and InGen is
machines to Costa Rica. You have to ask yourself why."

"| Give up. Why?" Grant said.

"Nobody knows. And Hood's worried," Morris continued. "The courts are
Automatic genome sequencing – machines that automatically process the genetic code. They are so
New items that have not yet been added to the restricted list. But any genetic engineering lab can
You have one if it could be worth half a million dollars." He shuffled through his notes. "Well, a
seems InGen has deployed twenty-four Honda transmitters on their island in Costa Rica.

"They also said it was inter-regional transportation, not export," Morris said. "there
There wasn’t much OTT could do. They aren’t interested in general use. But Angel was
Clearly, he runs one of the most powerful corporations in the world
The colonization of Central America. A country where there are no laws. The same thing applies to
It's happened before."

Some US bioengineering firms are moving elsewhere.
the state so that they are not bothered by the laws. Most notably, Maurice
Turns out, it was about the Biosyn rabbit.

In 1986, the Cupertino Foundation tested an engineered Conta vaccine
Farm Chile. They did not inform the Chilean government or the agricultural workers involved. they
He just released the vaccine.

The vaccine is made up of a live virus that has been genetically modified into a virus. but
The disease was not diagnosed; Bios didn't know if the virus could be replicated or not.
Worse, the virus mutates. You typically cannot get herpes unless you are
The one the animal bit. But Biocin altered the virus to pass the airways of the lungs. you
Can become infected just by inhaling it. Biosyn employees brought this live crocodile virus to Chile in 1990.
In a commercial airplane, the passenger aircraft. Maurice often wondered what would have happened
If the capsule was ruptured during flight. Everyone on the plane could have been
People who are sexually active.

That was great. It was irresponsible. It was a criminal act. But nothing happened
for biosimilars. Chilean farmers who unknowingly risked their lives;
The Chilean government was worried about its economic problems, and American officials were
There is no charge. Well, Lewis Dodgson, the geneticist in charge of the experiment, was still working
Bios. Biosyn was smart as ever. And other U.S. companies were quick to set up
participants in other countries that had nothing to do with health research. Countries that
Granted, the company is like a tech giant, and he ran
in their lands;

"That's why we started our investigation on InGen," Morris said. "It's been three weeks."

"And what exactly did you find?" Grant said.

"Not much," Morris admitted. "If | comes back to San Francisco, maybe we should close
In the investigation. and | I think I'm going to finish here." He started packing his bag- "By
By the way, what does 'Genius Hyperspace' mean?"


“That’s a good highlight of my report,” Grant said. " 'Hyperspoo' is the word
Multidimensional space like three-dimensional tic-tac-toe. | You had to take all the action.
An animal has to eat and move and sleep, you can create an animal in it
Lots of places. Some paleontologists date animal behavior to
Ecological hyperplasia. 'Juvenile hyperspace' refers to the behavior of children
dinosaurs—if you wanted to be one, you could be."

At the end of the phone call, the phone hung up. Eli answered. "It's busy, sir," she said.
now. Can he call you back?"

Morris closed his portfolio and stood. “Thanks for the support and the beer,” he said.

"No problem," Grant said.

Grant and Morris walked down the bike to the door at the end. Morris says, "I
Hammond requested a physical product from your site? Bones, eggs, or the like
that?"

"No," Grant said.

"Dr. Satter said you'd be doing some magic here . . ."

"Well, that's not true," Grant said. “When we remove broken pieces or something.
No reason suitable for museum preservation, we send the bones to the laboratory to be crushed.
And it tries to extract the proteins for us, and then the proteins recognize and send the signal .
we."

"What lab is that?" Morris asked.

"Medical Biology Services Salt Lake."

"How did you choose them?"

"Competition keys."

"Nothing to do with the lab with InGen?" Morris asked. "not

the | Find out," Grant said.

They came to the entrance of the village. Grant opened the door and felt a rush of hot air coming from outside.
Morris paused and put on his glasses.

“In the end,” Morris said. "Suppose Ingen wasn't running a museum exhibit. Is there?"
What else did you do with the information you gave them?"

Grant laughed. "Of course. They can feed a baby Hadrosaurus."

Morris laughed too. "A baby Hadrosaurus. That'll be something to see. How big were they?"

"Same," Grant said, holding his hands six paces away. "Track size."

"And how long before they're adults?"

"Three years," Grant said. "Give or take."

Morris pulled out his knife. "Well, thanks again for your help."

“Drive back,” Grant said. He watched for a moment as Maurice returned.
to her car, then closed the garage door.

“What do you think?” Grant said.

Eli raised his hand. "Na0)


DNA encoding a RANA fragment

Mysore 2.1-2.9
Procomygotinide 3.0-3.7
Othniel 3.1-3.3
Velocitrator 1.0-3.0
Hypsilopbodontid 2.4-2.7


The results are clear: all living dinosaurs had either a rana or a boar, DNA. Some of the
The animals did. Wu still didn't understand why it took them so long. But he couldn’t
longer deny that Grant was right. The dinosaurs had grown.

He hurried to the control room.


Lex


It was stuck in a one-meter drain that ran alongside the road. He had
Baseball glove in his mouth and he was rocking back and forth hitting his head repeatedly
to the back of the tube. It was dark, but he could see her clearly through his glasses.
She didn't seem to suffer and was very comfortable.

"It's Lex. Tim."

He didn't answer. He continued banging his head on the pipe. "Get out."

She shook her head no. She could see that he was very frightened.

"Lexi," she said, "when you leave, I'll let you wear these seven nightgowns."

He just shook his head.

"Look what | have," she said as she grabbed her skirt. She looked away, not understanding. I was
Perhaps it was too dark to see. "It's your ball, Lexa. | Get your ball."

"So what."


He tried another method. "It must be troublesome there. It's cold, too. Wouldn't he want you to
Out?"

He hit his head on the pipe again.

"why not?"

"There are aminos out there."

That threw him for a moment. He hadn't said "amen" in years.

"The ammonia is gone," he said.

"There's a river. Tyransaurus Rex."

"It's gone."

"Where did he go?"

"| I don't know, but he's not here right now," Tim said, hoping that was true.

Lex didn’t move. He hung it up again. Tim sat down in the grass behind the tube.
Where he could see her. His seat was damp. She took her knee and waited.
He couldn't think of anything else to do. "I'm just going to sit here," she said. "And rest."

"Is my father outside?"

"No," she said, surprised. "He's back home, Lex."

"Did Mom?"

"No, Lexi."

"Are there giants out there?" Lex said.

"Nothing. But I'm sure they'll be here soon. They're probably on their way now."

Then he moved around in the pipe, and got out. I shiver with cold and with
Dry blood isn't great, but otherwise it's fine.

He looked around in surprise and said, "Where's Dr. Grant?"

"|I don't know."

"Well, he was here first."

"Was? When?"

"Before," Lex said. "| When he saw him | he was in the tube."

"Where did he go?"

"How | should I know?" Lex said, turning his nose up. He started shouting: "Hello.
Hell-oh! Dr. Grant? Dr. Grant!"

Tim wasn't comfortable with the noise he was making - that might wake up Tyransaurus - but
After a while, he heard the next shout. It was going from the right to the ground.
A short that Tim had been out of for a few minutes. Through his glasses, Tim saw the relieved soul, Doctor.
Grant was walking towards them, a big smile on his shirt around his neck, but otherwise he
It was good.

"Thank God," she said. "I was looking for you."


Shaking, Eddie Regis rose to his feet and wiped the cold mud from his face and hands. It took some time
very had half hour, and was among the great hills on a hill at the bottom of the road. He knew.
He didn't have much room to hide, but he was panicked and not thinking clearly. He was at the door.
This cold dirt, he tried to control himself, but he kept seeing this dinosaur.
His mind. This dinosaur is coming for him. Back to the car.

Ed Reggie didn’t remember what happened next. He thought that Lake was
he said, but she wouldn't stop, she just kept running and running.
Along the way, he lost his footing, fell down the hill, and needed some rest.
It looked like he could swim between the rocks and land there
The space was available, so that’s what he did. He's panting and scared, he can't think of anything.
Must stay away from the throne. And finally, when he was there as a rat
Between the rocks, his mind calmed down a bit, the fear had subsided, and
Shame because he abandoned the kids and ran away, now he saved himself. he
He knew he had to get back on track, he had to try to save them because he always knew
She thought of herself as meek and gentle in nature, but whenever she tried to control her
to himself, to put himself there - somehow he couldn't. He started to panic.
And he was having trouble breathing and not moving.

She told herself it was hopeless anyway. If there were kids on the street, they could
He was never strong enough, and now there’s nothing Eddie Regis can do for them, and maybe still


Stay where he was. No one will know what happened except him. And there was
He couldn't do anything. He couldn't do anything. And so the regiment stayed on.
marriages in half an hour, fighting fear, wondering if the children are dead,
Or what Hammond says when he finds out.

What startled her was what she saw inside her mouth. near
His mouth was filled with laughter, and he smirked, and she wondered if he had seen her during the fall.
Regis touched his face, feeling the swollen flesh near his mouth. He was funny, but he didn’t
We were furious. Then he realized that the bloated flesh was a deer trying to gain fat as he licked his lips. I was
Into his mouth. Shaking and vomiting, Regis felt exhausted and thought he was going to pass out.
The flesh of his lips, feeling the warm blood flow into his mouth, breaks down and throws up in confusion.
Into the forest. He felt another splinter on his arm and removed it, leaving a black trail
after the streak. Jesus, perhaps, was full of them. This falls at the base of the mountain. these
The forest hills were full of lizards. This included the black rocks. What did the workers say?
Butterflies on your underwear. They liked warm places. They liked to gas.
Your-

"Thank you!"

He stopped. There was a voice through the wind.

"Thank you! Dr. Grant!"

Jesus, that was a girl.

Ed Regis heard his voice. He wasn’t scared or angry. It was just
It’s called in its own way. And suddenly he realized that something else had to be done .
It happened, that Tyransaurus had to surrender - or did not fall - and that
Other people may survive. Grant and Malcolm. Everyone can live. and the announcement
Let him settle down for a while the same way you did when the police
He pulled you in, he adjusted himself, because he knew what he had to do, and he was fucking.
From the mountains he was already planning the next trip he was going to learn
He says, how things get better from this point.

Reggie wiped cold mud from his face and hands, evidence he was hiding. he
He wasn't ashamed that he was hiding, but now he had to take responsibility. He flew back.
He took off towards the road, but when he emerged from the leaves he hesitated for a moment. he
I didn’t see the car yet. It was kind of at the end of the mountain. Land Cruiser should be
above.

He started walking up the hill back towards Land Cruiser. It was very quiet. His feet.
Squirming in the dirt. He couldn't stand the girl anymore. Why did he stop?
A call? As he walked, he felt something happen to him. therefore
That he didn’t have to walk back there. Tyrannosaurus may still have existed. Here it is
He was already at the bottom of the hill. That’s much harder at home.

And it was quiet. He was ugly, he was soft.

Ed Regis turned and started walking towards the camp.


Alan Grant ran his hands over her legs, rubbing her arms and legs lightly. He doesn't seem to
There is pain. It was a miracle: if a cut came out of his skull, he was fine. "I told you | reason," he
said.

"Well | had to see."

The boy wasn’t that lucky. Tim's nose was swollen and sore; Grant was suspicious about it.
was broken. His right shoulder was painful and swollen. But her legs seemed to be all
right. Both children were able to walk. That was the most important thing.

Grant himself was fine except for where his right chest hurt.
The Tyrannosaurus hit him. It burns with every breath, but it doesn't seem to be too bad and it
He didn't trust his movements.

He wondered if he had been hit on purpose, since he couldn't remember anything.
The events that transpired before he took off, roaring, into the woods ten yards away
Land Cruiser. At first the blood was coming out of his chest so he stuck the leaves in the blood and
After a while it burns off. Then he would start walking around looking for Malcolm and the kids.
Grant couldn't believe he was alive and the tortured images started coming back to him a
Try to make sense out of them. The Tyrannosaurus should have easily killed them all. Why wasn’t he?


"I'm hungry," Leake said.

"Me too," Grant said. "We have to bring ourselves back to civilization. And we have to say
They are for the sun.”

"Are we the only ones who know?" Tim said. "Yes.

We need to go back and tell them."

"Then let's walk down the road to the hotel," Tim said, pointing to the island. "Thus
We'll meet them if they come for us."

Grant noticed. And he kept thinking about one thing: the past outfit.
Not even Land Crusaders before the attack begins. What animal was that? He could
Just think of one thing - the tiny Tyrannosaurus.

"| Don't think about it, Tim. There's a long way to go on both sides," said Grant. "If a
tyrannosaurs are on the way, and we'll grab them."

"So we need to be patient here?" Tim said.

"Yeah," Grant said. "Let's wait here until someone arrives." "I am

Hungry," Leake said.

"|I hope it won't be too long," said Grant. "I

I don’t want to stay here,” Lex said.

Then, from the bottom of the hill, they heard the man screaming.

"Stay here," Grant said. He ran up the mountain. "Stay here," Tim

With that, he ran after her.

Lex followed his brother. "Don't leave me, don't leave me here, you guys-"

Grant mouthed his thanks. She struggled to decide. She shook her head and
He pointed to the mountain so he could see.


At the bottom of the hill, Grant saw Eddie Regis, standing still, unmoving. They are surrounded by forest .
They were silent. The threat of skaters and boars had stopped
Surprisingly. The only sounds were the rustling of the leaves and the howling of the wind.

Lexi started to speak, but Grant sat down on a nearby wooden trunk and set his
No heavy roots in the foundation. Tim came right behind them. Grant put up his hands.
His lips motioned for them to be quiet, and he looked briefly around the tree.

The path below was dark, and the branches of huge trees fluttered in the breeze.
The filtering of the moonlight became a fickle and changing pattern. Ed Regis was gone. He took Grant
Time to find it. The FM pressed the trunk of a large tree and held it.
Reggie was unmoved.

The forest was silent.

Lex tugged at Grant's shirt impatiently, wanting to know what was going on. Then, from
Somewhere even closer, they felt a gust of wind stronger than the wind. Lex
He heard it too, because he stopped the show.

The sound floated towards them again, as soft as breathing. Grant thought he looked like
Horse breathing.

Grant looked at Regis and saw shadows moving in the moonlight on the mast.
wood. Then Grant realizes there's another shadow looming over the others, but it's not.
Moveable character: short, strong neck and square head.

The breath came again.

Tim leaned forward and looked at her. Lex did too.

They heard a crack like a tree branch break, and a Tyransaurus stepped into the road. That was
Young: About eight feet tall, he moved with the gait of a small animal, apparently.
A puppy. The baby Tyrannosaurus was staggering down the road, stopping on all fours, gasping for air
Before moving forward. He walked past the tree where Regis was hiding, giving no indication that he had
He saw her. Grant saw Regie's relaxed body for a moment. Regis turned his head to look at her.
On the far side of the Tyransaurus tree.

There were no tyrannosaurs to be seen on the road now. Regis began to breathe and released his device.
On the tree. But the forest was silent. Regis stayed by the tree stump for another half hour.
One minute. Then the wild sounds returned: the first cry of the tree dwarf, wild
In one shot, then full circle. Regis pulled away from the tree and shrugged his shoulders.


Get rid of the problem. He walked across the street and looked across the street.
Tyrannosaurus derived.

The attack came from the left.

The young man yelled and jerked his head forward, knocking Regis to the ground. she cried.
He pressed his leg, but Tyranxhor dodged and he had to catch him from behind.
Seat, because the Regis wasn't moving, he was sitting on the road crying.
dinosaur and waves his arms at it as if he might scare it away. The young dinosaur looks like
He is confused by the sounds and movements emanating from his small prey. The young man rubbed his head.
over, sniffing curiously, and Regina sucked on his nose.

"Get out! Come back! Go, come back!" Regis was screaming at the top of his lungs and
the dinosaur followed, bringing Regina to her feet. Regis was shouting, "Yes! You heard that."
I! Back! Stay away from us! As he moved away from the dinosaur. The young man continued to watch.
He was curious about the small, gentle animal in front of him, but when Regis took a few steps, he jumped.
and put it down again.

He’s playing with her, Grant thought.

"Hey!" Reggie screamed as he fell, but the young man didn't give chase and reached him.
feet. She jumped to her feet and followed him. "You idiot-back! Back! You heard me-
Back!" he roared like a lion cub.

The young man cried out, but he did not fight, and Regis drew him towards the trees and up.
Leaves on the right. After a few steps, he disappears. "Back! You! Back!" Regis shouted,
And then, at the last moment, the bull lunged and knocked Reggie onto his back. "Cut that
out", Regina shouted, and the kid dropped his head. Regina started crying, no words, just
Loud screaming.

The scream was suddenly cut off, and as the young man lifted his head, Grant saw the molten flesh.
His lips.

"Oh yeah," Lex said simply. Next to him, Tim turned around and suddenly felt nauseous. His night-
The spectacles flew off his forehead and fell to the floor with a metal thud.

The young man’s head shot up as he looked up at the mountain.

When Tim picked up his glasses, Grant grabbed both kids by the hands and started running.


retention


At night, the committees ran to the side of the road. Harding's Jeep followed a short distance.
The distance behind. Eli pointed the long way. "Is that a light?"

"Maybe," Harold said. "It's like a front strap."

The radio suddenly crackled. They heard John Arnold say,

"-You there?"

"Ahh, there it is," Harold said. "last." He pressed the button. "Yes John, we're here. We're
Near the river, it’s very fragile.”

Lots of charts. Then: "-eed your car-"

"What did he say?" Gennaro said.

"Something about cars," Ellis said. During Grant's leg in Montana, Ellie performed the surgery.
radio. With years of experience, he became adept at cutting joints.
Charms. "I thought he said he needed your car."

Harding pressed the button. "John? Where are you? We can't read you properly. John?"

There was a bright light, followed by a long reel of radio, and then Arnold's trouble.
voice, "-where are you-"

"We're a kilometer south of the Hips Paddock. Near the river, we're behind some committees."

"No, no, come back here ow!"

"He seems to have some trouble," Ellie said, frowning. There was nothing wrong with the pressure.
language. "Maybe we should go back."

Harding shrugged. "John often gets in trouble. You know how stores are. They want
Everything to the record." He pressed the radio button. "John? Say it again, please. . . ."

Lots of charts.

Very strong. The sound of lights clicking. Then: "-Milo-needs your car-out-"

Genaro frowned. "Are you saying that Muddy needs our car?"


"That seemed to be it," Ellis said.

"So, that doesn't make any sense," Harding said.

"-Someone-Other-Missing-Muldin-in-the-Car-"

"|Got it," El said. "The other cars are stuck on the road in the rain, and Mildred wants to
Go get them."

Harding shrugged. "Why doesn't Milo take another car?" He pressed the radio button.
"John? Tell Muldoon to take the other car. It's in the garage."

The radio crackled. "-listening-to-exercise-"

Harding pressed the radio button. "I said it's in the garage, John. The car's in the garage."

Very strong. "-Edra has-one-sister-"

“I’m afraid this isn’t going to get us anywhere,” Harold said. "It's alright John, we'll be right in."
He turned off the radio and turned the car off. "I just want to | understand what the rush is."

Harding put the Jeep in the car and they sped down the road in the darkness. That was another .
Ten minutes before they see the Safari welcome light, and as Harding is attracted
They stopped in front of the visitor center and saw Muldoon walking towards them. She was screaming and
He waves his hands.


"God damn it, Arnold, you son of a bitch! God damn you, you're moving that parrot out of the way! Now! My
The grandkids are back here! Now!" John Hammond stands in the control room, yelling and pointing
Her little feet. He had been walking in this direction for the last two minutes before Harry Hu had stopped.
In the corner, he winked.

"Aye, Mr. Hammond," said Arnold, "Muldoon is on his way out now to do exactly that."
Arnold turned away and lit another cigarette. Hammond was like any other leader
Arnold had never seen it. Whether it was Disney or the Navy, the staff always conducted themselves.
It's the same. They never understood the technicalities; And they thought it was a scream
The way to do things. And maybe if you were yelling at your secretaries to get
You’re a lychee.

But the yelling made no difference to the struggles Arnold now faces. that
The computer didn’t care if it screamed the power grid didn’t care if it screamed.
Technological systems were indifferent to all the explosive emotions of man. If something is
The scream had the opposite effect, as Arnold now confronted him with the supposed certainty that Nedry
There was no coming back, which meant that Arnold himself had to log into the computer and try
He needs to know what went wrong. This is going to be a tough job, he needs to stay calm.
And be careful.

"Why don't you go down to the dining-room," said Arnold, "and grab a cup of coffee? We'll call it
You and I will have more information."

"| I don't want Malcolm Effort here," Hammond said.

“Don’t worry about the Malcolm effect,” Arnold said. "Will you let me go to work?"

"God damn you," Hammond said.

"I'll call you, sir, if | there's any news for Moore," Arnold said.

He pressed buttons on his console and saw the colors change.


*/Jurassic Park Main Modules/
|
*/ call lbs
Available: Biostat.sis
Get: sysrom.vest
Contains: net.sys Contains:
power.mdl
*/
*Minicial
Website [42]2002/9A{total circle %4 [vig. 7*tp]}
If the gauge is positive (mh) (**mh). Return Schumanlanvis
Time Call 909 c.lev {void Metrowish $303} Random (3#*Maxfield)
On set system(!Dn) set shp_val.obi to lim(val{ d}samval


if meter(mh)(**m).voltameter(Vdd) returns
onSetSystem(!telecom) set mxcpl.obj to lam(val{pdl}nSatVal


Arnold was no longer using the computer. He would have gone to the back of the road now to see
line-of-code String commands that describe the behavior of a computer. Arnold was not happy.
Note that the entire Jurassic Park program required half a million lines of code,
Most are undocumented and unexplained.

Wu came forward. "What are you doing John?"

"Trying the code."

"By investigation? That takes forever."

"Tell me," Arnold said. "tell me."


way


Muldoon quickly complies, and the Jeep slides on the mud. Genaro sitting next to her.
She clasped his hands. They were running along the road in the mountains, above the river, and now they are hidden below
They are in darkness. Mildred hurried forward. His face was confused.

"How far?" Gennaro said. "Two, maybe three miles."

Ellie and Harding return to the visitor’s center. Gennaro decided to go with Muldoon.
The car swerved. "It's been an hour," Muldoon said. "For an hour, no word from the other cars."

“But they have radios,” Genaro said.

"We couldn't raise them," Muldoon said.

Genaro frowned. "If | were sitting in the car for hours on end, I'd try to use the radio to
Call someone."

"That's what I do, too," Muldoon said.

Genaro shook his head. "Do you really think something could have happened to them?"

"Perhaps," said Muldoon, "they are all right, but I shall be very happy if |
they. It’s got to be every minute now.”

The road ran down a hill. Genaro saw something white at the bottom of the mountain.
It lay among the trees by the side of the road. "Hold it," Jannard said and Meade added.
Genaro jumped out and ran forward into the front lights of the Jeep to see what it was. It's like
Like a blanket, but there was

Gennaro stopped.

Even from six feet away, he could see her clearly. She walks slowly.

Muldoon leans into the car and says, “What’s that? "it is

Once, Gennaro said.

The leg flesh was dark blue and ended up with a bloody stripe at the knee.
It was. She wore a pair of white socks, a low calf, and brown shoes. It was the sboe type
Ed Regis was shot.

At that point, Muldoon got out of the car and ran past her aiming her leg. "Jesus." He got up.
His foot emerges from the leaves and is lifted by the light of torches, and blood oozes from the rope.
gushed down on his team. Gennaro was three feet away. He focused quickly and put it on.
With his hands on his knees, he closed his eyes and breathed heavily, trying not to get sick.

"Genaro." Mild's voice was shrill.

"what?"

"Move. You're blocking the view."

Genaro took a deep breath and turned. When he opened his eyes, he saw Maud staring into his eyes.
critically in the head. "Torn at the joint line," Muldon said, "he didn't chip it—twist it and rip it.
He just tore his leg off." Mildred stood up and held the severed leg to her head to keep the rest
Blood stained the plants. His bloody hand stained his white sock as he held his ankle.
Genaro became ill again.

"It's not a question of what happened," Mildred continued. "T-Rex found it." Mildred looked up.
up the mountain, then back to the burn. "Are you okay? Can you continue?"

"Yeah," Gennard said. "|Can go."


Muldoon was walking toward the Jeep, barefoot. "|I think we should bring this
along," he said. "It doesn't seem right to keep him here. Jesus, that’s going to ruin the car.
See if there’s anything behind, will you? Trip or press . . ."

Genaro opened the back door and looked into the space behind the back seat. he
He was grateful to think about something else for a moment. The problem with the method
Reaching out to fill his mind, he found a bag belonging to an employee.
Mold, router, map, and-

"Two tars," he said. They were well painted.

“Give me one,” Muldoon said, still standing outside the car. Muldoon wrapped his leg and
He passed the group status to Genaro. Holding it in his hand, Genaro was surprised.
How heavy it was. "Just put it in the back," said Mid. "If there's a way to cut it, you'll know
Then it doesn’t rotate. . ."

"ok." Genaro put the team behind and Muldoon got in behind the wheel. he
It accelerates, the wheels spinning in the dirt, then locking up.
At one time the skylights were in the leaves of the sky, and then they moved
Ginny, and Jenny could see the road ahead of them.

"Jesus," Mildred said.

Gennaro saw a lone Land Cruiser lying on its side in the middle of the road. He couldn't see
It’s the second Land Cruiser. "Where's the other car?"

Muldoon spun around and faced left. "there." The second Land Cruise was .
twenty feet, and nailed to the foot of a tree;

"What's he doing there?"

"T-Rex missed it."

"Throw it?" Gennaro said.

Mildred's face was serious. "Let's get this over with," he said, climbing into the jeep. they
He hurried to the second Land Cruiser. Their lamps wavered and went off into the night.

As they got closer, Gennaro could see how the car had been hit. He was careful to leave Muldoon alone.
Look inside first.

"|I won't mind," Mildred said. "It's highly unlikely we'll find anyone."

"No?"

"No," she said. He explained that, during his years in Africa, he traveled to half a dozen continents,
Twelve animals have attacked people in the forest. A tiger attacked: The tiger
table at night and took a three-year-old child. Then a dog attacked Amboseli, two bulls.
attacks; A raccoon attacked further north, near Meru. In all cases, there were some
Evidence left behind.

The uninitiated thought of the grisly evidence of some animal left behind
The tent, the blood-stained trails leading into the dog, the dirty clothes, not far behind.
Camp. But the truth was, there was nothing, especially when the suspect was young.
an infant or young child. It was as if the person had disappeared as if he had left to
bush and never go back. A tortoise can kill a child by shaking him or her and breaking the neck.
Maybe there wasn’t any blood.

And most of the time you never found other people. button.
from a shirt or rubber boots. But most of the time nothing.

The pirates took the kids—they wanted kids—and they left nothing behind. So Mildred
She hoped they wouldn’t find any of the other children.

But suddenly, he was in for a surprise. "I curse," she said.


Muldoon tried to put the ring together. The front glass of the Land Cruiser was broken.
But there wasn’t much else nearby. He notices some shards of glass on the road. therefore
That's where the windshield should have broken before he picked up the car and threw it away.
here. But the car took a heavy beating. Mildred shone her light inside.

"empty?" Genaro said sternly.

"It's not," Muldoon said. His shadow shines on a radio transmitter and on the floor.
Car He saw something else, something round and black. The front doors were hidden and
It was locked, but he climbed through the back door and climbed into the seat.
Black thing.


"That's a clock," he said, peering into the light of his lamp. Unlimited clock number
Pulverized black rubber band. The LCD screen is broken, he thinks the boy might be
She wore it, even though she didn’t believe it. But that was the kind of watch a kid would get.

"What is it, Clock?" Gennaro said.

"Yeah. And there's a radio, but it's broken."

"Is that really important?"

"Yeah. And there's something else. . . ."" Mead sighed. There was a smell in the car.
He turned on the light until there was a drip of vomit coming from the side of the door. He touched her:
It’s still healthy. "Some of the kids might still be alive," Muldon said.

Gennaro glared at him. "What makes you think that?"

"Monster," Mildred said. "The clock shows." He attached a watch to Genord who
He turned his hand over in the light.

"The crystal is broken," Genaro said.

"That's true," Mildred said. "And the team wasn't hurt."

"What do you mean?"

"The kid pulled it off,"

“It could have happened at any time,” Genaro said. "Anytime before an attack."

"No," Muldoon said. "These LCD crystals are tough. It takes a pretty big blow to break them."
The clock face was smashed during the attack."

"So the kid took off his watch."

"Think about it," Mildred said. "If Tyransaurus attacked you, would you stop to
Remove your watch?"

"Maybe it's cracked."

"It's impossible to take a watch off someone's wrist without also taking the frame off.
In any case, not all teams were satisfied. No," Mildred said. "The kid got away with it. He looked at his
Make sure it’s broken and remove it. He had time to do that."

"when?"

“It could only have happened after the attack,” Mildred said. "That kid should be in this car.
After the election. And the radio was broken, so he left it behind, too. He was a smart kid, he knew
It's not worth it."

"If it's bright," said Gennard, "where will it go? Because I'm going to stay here and wait
He took it."

"Yeah," Muldoon said. "But maybe he can't stay here. Let the Tyrannosaurus come back. Or else
Some other animal. Anyway, something made him go."

"So where did he go?" Genaro said.

"Let's see if we can find out," Mildred said, and he walked down the main hallway.


Genaro stared darkly at Muldoon on the ground. His face was just saintly.
From the dirt, he pursued his dream. Mildred truly believed she was onto something.
One of the children was alive. Gennaro was unimpressed. The art of finding the right person
Sean had allowed himself to become so depressed that he shut down and destroyed the park. Whatever it is.
Muldoon said Genaro doubted him with excitement and anticipation and

"Have you noticed these papers?" Muldoon asked as he scanned the ground. "What number?" Gennaro
said.

"These barefoot, you see them coming up to us on the road, and they're the adult versions.
sboe - sole some kind of sboe. Observe the marking pattern.

Gennaro only saw dirt. The poles catch the light from the lamps.

“You can see,” continued Muldoon, “the adult editions come here, added to the
Other books. small and medium. . . They move in circles. . It's like
They stand together and talk. . .. but now they’re there, and they seem to be running away. He showed
of. "There. In the park."

Genaro shook his head. "You can see anything in that mud."

Mildred rose to her feet and staggered back. He looked at the ground and sighed. "state
Whatever you like, I'll save some kids. And maybe it’s both. He can be an adult too.
"If these large prints belong to anyone other than Regis, we should search the park."

"tonight?" Gennaro said.


But Mud wasn't listening. He was walking to a nearby soft clay
Rainfall. He tilted his head again. "What was that girl wearing?"

"Christ," Gennard said. "|I don't know."

Muldoon advanced slowly to the side of the road. And then they did .
The sound of the wind. It was an animal sound.

"Listen," Genaro said nervously, "I think we better-."

"Shhh," Mildred said. He paused to listen.

"It's just the wind," Gennaro said.

Again they heard screams. There was no wind. It was from .
There was a pile of leaves in front of him on the side of the road. She didn't look like an animal, but Mildred
He moved forward cautiously. He flicked on his light and shouted, but the air didn’t change
character. Muldoon brushed aside the maple leaves.

"What is that?" Genaro said.

"It's Malcolm," Mildred said.


lan Malcolm was behind him, his skin pale white and his mouth hanging open. He breathed.
Wind wind. Mildun handed the torch to Genaro, then bent down to examine the body.
"|I can't get hurt," he said. "Good news, Sissy Blots . . ."

Xenari then shone a bright light on the legs. "He was wearing a trousers." Malcolm's effort was shot.
Pressure on the right knee. Genaro moved the light with his foot. The right leg was bent.
From the outside sharp angle from the leg, the pants were small and soaked with blood. Mildred
He touched his hip lightly and Malcolm cried out.

Muldoon turned away and tried to decide what to do next. Malik could have other injuries.
The back is beautiful. He might kill her to move her. But if they leave him here, he’s going to die.
mess. It was because he was clever enough to put a tronic around his neck.
He bled to death. And probably would have been cut off. They can also move it.

Gennaro helped Muldoon lift the man up and roughly hoisted him over their shoulders.
Malcolm shouted and took a deep breath. "Lex," she said. "Lexi... go...Lexi..."

"Who's Lex?" Mildred said.

"Girl," Jannard said. They take Malcolm to the Jeep and arrest him.
Back seat. Gennaro pressed the gun against his leg. Malcolm shouted again. Mildred
She pulled down the sleeve of the pants and saw the soft flesh underneath, the white substance sticking out
nut.

"We have to bring it back," Mauldin said.

"You're going here without the kids?" Gennaro said.

"If they go into the park, it's twenty miles," Mudd said, shaking his head. "One
The way we can get everything in there with motion detectors. If the kids are alive and moving
All around, motion sensors will pick them up, and we can go with them and bring them back.
But if we don't get Dr. Malcolm now, he's going to die."

"Then we should go back," Genaro said.

"Yeah | Think about that."

They climbed into the car. "Would you recommend Hammond for the children," Genaro said.
missing?"

"No," Muldoon said. "you are."


retention


Donald Gennaro glanced at Hammond, sitting in the empty dining room. The man was making a map.
Cream, to eat in peace. "So Mildred believes the kids are somewhere in the park?"
"She thinks so, yes."
"So I'm sure we'll find them."
"| Hopefully so," said Jannard. He watched the old man continue to eat and felt cold.
"Oh | I'm sure we'll find them. After all | keep telling everyone this park was made for kids."
Genaro said, "So you understand they're missing, sir."


"missing?" He jumped up. "Of course | I know they're lost. I'm not that old." She was happy and
Change the voice again. "Look, Donald," Hammond said. "Let's not take ourselves too seriously. We are
a Sunday in the storm or something, so we had a bit of a regret
Terrible accident. And that’s what happened. We are dealing with it. Arnold is coming.
Computers are wiped. Mildred takes the children, and | You had no doubt he would get back with them.
By the time we finish this design. So let’s wait and see what happens next, shall we?”

"Whatever you say, man," Gennard said.


"why?" Henry Wu said as he looked at the car screen.

"Because | I think Nedry did something with the code," Arnold said. "That's why I'm investigating."

"Okay," Wu said. "But have you looked at your options?" "like

What?" Arnold said.

"| I don't know. Aren't the security systems working?" Wu said. "Bone tests? All of that?"

"Jesus," Arnold said, snapping his fingers. "It must be. Security measures can't be killed."
Except for the main panel."

"Well," Wu said, "if Keichika's busy, you can explain what he did."

"I sure as hell can," Arnold said. He started pressing buttons. Why hadn't he thought of it?
before? That was obvious. The Jurassic Park computer system had several levels of security.
built-in systems. One of them is the software that controls all the software
which are accessed by users to the system. It was originally installed as a crime-correction tool.
However, it is preserved for its safety value.

For a moment, all the letters Nedry had typed into the computer earlier in the day.
They are listed in a separate window on the screen:


13, 42, 121, 32, 88, 77, 19, 13, 122, 13, 44, 52, 77, 90, 13, 99, 13, 100, 13, 109, 55, 103
144, 13, 99, 87, 60, 13, 44, 12, 09, 13, 43, 63, 13, 46, 57, 89, 103, 122, 13, 44, 52, 88,9.
31, 13, 21, 13, 57, 98, 100, 102, 103, 13, 112, 13, 146, 13, 13, 13, 77, 67, 88, 23, 13, 13
system

Nedra

Go to command level.

Nedra

040/ # L/67& m.

Hello

security

See key.

Insecurity

sl from

security

white_rbt.obj


"That's it?" Arnold said. "He's been hanging around here for hours, it seems."

“Maybe it’s just killing time,” Wu said. "Until he decided to get off with it."

The first list of numbers was Nedry's ASCI keyboard code.
He tapped his console. These numbers mean that it was still within the standard UI, e.g.
Any casual computer user. So at first Nedra was just watching, which you wouldn’t do.
Remember the programmer who designed the system.

“He was probably checking to see if there were changes, before he went in,” Wu said.

"Maybe," Arnold said. Arnold was now looking at the list of commands which allowed him to
Follow Nedry’s progress through the system, line by line. "We can see what he did."

system is Nedry’s quest to move away from ordinary users and gain code space.
The computer asked him his name, and he answered: Neidra.

That name was authorized to access the code, so the computer allowed it to enter the system.
Nedry asked to go to the command level, the computer's highest level of command. command level.
He asks for more security and asks Nedry for his name, contact number 7 and his password.


Nedra

040/# L/67& m.

Hello

These inputs brought Nedry to the command level. From there, he sought safety. and since the
He obliged, and the computer allowed him to walk away. Back at the security level, Nedry tried.
Three changes:

See key.

Insecurity

sl from

"He's trying to relax the security measures," Wu said. “He didn’t want anyone to see what.
She's going to do it."

"Of course," Arnold said. "And he doesn't seem to know that he can't change
The systems are off unless the switches are swapped manually or on the master.”

After three failed missions, the computer automatically worried about Nedry. but
Since he came in willingly, the computer assumes he is Nedry.
disappearing, trying to do something he couldn’t do from where he was. So the computer asked
That’s where he wanted to be, Neider said.

security. And he left it there.

"Finally," Wu said, "because it is." He pointed at Neidra's last message .
He entered.

white_rbt.obj

"What is this?" Arnold said. "The white rabbit? Is that supposed to be his special game?"

"It's labeled as a thing," Wu said. In computer terminology, an “object” was a set of code.
One that can be moved and used in the same way you would move a chair around the room. Something
It could be a set of commands to draw a picture, refresh a screen, or do some
The calculation.

"Let's see where it is in the code," Arnold said. "Maybe we can figure out what he's doing." he
Go to the main program and type:


Search for WHTE-RBT.OBJ
The computer took the shine:
Nothing found in libraries


"Not there," Arnold said.
"Then ask for the code list," Wu said.
Arnold wrote:


Search/List: witt-rpt.obg


The screen scrolled quickly, the lines of code blurring as they passed. It stayed that way.
for about a minute, then abruptly stopped.

"There it is," Wu said. "It's not a thing, it's a legacy." The screen displayed an arrow.
to show one line of code:


curv = gett{cm.dt} tamrn {itm.dt2}. Kur
= gehandle {ssd.etcl} tamrn2{etm.dd4}.
On the radiometer (!gN), convert shp-val.obi to lim(Val{d})-Xval. and
Meter Value (mH) (**mH).Return MeterVis.
if metroband](vGT) ((Drobuck(tY)) Return.
limitDat.4 = maxbytes (%33) to {limitation 04} setting.
digit.5 = digit, five digits, 0 {digit .2-value(sb)}.
On whte-rbt.obi link.sst {security, privacy} ready to publish.
Northern={Maxiran+Spect} Tampine(fdn-&bb+$404).
hormone={max range-set/2} buffer(fdn-&dd+$105). void
Camera SendScreen.obi print.


"Son of a bitch," Arnold said.

Wu shook his head. "It's not a code error at all."

"No," Arnold said. "It's a casting door. The fat man put in what looked like a summoning, but."
A command that turns security and perimeter systems on and off. He likes
You can get anywhere in the park."

"Then we should be able to wake them up again," Wu said.

"Yes, we should." Arnold frowned at the screen. "All we have to do is learn the commands.
I will track the murder on the link,” he said. "We'll see where that takes us."

Wu rose from his chair. "At that moment," she said, "someone entered
Freezer for about an hour. | Think | You better go count my genes.”


Eli was in his room removing wet clothes and changing clothes when someone knocked
mouth.

"God?" he said, but when he opened the door, he saw Maud standing there and
bag tucked under his arm. Muldoon was also wet and there were scratches.
Dirt on his clothes.

"I'm sorry, but we need your help," Mildred said quickly. "Land Cruisers Attacked and
1 hour ago. We brought Malcolm, but he was depressed. He suffered a serious leg injury. It’s
He still doesn't care, but | He laid on the bed in his room. Harding is on his way."

"Harod?" she said. "What about the rest?"

"We haven't got the others yet, Dr. Satter," Mildred said. He was speaking slowly now.

"Oh my God."

“But we think Dr. Grant and the children are still alive. We think they entered the park, Doctor.
Satter."

"Did you go into the park?"

"We think it is. Meanwhile, Malcolm needs help. I called Harold."

'Shouldn't you call a doctor?"

"There's no doctor on the mountain. Harold's our best." "but

Of course you can call the doctor-" he said.

"No." Mildred shook her head. "The phone lines are down. We can't call." He changed the location.
Pack in his hand.

"What is that?" she said.

"It's nothing. Just go into Malcolm's room and help Harold if you want." and

Milden was gone.

She sat down on her bed, dejected. Ellie Satter is not a woman afraid of the dangerous.
And he knew Grant from bad situations before. Suddenly it disappeared.
badlands on the fourth day when a mountain gave way beneath him and his truck fell a few hundred feet
The river. Grant’s right leg was broken. He had no water. But he returned to walking with a broken leg.

On the other hand, children . .

He shook his head, dismissing the idea. Maybe the kids liked Grant. and if
Grant was out in the park, fine. .. the perfect person to get them safely at Jurassic Park
More than a dinosaur expert?


In the park


"I'm tired," Leake said. "Take me, Dr. Grant." "You're too big to go," Tim said.

"But I'm tired," she said.

"Okay, Lexi," Grant said, taking it. "Oh, you're tight."

It was getting close to 9:00pm when the full moon was obscured by mist and their shadows
He led them across a clearing into the dark woods beyond. Lost in thought, Grant tried.
Decide where it was. Since they went through the wall at the beginning, which had the car
It hit, and Grant was sure they were somewhere in Tyransor.
Paddock. Which was a place he didn't want to be. He thought he was looking at a computer.


Tyrannosaurus local range control, the dashed line that tracks its movements
In a small space. She and the children now lived in that house.

But Grant also remembered;
This means that they will know they have left the paddock if they cross a barrier.
moat, or both.

He hadn’t seen any thanks so far.

The girl rested her head on his shoulder and twirled her hair in her fingers. It soon happened.
Energy. Tim walked next to Grant.

"How are you holding up, Tim?"

"Okay," she said. "But | do you think we could be in Tiransaurus's place."

"I'm sure we are. | I hope we get out soon."

"You're going into the forest?" Tim said. As they approached, the forest seemed dark.
Make a profit.

"Yeah," Grant said. “I think we can navigate by numbers with motion sensors.”

The motion sensors were green boxes fixed about four feet off the ground. Some were
personal; Most of them are attached to trees. None of them work because it looks like
The power was still off. Each sensor box had a centrally mounted glass lens and a painted barcode.
The number below that. Up ahead, in the moonlight haze, Grant could see a console marked
T/S/04.

They entered the forest. There were big trees everywhere. In the moonlight the mist hid.
The earth whirled around the roots of trees, it was soft, but it was moving.
A traitor. And Grant was watching the centaurs. They seemed to be numbered.
order. It passed T/S/03, and T/S/02. Finally, they reached T/S/01. He was too tired to
girl, and was hoping this would fit within the limits of Tiransaurus paddock, but that
It was just another condo in the middle of nowhere. Then the next document was T/N/01,
Thereafter T/N/02. Grant understood that accountability must be maintained in relation to the land around him
center point, such as a compass. They were moving from north to south, so the numbers dwindled
They approached the middle and then grew again.

“At least we’re going in the right direction,” Tim said.

"Good for you," Grant said.

Tim smiled, pounding on the vines in the fog. He quickly rose to his feet. They kept walking.
A little while. "My parents are getting divorced," she said.

"Uh-huh," Grant said.

"My dad passed away last month. He has his own place in Mill Valley now."

"H-hi."

"He doesn't take my sister anymore. He never will."

"And he said you have a disorder in your brain," Grant said.

Tim cheered. "Yes."

"Did you forget?" Grant said.

"That's not true," Tim said. "Sometimes. He gets too emotional."

"Who, your mother?"

"No, Lexi. My mother has a boyfriend. She knows him from work."

They traveled at a later date than T/N/03 and T/N/04. "Did you see that?" grant
said.

"Yes."

"How are you?"

"Okay," Tim said. "Smaller than Dad, but skinny."

"How does it treat you?"

"| I don't know. It's fine. | ​​I think he's just trying to put a good face on me. | I don't know what's going
process. Sometimes my mom suggests we sell our house and move. Sometimes he and I
Mom fights at night. | I sat in my room playing games on my computer but | I can still hear it."

"Uh-huh," Grant said.

"Are you divorced?"

"No," Grant said. "My wife died young."

"And now you want Dr. Satter?"

Grant smiled darkly. "No. He's my student."


"You mean he's in school?"

"Get college, yeah." Grant paused long enough for Lexi to turn to his other side and
They kept going, passing T/N/05 and T/N/06. There was thunder in the distance. that
The rain was moving south. There was very little noise in the forest except the plane.
cicadas and the soft chirping of tree frogs.

Do you have kids?" Tim asked. "No,"

Krantz said.

"Are you going to see Dr. Satter?"

"Well, she's going to marry the best doctor in Chicago for another year.

"Oh," Tim said. He seemed surprised to hear that. They walked for a while. "So who is
Are you going to get married?"

"|Don't think I'll marry anyone," Grant said. "I

Neither do you,” said Tim.

They walked for a while. “Are we going to walk all night?” Tim said.

"| I didn't think | could," Grant said. "We need to stop for a few hours." She looked straight into his
watch. "We're good. We have fifteen hours before we have to get back. Before the ship
It reaches the broader community."

"Where are we going to stop?" Tim asked suddenly.

Grant was wondering the same thing. His first thought was that they could climb trees and
Sleep upstairs. But they had to climb a long way to get out of the animals safely, and
Lex can fall while sleeping. The branches were stiff; They wouldn’t get rest.
At least, he wouldn’t.

They needed a safe place. He thought back to the plans he had seen on the plane.
down. He remembered that there were outhouses everywhere .
Divisions. Grant didn’t know what they looked like because they were on higher ground.
He wasn't into it. And he couldn't remember where they were, but he remembered them
They were all around the park. Maybe somewhere nearby.

But that wasn’t mandatory and just passed a barrier and got out.
tyrannosaur paddock, finding a horse means a technical search. And good
The solutions were-

"Tim, can you hold your sister for me? I'm going to climb a tree and look around."


Through the branches of the trees he looked closely at the forest, the tops of the trees rising to
His right hand and his left. They were so surprised that they approached the forest directly in front of the trees.
That ended before electricity and asphalt. Then there’s the mother .
Open field, he thought it was a sauropod scale. In the distance, lots of trees and fog.
The moonlight glints off the ocean.

In the distance, he heard a dinosaur roar, but it was far away. It’s Tim’s funeral-
vision goggles and try again. He followed a group of ashy holes, and finally saw the
He was looking for it: a dark alleyway leading to a remote, remote area. first house;
He wasn’t above ground, but he was there. And it wasn’t far. Maybe a mile or so
from the tree.

When he landed on his feet, Lex was smirking.

"What's the matter?" "I heard

Amen."

"That won't bother us. Are you awake now? Come on."

He led her to the fence. It was twelve feet high and topped with a steel plate. it
It seemed to extend above them in moonligbt. There was still water on the other side.

Lexus looked up at the wall suspiciously. "can

You ride it?" Grant asked.

He gave him his gloves and his baseball bat. "Sure. It's easy." He started to move. "but | all
Tim can't."

Tim growled angrily: "Shut up."

“Tim’s afraid of heights.”

"It's not."

He went upstairs. "That's it."


"I don't."

"Then take me."

Grant turned to Tim, tense in the dark. The boy wasn't moving. "You're so good with the wall."
Tim?"

"sure."

"You want some help?"

"Tim's a bad cat," Lex called.

"Bad idea," Tim said, and started to move.


"It's going to be cold," Leake said. They were standing up to their waists in stinking water.
Cement cement. They climbed the fence and nothing bad happened until Tim ripped his shirt off.
Wire strips above. Then they all train underwater, and now Grant had
Looking for a way out.

"At least | I got Timmy on the wall for you," Lex said. "It's scary most of the time."

"Thanks for your help," Tim said with a smile. In the moonlight, he could see some light bulbs flickering
The outside. He walked through the hole and looked out at the concrete wall in the distance. concrete;
It was simple; They could not ride on it.

"Eww," Lex said, pointing at the water.

"That won't hurt you Lex."

Grant finally found a spot where the bridge had broken and a fruit had grown to
water. He grabbed the vine and held its weight. "Let's go kids." They started to move.
vine, returning to the well above.

It only took a few minutes to cross the field to the waterfall leading down
Service Road, and maintenance building on the right. They went through two motion sensors and
Grant noted with some relief that the sensors still weren’t working and the lights weren’t working.
More than two hours since the first power outage, it has not been restored.

Somewhere in the distance, they heard the news of Torraso. "Is she here?" Lex said.

"No," Grant said. "We're in a different part of the park than him." They slid down to the grass.
embankment and walked up to the street level. In the dark, it was forbidden.
like.

"What is this place?" Lex said.

"He's safe," Grant said, hoping that was true.

The entrance is wide enough to drive a truck through. It was full of strict bars.
From inside, they could see the front of the house was an open house with a grassy lawn and a bar
between the components.

The door was closed behind a heavy shutter. When Grant tried, Lex was dragged aside.
Between the offices. "Come on guys."

Tim followed. "I think you can do it, Dr. Grant."

He was strong; It was a big push, but Grant managed to ease his body between the bags
and into the bathroom. As soon as he stepped inside, he was overcome with exhaustion.

"| I wonder if there's something deeper," Lex said.

"Just weed." Grant broke a brick and spread it on the street. The grass in
The middle was warm. They are sure they feel warm. Lex rolled to her side and closed it.
eyes. Tim reached out to him. He heard the cries of the sarpods in the distance.

Neither child spoke. They were getting closer now. Grant raised his hand and looked at her.
You looked, but it was too dark to see the light. She felt the warmth of the children against her own body.

Grant closed his eyes and fell asleep.


retention


As Muldoon and Gennaro arrive at the control room, Arnold hits his switch and says.
"I understand, your little princess."

"What is that?" Genaro said.

Arnold pointed to the screen:


Vgl = getHandled {dat.dt} timecall {atm.time}

Vg2 = get {date. itl} timecall {itm.time}

if link(Vgl,Vg2) return lim(Vgl,Vg2) and
link(Vg2,Vgl) returns lim(Vg2,Vgl).

On whte_rbt.obj SecurityGraphics (Vgl), Permits (Vg2)
limitDat.1 = maxbytes (%22) to {threshold .04} set
border.2 = Steven, Steven, 0 { border.2-value(dj)}

on fini.obi link.sst {security, privacy} settings to enable
fini.obi to edit link.sst {security, privacy}
on fabric.obj delete row rf whte_rbt.obj, fabric.obj Vgl =
getHandler {data.dt} utility {atm.tmp} Vg2 =
gethead {dat.atl} vatcal {atm.tmp}

limitDat.4 = maxbytes (33%) to {limit .04} of .
boundary.5 = set zero, set five, 0 { limit .2-value(sj)}


"That's it," Arnold said cheerfully.

"What is that?" Genaro asked, staring at the screen.

"| Finally I got the command to restore the original code. The command called 'fini.ob' resets
The most related parameters are walls and energy.

"Okay," Mildred said.

"But he does something else," Arnold said. "Then it deletes the lines of code pointing to it."
It destroys all evidence he was there. It's very exciting."

Genaro shook his head. "I don't know much about computers." Although he knew a lot about
Find out what it means when a major tech company goes back to source code. It means huge, huge.
Problems.

"Well, look at this," Arnold said and texted:

Fine.obj

The screen flashed and instantly changed.


Vg1 = GetHead {Da.DTPMTTM} Vg2 =
gethead {dat.atl} vatcal {atm.tmp}

if link(Vgl,Vg2) return lim(Vgl,Vg2) and
link(Vg2,Vgl) returns lim(Vg2,Vgl).

limitDat.1 = maxbytes (%22) to {threshold .04} set
border.2 = Steven, Steven, 0 { border.2-value(dj)}
Vgl = Gateway {data.dt} vTalk {atm.tm} Vg2 =
gethead {dat.atl} vatcal {atm.tmp}

limitDat.4 = maxbytes (33%) to {limit .04} of .
boundary.5 = set zero, set five, 0 { limit .2-value(sj)}


Muldoon turned to the windows. "see!" Outside, huge lights were shining.
All over the park, they went to the windows and looked outside.

"Hot hot," Arnold said.

Gennaro said, "Does that mean the electric paints are off?"

"You say he does," Arnold said. "It takes a few seconds to get up to full strength, because we're
I’ve got fifty miles off the coast and the producer has to recharge the breeders on the way.
But in half a minute we're back in business," Arnold pointed to the standing bull
Park map.

On the map, bright red lines emerged from the power station and moved.
Park, as electricity flows through the swamps.

"And the motion detectors?" Gennaro said.

"Yeah, them too. It'll be a few minutes while the computer resets. But everything works."
Arnold said. "About half past nine, we've got the whole thing off and running."


Grant opened his eyes. Bright blue light streamed into the room through the strips.
gate. Light Quartz: The power was on as he glanced at his watch. It was only fifty-nine.
He was asleep for two minutes. She decided she could sleep for a few more minutes and
He then returns to the square, stands in front of the motion sensors and waves.
Let them go. The Countess had seen him; They send a car to pick her up and the kids, she
She tells Arnold to call the boat and they all spend the night in their beds.
Logic.

He would do it now. Just a few minutes. She shifted and closed her eyes.
further.


"Not bad," Arnold said in the control room, looking at the glossy map. "There are three cuts
Throughout the park. much better than | Hopefully."

"The cuts?" Gennaro said.

"The wall automatically cuts short sections," he explained. "You can see the mother
"One here, on Twelve Street, near the highway."

"That's where Rex broke down the fence," Mildred said.

"It's quick. And there's another one here at Sector Eleven. Near the Sharppod Training Center."

"Why does that part leave?" Gennaro said.

"God knows," Arnold said. "Maybe it's hail damage or a fallen tree. We can check
Observe for a while. The third is at the edge of the Great Forest. I don't know what's supposed to happen.
Outside, too."

As Genaro looked at it, the map became more complex, filled with green dots and numbers.
"What's all this?"

"Animals. The motion sensors are working again, and the computer is booting up."
The location of all the animals in the park. And other people, too."

Gennaro glanced at the map. "You mean Grant and the kids . . ."

"Yeah. We've doubled our search number to over four hundred. So, if they're there to move
surrounded," Arnold said, "instinctive movements pick them up like any other animal." He looked around
card. "But | I haven't seen anything yet."

"Why is it taking so long?" Gennaro said.

"You must understand, Mr. Gennard," said Arnold, "that there are many sides
there. Tree branches in the wind, birds flying and all sorts of things. The computer needs to
Eliminate all background motion. It can be taken-away. ok. The account is gone."

“Aren’t you kids?” Gennaro said.

Arnold leaned back in his chair and stared at the map. "No," he said, "right now is
There are no additions to the map. Everything counted there as a dinosaur.
Maybe they’re up in a tree or some other place where we can’t see them. | Not to worry yet.
Not many animals have shown up like Rex’s mother. This is because he sleep
Somewhere and not moving. Maybe people are sleeping too. We just don't know."

Mildred shook her head. "Well, let's get on with it," he said. "We need to fix the fences."
and return animals to their natural habitats. According to this computer, we have five
Back to the beautiful paddock. I'm going to cancel the maintenance teams now."

Arnold turned to Gennard. "You might want to check Dr. Malcolm's reaction. Tell Dr. Harold
that Muldoon needed him for an hour to supervise the herd. And I will inform Mr. Hammadi.
"We're starting our final cleanup."


Genaro walked through the metal doors and entered the front door of the Safari queue. He saw
Ellie Sattler comes down to the square with her flip-flops and a can of dusting water. "There it is
In a restaurant," he said. "We use it to boil water for clothes."

"How are you?" Gennaro asked.

"Very well," he said.

Genaro followed Ellie downstairs to Malcolm's room and was startled to hear her scream.
laughter. The dentist was lying on his back on the bed and Harold was setting up an IV.

"Then another guy said, 'I'll tell you honestly, | I don't like it, Billy. | I'm back on the toilet paper!"

Harold was laughing.


"Not bad, is it?" Malcolm said smiling. "Oh. Mr. Gennaro. You came to see me. Now you
You know what happens when you try to stand back up."

Gennaro went in and tried.

"He has a high dose of morphine," Harding said.

"Not very long, | can tell you," said Malcolm. "Col, he's affected by his drugs. Did they find him
What about the others?”

"No, not yet," Jenna said. "But I'm glad you did the right thing."

"There must be another way," said Malcolm, "if a broken leg is possible
septic and starting to smell very, uh, pungent? but | Always say if you can’t keep the memory
fun. . ."

Gennaro smiled. "Do you remember what happened?"

"Sure | Remember," Malcolm said. “Do you think a Tyrannosaurus would bite you?
rex And it comes out of your mind? No really, I'm telling you, you'll remember it for the rest of your days.
life. In my case, probably not a long time. But, still-yes, | remember."

Malcolm described running out of the Land Cruiser in the rain and being chased.
Rex. "It was my own fault. He was too tired, but | he was scared. Anyway, he chose
I got up in the jaw."

"how?" Gennaro said.

"Torso," Malcolm said and lifted his shirt. A wide half-circle ran out of it.
shoulders to stomach. "He lifted me off his lap, shook me very bloody, and threw me on the floor. and |
He was scary, but he was all in when he threw me. | Sunday
Footstep. But the bite wasn't half bad." She sighed. "I'm thinking.

"Most carnivores don't have very strong jaws. The real strength is in the tongue," Harding said.
muscles. The jaws merely clench, while they use the tongue to twist and tear. but with a small
Faith like Dr. Malcolm Banga would just shake it off and throw it."

"I'm afraid that's true," Malik said. "| I doubted I would live but the heart of a great man
He wasn't into it. To be honest, he struck me as a less than solid striker.
A car or a small house.”

"You think he attacked with half a heart?"

"It pains me to say it," Malcolm said, "but | I didn't think seriously | He was absolutely in his right mind. He was
Mine, of course. But then again, it only weighs eight tons. | not. "

Genaro turned to Harding and said, "They're going to fix the walls now. Arnold said."
"Muldoon needs your help herding the animals."

"Okay," Harold said.

"As long as you leave me with Dr. Satler," Malcolm said, "and lots of morphine." “And unless we
"You have no influence here, Malcolm."

"What's Malcolm's effect?" Gennaro said.

"Imagination forbids me to tell you the details of a phenomenon," Malcolm said.
I." She took another deep breath and closed her eyes. Within moments, she was asleep.

Ellie walked out to the balcony with Genaro. "Don't be fooled," he said. "It's a big problem
On it. When will the helicopter get here?"

"Helicopter?"

“He needs surgery this time.
island."


park


The portable generator sprang to life and roared to life, and the electric pins glowed at the end.
with their telescopes in their hands. Muldoon heard the sound of the woods stream a few yards away.
north. He returned to the maintenance van and saw an employee leaving with the large vehicle.
Pierre St.

"No, no," he said. "Just strings, Carlos. We don't need to cut."

She turned to look at the wall. They had trouble finding space at first.
Because there wasn’t much else: there was a small tree in the park. I was
Many of those planted in the park region had their hands to
Hide the fence from prying eyes.


But this particular tree was tied with nails and needles. The wires were
It broke in the strong wind, and the metal bar blew against the wall and pulled him closer.
leave. Of course, none of this should have happened; Earth crews had to use plastic.
Insulated and insulated wires near walls. But it happened anyway.

Either way, it’s not going to be a big job. All they had to do was remove the wood from the wall.
Remove the metal wires and place them in the garden to be ready in the morning. Shouldn’t go
More than twenty minutes. And that was good, because Mildred discovered dilophosores
He always stayed near the river. Although the workers from the river
A wall through which demons could dive and poison their fire.

Rama, a servant, comes. He said, "Sixcuse Mud, did you see the vision?"

"What light?" Mildred said.

Ramen headed east into the forest. "|We saw it as we were leaving. It's very visible
faint. Did you see? It's like a lighted car, but it's not moving."

Muldoon rolled his eyes. Maybe it was the immediate adoption. After all, the government was in power again.
"We'll worry about it later," he said. "Now let's get this tree out of the wall."


Arnold was very happy. The park was getting back to normal. Mildred was preparing
The walls. Hammond went to watch the animals being transported with Harding. although
He was tired, Arnold was kind; He was thinking of hiring lawyer Jenny.
"The Malcolm Effect?" Arnold said. "Are you sure about that?"

"I'm just curious," Gennard said.

"You mean you want me to tell you why Malcolm is wrong?"

"sure."

Arnold lit another cigarette. "It's technology."

"Look at me."

"Okay," Arnold said. Linear theory describes a nonlinear system. It is now available.
The idea of ​​studying everything from bags to populations to the brain
waves during the syndrome. A very fashion-oriented science. It is safe to use on any rough road.
Where things can happen. ok?"

"Okay," Gennard said.

"Lan Malcolm is a mathematician specializing in chaos theory. He's funny and great.
But what it does, in addition to wearing black, is use the computer to model the behavior of
Complex systems. And John Hammond loves new scientific discoveries, so he asked Malcolm
Model the system at Jurassic Park. What Malcolm did. All of Malcolm’s models are phase-space.
models on the computer screen. Have you seen them?"

"No," Gennard said.

"Well, they're like sunflowers wrapped around. According to Malcolm, everybody's actions
The system follows the propeller surface. You and me?”

"Not exactly," Genaro said.

Arnold waved his hand in the air. "Let's say | put a bucket of water on my back. Oh.
The point would fly right out of my hands. Maybe it’ll run towards my wrist. Perhaps it will escape towards my finger.
Or between my fingers. | I really don't know where it's going, but | Just know it will run.
I have a hand somewhere. It has to be done."

"Okay," Gennard said.

GPS theory treats the behavior of the entire system as a moving water droplet.
Complex attack surface. The point can roll down or slide out to the side. It can be
Do a lot of things, depends. But it will always be moving with the outside of the giant.”

"ok."

Malcolm’s models tend to have a gap, or steep gradient, where the water droplet accelerates
up very much. He calls this movement the Malcolm Effect. The whole system.
could fall . And that’s what he said about Jurge Parker. Because he was in
Chaos."

"It's total chaos," Genaro said. "And what did you do when you got her order?"

"We didn't agree, we certainly did," Arnold said.

"Is that unreasonable?"


"It'll clear itself," Arnold said. "We're dealing with life stuff, after all. This is life, not
Computer models."


In the harsh lights, the green head of Hypsilophodent hung from the orb.
The tongue is taken care of, the eyes are taken care of.

"Careful! Careful!" Hammond shouted, as the corridor began to stir.

Harding grunted, his head bucking against the leather straps. He didn't want to live.
via the intravenous artery. Crank shouted, lifting the beast into the air.
Waiting for truck paint. Hipsy was a small dryosaur, seven feet tall and weighing about five feet.
One hundred pounds. It was dark green with brown spots. He was barely breathing, but
It seemed normal. Harding had shot himself moments earlier with a stun gun and
He seems to have figured out the right way to go. There was always a time to take these big
Animals. Too rare and they’ll run off into the woods and land somewhere you can’t reach.
they. Too bad they went into cardiac arrest. This assumes the same conclusion
Jump and fly. The right dosage.

"Look! It's easy!" Hammond was yelling at the staff.

"Mr. Hammond," Harold said. "please."

"Well, they have to be careful-."

"They care," Harold said. He climbed backstage like a hippie.
He went down and put him in the chains. Harding slipped on a heart-shaped necklace.
She monitored the heartbeat, then took a large thermometer the size of a turkey
baster and insert it into the rectum. It reads: 96.2 degrees.

"How's it going?" Hammond asked angrily.

"Okay," Harold said. "He dropped a degree and a half."

"That's a lot," Hammond said. "It's too delicious."

“You don’t want him to get up and jump off the truck,” Harding said.

Before coming to the park, Harding was director of veterinary medicine in San Diego
animal, and a global expert on bird care. He flew all over the world and consulted with animals.
In poultry keeping in Europe, India, and Japan. It wasn't necessary when doing this special.
The little guy shows up and offers her a position in a play park. But when he learned what .
Hammond was … he couldn’t pass. Harding is academically inclined and
prospect to write the first book in veterinary medicine: Diseases of dinosaurs were
coercion. By the end of the twentieth century, veterinary medicine had advanced scientifically –
Good Animals takes hospitals that are different from hospitals. The New Books were merely revisions of the old books.
For a global practitioner, there is no world that can be controlled. But being the first to take notice .
New Class of Animals: That was something!

Harding has never regretted his decision and has developed a great experience with
These animals. And he didn't want to hear a word of Hammond now.

Hypsy sighed and shook it. He was breathing slowly; There was no optical illusion.
yet. But it was time to move on. "You're all aboard," cried Harold. "Let's give this girl back to her
Paddock."


"Live organisms," Arnold said, "entertainment is not like mechanical organisms. Life organisms are never
Equilibrium. They are inherently unstable. It may look like they’re sitting still, but they’re not. Everything in
Movement and transformation. In a sense, everything is falling into place."

Gennaro was blushing. "But not much changes, body temperature doesn't change at all
Other types-"

"Body temperature is constantly changing," Arnold said. "Forever. It changes periodically."
Twenty-four hours, low in the morning and high in the evening. varies with mood, with
Disease, with exercise, with the outside temperature, with food. It varies with
down. Minor variations on the screen. Because at any given moment some force holds heat
At the top, other forces are pulling it down, and it is not affected by A’s vibration. And all other aspects of life
So are the systems.”

"So you're saying . . ."

"Malcolm is a different theory," Arnold said. "Sitting in his office, he did the right thing
mathematical model, and it never occurred to him that what he saw was wrong.


Essentials. See: Time | When we were working on musicals, we were doing something called 'resonance.'
Yaw.' The resonant diameter means that although the missile didn’t sit completely off the pad, it
There was no hope for him. She was out of control, and she couldn’t get him back. is the
Features of mechanical systems. A small tremor can be so bad that the whole system collapses. but
These small hikes are essential to life. They prove that the solution is sound.
And the answer. Malcolm never understood that."

"Are you sure he doesn't understand that? It seems obvious what the difference between
Living and not-"

"Look," Arnold said. "Here's the evidence." He pointed to the cameras.

"In less than an hour," he said, "the whole park will be back on track. One thing left for me
Phones obviously. For some reason they still appear. But everything else will work.
And that’s not science. That's true."


The needle was inserted into the throat and Harding injected the drug with Medrine.
The female dryosaur as she lay beside him on the ground. And immediately the animal began to recover.
He growls and taps his long hind legs.

"Get back, everyone," Harold said as he ran off. "Come back."

The dinosaur grinned and crossed his leg and stood limp. She shook her head and looked
People were standing in the stone lights.

"It's growing," Hammond said, concerned.

"Of course," Harold said. "It stops."

Dresaurus hesitated, then slowly walked across the clearing into the distant views.

"Why isn't he flying?"

"He will," Harold said. "It'll take about an hour to fully heal. Normal." He turned
Back to the car. "Alright boys, let's go confront Stego."


Muldoon watched as the last stick hit the ground. The lines were drawn.
taut, and the stem of the protocarpus was distinctly raised. Muldoon could see black bands;
on the silver wall where the approach was taken. At the bottom of the salt, a lot of concrete.
The insulators were damaged. They had to be replaced. But before that, Arnold
He should have covered all the walls.

"Cote. This is Mildred. We're ready to start getting ready." "all

Right," Arnold said. "Lock up now."

Muldoon glanced at his watch. Somewhere in the distance, he heard faint screaming. It sounds
Like whales, but he knew they were dolphins. He goes to Ramn and says let’s finish this.
above. | You want to get to other parts of the wall."


An hour passed. Donald Gennaro watched the glowing map from the control room as dots and
The numbers flashed and changed. "What's going on now?"

Arnold worked in Kansas. "I'm trying to get phone numbers. So we can call
Malcolm."

"No, | I mean out there."

Arnold looked up at the plate. "Looks like they're running out of animals and both
topics. as | I told you the park was in the barracks. If not for Malcolm’s catastrophic effects. You know,
There are three such areas. . . ."

"Arnold." It was Muldoon’s voice.

"Yes?"

"Did you see that bloody thing?"

"Just a minute."

Through an observer, Genaro saw a distant shadow below over a field of grass, darkening.
wind. There was a building some distance away from the street. "That's the Sarpoda training room,"
Arnold explained. "It's one of the most important things we use in appliances, food storage, and so on."
We have them all around the park, in all the paddocks." Video footage on TV
Flying. "Now we're turning the camera around to look at the wall..."

Gennaro saw the wall gleaming in the iron light. One section is taken care of;
He was beaten. Mildred Jeep and staff were present.


"Huh," Arnold said. "Looks like Rex got into the Sauropod paddock."

Mildred said, "Good food tonight."

"We have to get him out of there," Arnold said.

"With what?" Mildred said. "We don't have anything to work with at Rex. I'm fixing this wall, but I
You cannot enter until daylight.

"She doesn't like it, Hammond."

"We'll talk about it when | we get back," Mildred said.


"How many sharks kill sharks?" Hammond said as he walked around the control room.

"Probably only one," Harold said. "Sauropods are bigger, rex can only survive one kill
Many days."

“We need to get out before tonight,” Hammond said.

Mildred shook her head. "I won't be in there until daylight."

Hammond was rising to his feet, as he did whenever he
pain. "Did you forget you work for me?"

"No, Mr. Hammond, I don't mind. But that's an old Tyransaurus outside. How
Do you want to find it?"

"We have weapons."

"We have stun guns that are 20 grains," Muldoon said. "It's good for an animal that
It weighs four or five hundred pounds. It weighs eight pounds. He wouldn't mind."

"You ordered a powerful weapon..."

"|Ordered three big guns, Mr. Hammond, but you cut off the order, so we only got the stock
one. And it came out. Nedra picked it up when he left."

"That was awful. Who let that happen?"

"Nedry is not my problem, Mr. Hammond," Muldoon said.

Hammond said, "You're saying that as of this moment, there's no way to
Tyransaurus?"

“That’s exactly what I’m saying,” Muldoon said.

"That's ridiculous," Hammond said.

"It's your park, Mr. Hammond. You didn't want anyone to be able to abuse your property
Dinosaurs. Well, now you’ve got Rex with Sharpada and you have nothing to worry about
Maybe." He left the room.

"Just a minute," Hammond said, hurrying after him. Genaro stared at the screens, and
Hearing the voice outside in the corridor, he said to Arnold, "|I don't think you know.
You're still in charge of the park, after all."

"Don't kid yourself," Arnold said, lighting another cigarette. "We have a park. It's going to look like this."
Two hours. We might destroy a couple of dinosaurs before we get Rex out of there, but rest assured
We have my park."


eat


Grant woke up to a dull flicker, followed by a mechanical sound. He opened the door.
His eyes caught a glimpse of a barrier passing in front of him on a street towards the ceiling. two
Many blessings followed. Then the game stopped as it started, and the trash
The house was silent again.

Grant sighed. He stretched drowsily, wincing in pain, and sat up.

Bright yellow light came through the windows. The next morning: he slept all night!
He checked his watch quickly: 5am.
Examine the mind. She rolled onto her back and cried. His head was pounding and his body ached as he did.
They were lost. He heard a noise around the corner, like a wheel loose. and
Then Lex smiles.

Grant stood slowly and looked around the room. Now that the sun was bright, he could see
Some home care, lots of herbs and tools. He saw dust on the wall.
Metal box and iconic sign: Sauropod Conservation Bldg (04). This should be
sauropod Paddock, as expected. He opens the trunk and sees the phone, but when he does.
He picked up the receiver and apparently the phones were still not working.


"Taste your food," Lake would say. "Don't be a pig, Ralph."

Grant walked around the corner and found Lex in the doorway of the office, holding a hand through a rope
The beast outside that looks like a giant pink pig screaming at Grant
hear. He was a triplet baby, the size of a horse. There was no needle in the baby.
On its skull, there is only a curved bone behind the soft eyes. He poked his nose through the bars.
Over to Lex, his eyes watched her as she handed him more straw.

"That's better," Leake said. "There's plenty of herbs, don't worry." He stroked the baby's head.
"You like herbs, don't you, Ralph?"

Lex turned to see him.

"This is Ralph," Lex said. "He's my friend. He likes weed."

Grant took a step back and stood, grimacing. "You're beautiful

Vicious," Leake said.

"|I'm so sorry."

"Tim, too. He's got a swollen nose."

"Where's Tim?"

"He's sleeping," she said. "You want to help me feed Ralph?"

The baby Triceratop looked at Grant. Grass fell from both sides of his mouth.
The bottom as it gets confusing.

"He's a voracious eater," Leake said, "and he's very hungry."

The child finishes chewing and smoothes his lips. He opened his mouth and waited for more. grant
He could see the sharp teeth and the upper jaw like a cherry.

"Okay, just a minute," Lex said, clearing more trash out of the street, "actually,
Ralph," she said, "you feel that your mother never left you."

"Why is he named Ralph?"

"Because he's like Ralph. At school."

Grant reached over and touched the skin of his neck lightly.

"Well, you can touch it," Leake said. "He loves it when you hold him, doesn't he, Ralph?"

His skin was dry and warm, the shape of a football. Ralph shouted something like.
Grant swallowed. Inside the bars, his heavy tail was swinging back and forth with pleasure.

"It's very interesting." Ralph watched Lex walk over to Grant as he ate and showed no signs of fear.
He reminds Grant that dinosaurs don’t just have answers for humans. "maybe | may go
It is," Leake said.

"We shouldn't."

"|It makes me smile," Leake said. "It'll be fun to ride a dinosaur."

Grant looked at the ribbons past the animal and into the open fields at the sauropods. I was
It’s getting lighter by the minute. He needs to go outside mentally and make a move
sensors in the upper area. After all, it may take the people in the control room an hour to
Here to it. And he didn’t like the idea of ​​phones. . . .

He heard a deep growl, like the growl of a big horse, and the boy was surprised.
They were worried. He tried to pull his head through the bars, but was caught in the side.
frill, and cried out in terror.

The sunrise came again. It was closer this time.

Ralph got up on his hind legs nervously from between the ropes and turned his head.
Back and forth, touching the bars.

"Ralph, calm down," Lex said.

"Let go," Grant said. He reached for Ralph's head and leaned in and patted it.
Next to and behind the animal. The gun swelled and the boy fell out of the gun and disappeared.
balancing and flopping next to it. So the baby closed in on the shadow and a big foot came
into view, near the top of the tree. The foot had five claws like those of an elephant.

Ralph looked up and growled. A skull descended into view: six feet long and three long.
A white spot, one above each of the big eyes, and a smaller one at the tip of the nose. it
was a complete Throshertop. The monster looked at Lex and Grant, slowly blinked, then
He turned to Ralph. A tongue stuck out and caressed the baby. cried Ralph and
He twisted his big toe around excitedly.

"Is that his mother?" Lex said .

"Looks like it," Grant said.


"Should we also feed the mother?" Lex said.

But the mother Thrushtorp kept nudging Ralph with her nose and squeezing the baby
Barves.

"Don't think."

The boy turned away from the bars and left. Occasionally, there was grandmother.
her son, guiding her as they both walked out of the bathroom.

"Good morning, Ralph," Leica said, shaking hands. Tim stepped out of the shadow of the building.

"Tells you what," Grant said. "I'm going to go up the hill and adjust the motion sensors so they don't
Feel free to come get us. You two stay here and wait for me."

"No," Lex said.

"Why? Stay here. It's safe here."

"You're not leaving us," he said. "No, Timmy?"

"Right," Tim said.

"Okay," Grant said.

They ran into the streets and outside.


This was before the fall.

The air was warm and humid, and the sky was pink and purple. The white mist clings.
ground. Somewhere along the line, they see a mother Thrustertop and baby walking up the stairs,
Large eggs of Hadrosaurus feed on the leaves of trees along the lakeshore.

Some Hadrosaurs stood up to their necks in water. They bowed their heads and drank.
meeting their own thoughts in calm water. Then they looked up again, their heads spinning.
At the water's edge a child got out, screamed, and ran backwards towards the
The adults watched with a blank expression.

Further south, other Hadrosaurs were feeding on lower vegetation. Sometimes they were raised
On their hind legs, place their front paws on the branches so they can reach the leaves.
The upper branches. And in the distance, above the trees, was a large Apatosaurus, small-headed
wrapped around the long neck. The place was peaceful, Grant found himself thinking nothing
risk.

"Yes!" Lex yelled and stepped closer. Two giant red bats with six-foot-tall camouflaged past.
they. "What was that?"

"Scorpions," he said. "Jurassic was the age of insects." "do

They crash?" Leake said.

"|Don't think about it," said Grant.

Tim held out his instrument. A dragon turned on the light. He could feel the weight of the big thing.
insect.

"He's going to bite you," Lex warned.

But the ball gradually replaced its white wings, and then, when Tim
He waved his hand and jumped again.

"Which way are we going?" Lex said.

"there."

They started walking across the court. They came upon a black box mounted on a heavy metal railing.
tripod, the first motion sensors. Grant stopped and changed his group in front of him and
But nothing happened. If the phones aren’t working, maybe the sensors aren’t working either.
"We'll see another one," he said, pointing around. Somewhere in the distance they heard
The scream of a large animal.


"Ah, hell," Arnold said. "I can't find it." She took a sip of coffee and watched the TV with her eyes closed.
He had removed all TV footage from the internet. In the control room, he was looking for a computer.
Code. He was tired; He worked twelve-hour days. He turned to Wu, who was
from the lab.

"What did you find?"

"The phones are still out. I can't get them back. | I think Nedry did something with the phones."

Wu picked up a phone and heard screaming. "It's like a modem."

"But that's not it," Arnold said. Because | he descended into the basement and covered everything.
Modems. "What you're hearing is white noise, which sounds like a modem transmitting."


"So the phones are off?"

"Basically, yes. Nedry has brought them too close. He's put some sort of closure."
Software Code, and System | I can't find it, because | issued a reset command that deleted a portion of the
Program lines. But the shutdown command for phones seems to be installed.
Computer memory.”

Wu raised his hand. "So? Just fix it: shut down the computer and you'll erase the memory.

"I've never done that before," Arnold said. "And I can't do that. Maybe all the possibilities are
Go back to the beginning-but maybe without them. I’m not a computer scientist and neither are you. not
really. And with the phone unlocked, we can't talk to anyone who lives there."

"If the process is RAM-resident, it won't show up in the code. You can free up some RAM and
You’ve been looking for that, but you don’t know what you’re looking for. | Thinking that all you can do is be creative."

Gennaro entered. "We still don't have a phone."

"We're working on it."

"You've been working on him since midnight. And Malcolm's serious. He needs therapy
attention."

"That means I need to shut down," Arnold said. "| I can't believe everything can be returned."

Genaro said, "Look. There's a sick man in this room. He needs a doctor or he's going to die. You."
You can’t call a doctor unless you have a phone. At least four have already died. now,
Turn off the phones and use the phones!"

Arnold hesitated.

"good?" Gennaro said.

"Okay, that's it... Security systems won't let the computer shut down, and-"

"So kill the security measures! You can't fathom in your head that he's going to
Dying unless he gets help?"

"Okay," Arnold said.

He got up and walked over to the main panel. He opened the doors and turned the knob
latches on secure straps. He released them one by one. "You asked for it,"
Arnold said. "And you understand."

He threw the key fob.

The control room was dark. All the observers were black, and the three men stood in the darkness.

"How long do we have to wait?" Gennaro said. "Thirty seconds," Arnold said.


"Pi!" "They're passing the test," Leake said.

"what?" Grant said.

"That smell!" Lex said. "It smells like abandoned garbage."

Grant hesitated. He looked across the field toward the tall trees, looking for movement. he
He didn’t see anything. There was no wind to move the branches. It was peaceful and quiet.
Early in the morning. "I suppose it's your imagination," he said.

"It's not-."

Then he heard the beeping sound. He came from the group of guards behind him.
they. First, one animal, then another, and another, until all the animals were screaming
cry. The ducks were desperate, twirling and twirling as they quickly came out of the water to nurse their young.
Others to protect them. . . .

They smell it, too, Grant thought.

With a shout, Tyransaurus burst into the trees, thirty yards away, near the lion. He ran away.
Taking to the field with big steps. He ignored them and turned to the weeds.
Hadrosaurs.

"| I told you!" Lexi shouted. "Nobody's listening to me!"

In the distance ducks were buzzing and running. Grant could feel an earthquake.
under his feet. "Hey, kids!" He grabbed Leaky, lifted his body off the ground, and ran with
Tim likes grass. He saw a tyransaurus on the beach, flying away.
hadrosaurs, which flapped their massive tails in defense and flew up to breed and reproduce. She heard
The rustling of leaves and trees, as he watched, the ducks were charging.


Arnold looked at his watch, Arnold looked at his watch. Thirty seconds. The idea should be
Deleted now. He turned the main power switch back on.

Nothing happened.

Arnold's stomach dropped. He turned the shutter off, then turned it back on again. Yet nothing happened. he
He has sweat in his eyes.

"What's wrong?" Gennaro said.

"Oh, hell," Arnold said. Then remember you need to turn on the security switch.
Before restarting the power. He breached the three secures and closed them again with this.
Cover covers. Then he held his breath and performed a powerful surge.

The city lights went on. that

The computer chimed. screens;

Think.

"Thank God," Arnold said. He hurried to the head warden. There were sign lines.
screen:


Gennaro reaches for the phone, but it’s dead. No hopeful screams this time - nothing at all.
"What is this?"

"Give me a second," Arnold said. "After saving, all system functions must be restarted."
line manually." Soon he went back to work.

"Why the hand?" Gennaro said.

"Will you let me work for Jesus?"

Wu said, "The system is never designed to ever be closed. So if it's closed, it feels
There is a problem somewhere. requires you to initialize everything manually, otherwise, with
Somewhere along the line, the system would boot up, exit, reboot, and exit.
Again, in an infinite circle.”

All right," Arnold said. "We're going."

Genaro picked up the phone and started dialing, and was surprised.

"Jesus, you looked at her," he said. He pointed to a video monitor.

But Arnold wasn't listening, he was looking at the map where the dots were
the lagoon had begun to move in an orderly fashion. It moves quickly, in a kind of spiral.

"What's going on?" Gennaro said.

"Ducks," Arnold said quietly. "They made a sign."


The ducks moved with amazing speed, their large bodies packed tightly together;
And yell, the kids scream and try to stay a foot away. The animals raised the big animal.
Cloud of yellow dust. Grant couldn't see the tyrant.

The ducks were running towards them.

Still holding onto Lex, he and Tim ran towards a rock that was riddled with large shells. They ran away .
It’s hard, they can feel the ground shaking beneath their feet. As the animals approached, the sound of
It hurts the ear like the sound of planes at an airport. He filled the air and hurt their ears. Lexi was screaming.
Something, however, she couldn't hear his voice and they kept bouncing off the rocks,
Animals closed in around them.

Grant had the largest legs of the first Hadrosaurus, surpassing the weight of any other animal
Five tons, then they were so surrounded by clouds that he couldn’t see anything. He was
The display of huge bodies, giant legs, screams of pain as animals are being dragged and
circular. A duck kicked a stone and rolled in front of them, then left the field.

Through the thick dust clouds, they could see nothing beyond the rocks. They are attached.
Listen to the shrieks and cries of the South. Lexi signed up.
His fingers are on Grant’s shoulders.

Another Henderson slammed its massive tail against the rocks, leaving a trail of hot blood. grant
He waited until the sound of fighting moved to the left, then connected with the children.
Start climbing the big tree. They climbed up quickly, grabbing at the branches like animals
They surrounded them in dust. They walked about twenty feet, and then Lex grabbed Grant.


And he refused to go far. Tim was also exhausted, and Grant thought they were too big. through
Dust, they could see the broad backs of the animals below as they streamed.
Grant sat back on the hardwood bark, coughing into the dust and closing his eyes.
And to hold.


Arnold fixed the camera as the animals walked away. The dust gradually cleared. He saw that .
The hadrosaurs were passing by and the tyrannosaurs were stopping running, which could mean
He had committed a murder. Samson was now near the lagoon. Arnold looked at the video camera.
"Muldoon better get out there and see how bad it is," he said.

"I'll get it," Gennard said and left the room.


park


And that it is like a fire in a fireplace. Something warm and wet caressed Grant’s thigh.
He opened his eyes and saw a huge tower of skulls. The head was recessed into a plated door.
Like a duck tail. The eyes from the top of the duck plate were smooth and soft as
of the cow. The door to the duck opened and Grant sat chewing on limbs. he
He saw large flat teeth on inspection. Hot lips touched her thigh again and the animal shivered.

The duck-like Hadrosaurus. It was amazing to see him up close. He was not afraid; all
Some species of dinosaur were herbivores and this one worked like a cow. even
Despite its size, the demeanor was calm and peaceful, and Grant was not intimidated by it. It remained
From where he was on the tree branch, he dared her to move and watched her eat.

What surprised Grant was that he had some ownership over the creature:
It was probably Mysore, from Late Cretaceous Montana. and John Horner, grant of
He was the first to define species. Myshaur had a curved lip, which made
The look of a smile. Its name means good mother joke, it was thought to protect the maiasaurs.
Their eggs until the babies are born and able to take care of themselves.

Grant heard a crack and the big skull jerked. He moved to see.
The baby Hadrosor is beaten around the feet of the adult. The baby was dark and black.
places. The old man put his head down and waited, motionless, for the boy to get up.
It rests its hind legs and front feet on its mother's throat and eats the twigs.
from near the river mouth.

The mother waits patiently until her baby runs out of food and falls all over the
Four more, and then the big skull came back up towards Grant.

The Hadrosaurus continued feeding just a few meters away. Grant took a long look at the two.
airholes at the top of the plate. The dinosaur didn’t seem to be able to smell Grant. And even
Although the left eye stared at him for some reason, Henderson didn't respond to him.

He remembered seeing her the night before. Grant insisted.
About an experiment.

He's coughing.

Immediately Hadrosaur was frozen, and suddenly the huge head was no longer chewing jaws. Only
Eye moved around, looking for the source of the sound. Then, after a while, when it seemed like
There was no danger, the animal began to forget.

Strange, Grant thought.

Sitting in his arms, Lex opened his eyes and said, "Hey, what's that?"

Hadrosaurus barked angrily, the loud Portuguese that so impressed Lexus that he could
He fell out of the tree. Hadrazah pulled his head back from the branch and put his head back down and spoke again.

"Don't be mad," Tim said from the branch above.

The boy screamed and ran at his mother's feet away from Hadrozor.
tree. The mother raised her head and asked at the tree trunk, Grant and .
Lex was sitting up. A dinosaur has a funny look on its smiling lips.

"Is he dumb?" Lex said.

"No," Grant said. "You just surprised him."

"Well," Lex said, "Is he gonna let us get wet or what?"

Hadrozor took ten steps back from the tree. She knocked again. Grant had
impression He was trying to intimidate them. But apparently Kanba didn't know that.


What to do. She found it confusing and uncomfortable. They waited in silence for a minute or so.
the hadrosaur approached the tree branch once more, eyes twitching in anticipation. Obviously, he’s going to
Start eating.

"Forget it," Lex said. "I'm not staying here." He started climbing the tree branches. along
Moving, Hadrosaur trumpeted a new warning.

Grant was awesome. He thought he couldn’t see us if we didn’t move. and a minute later
It’s almost forgotten that we’re here. This was like another classic example of Tyransaurus
Amphibian optical cortex. Studies of frogs have shown that aquifers are not just moving objects, e.g.
Insects. If something doesn't move, they don't see it. It was like the same thing .
Dinosaurs.

Anyway, it seems that Mayasaurus has now found these strange creatures climbing the tree
It’s very heartwarming. He beat his son in his last house and slowly walked away. It saved time.
Once, and look at them and move on.

They reached the bottom. Lex shook his head. Both kids were covered in goodies
dirty. All around them the grass was mown. There were blood stains and cum
smell.

Grant looked at his watch. "Well, let's go kids," he said.

"I'm not," Leake said. "I don't walk there anymore."

"We should."

"why?"

"Surely," Grant said, "we should tell them about the island. That they can't seem to see us."
On motion sensors, we have to go all the way on our own. That's the only way."

"Why can't we take the boat?" Tim said.

"What group?"

Tim pointed to the low boarded maintenance house where they had spent so much time.
night. He was twenty yards from the edge of the toilet. "| I saw a ship over there," he said.

Grant immediately realized the benefits. Now it’s about one o’clock in the morning. they
There was at least eight miles to go. If they could get the boat to the other side of the river, they’d have more
Progress is faster than on Earth. "Let's do it," Grant said.


Arnold hit video search mode and watched as monitors began scanning everywhere.
park, with pictures changing every two seconds. Watching it was tiring, but it was fast.
Sal finds Nedry’s Jeep and Muldoon is determined to do so. It was released with
Genaro looked around at the people, but now it was daytime and he wanted to find the car. he
He wanted weapons.

His phone rang. "Mr. Arnold, may I have something to say to you, please?" it

It was Hammond. It sounded like the word of God.

"Do you want to come here, Mr. Hammond?"

"No, Mr. Arnold," Hammond said. "Come with me. I'm in the genetic lab with Dr. Wu. We're
I’m waiting for you.”

Arnold took a deep breath and turned away from the cameras.


Grant was shot inside the home’s vicious private parts. He skipped five gallons.
Four weed killers, lawn mowers, Jeep flat tires, storm tires;
Hundreds of pounds of garbage bags, red steel kettles, empty motor oil bottles, work
Lights and wiring.

"| You didn't see any clouds."

"Keep going."

cement bags, lengths of copper pipe, green .. . Two plastic boats hanging from ropes.
Wall Environment.

"All right," he said, "but where's the ship?" "it

Must be here somewhere,” Tim said.

"You've never seen a boat?"

"No, | I just thought he was here."


Among Grant’s dirty hunts, he found no key. But he found a set of plans and turned around and
Hanging in a metal cabinet on the wall, he posted the plans.
to the ground, and a spider appears. He looked at them for a long moment.

"I'm hungry... .""Justa

minutes."

These were detailed maps of the main parts of the island where they were now located.
As a result, the valley narrowed into the river they once saw, which turned into
to the north . . . As far as the birds are concerned. . . and within half a mile of the launch site.

He filled the books. How can we get to the lodge? According to statistics, there
It must have been a door in the back of the house they were in. Grant looked up and saw it and lowered it.
within the back wall environment. The gate was big enough for a car. When he opened the door, he saw a
Run down towards the lake. The road was buried underground so it was impossible
Light from above. That should be another line of work. And he goes to the edge of the ship by the lake.
And the most obvious on the ship was RAFT STORAGE.

"Hey," Tim said, "check this out." He held out a metal case to Grant.

Opening it, Grant finds a compressed air rifle and a cloth clip that catches bullets. It was six.
darts in all, every one as thick as his thumb. The designation is MORO-709.

"Good job Timmy." He strapped the belt around his shoulder to his gun tucked into his pants.

"Is it a smoking gun?"

"I'd say so."

"How's grandpa?" Lex said.

"I think it's at the bottom of the hill," Grant said. They started down the road. Grant took the boat he had to.
shoulder. "I hope this is a big boat," Lex said, "because | I can't swim."

"Don't worry," he said.

"Maybe we can catch a fish," he said.

They were walking along the road with water rising on either side of them.
They heard a noise, but Grant couldn't figure out where it was coming from.

"Are you sure there's a cave down here?" Lex said, turning his nose up.

"Maybe," Grant said.

The sound of mourning continued as they walked, but they also heard a rustle.
The sound in the When they reached the end of the road, at the end of the little street,
Grant was frozen in pride.

There was Tyransaurus there.

She was sitting in the shade of a tree with her back legs spread out in front of her. His eyes were
It was open but only the tip was moving;
noise. The sound came from the clouds of water that surrounded him as they dried onto his face and
Blown lips and bloody teeth and the red skin of a killed Hadrosaurus lying next to it behind him.
Thirmansaurus.

Tiranasara was divided into twenty districts. Grant was sure he saw it, but
The big animal didn’t answer. He just sat there. It took her a moment to realize: Tyransaurus had
asleep. I sat up, but I fell asleep.

He gestured for Tim and Leica to stay where they were. Grant walked slowly forward.
dock, in full view of the tyrannosaur. The old animal continued to sleep, slowly stirring.

Near the end of the port, the tree was painted green to blend in with the foliage. grant
He opened the door and looked inside. It was a half-dozen orange guilty pleas being eaten on it.
wall, several shelves, some rope, and two cubes of mana sitting
below. The cables were attached with a clamp plate.

Rafts.

He turned back to Lex. it

mouthed: No sun, he shook his head.

Yes.

Tyransaurus raised his hand to rub the teeth around his nose. But otherwise
He didn’t move. Grant pulled a cube from the mound. It was surprisingly heavy. he
Removed the pipes, and found the cylindrical phenomenon. With a loud scream, the machine began to expand, and
Then with the hissy-vape! It opened onto the deck. They were loud.
ears.


Grant turned sharply, looking up at the dinosaur.

Tyransaurus snorted and snorted. He started to move. Grant tried to run, but
The creature shifted and then perched itself on the tree trunk and stood tall.
Scream, scream.

Lex frowned and waved his hand in front of his face.

Grant was burnt for free for a change. He dragged the kitchen across the dock. it
It fell into the water with a loud splash.

The dinosaur continued to sleep.

Grant tied the boat to the dock, returned to the cabin and removed two life preservers. he
Put them in the bowl, then reach out and pull the kids out of the bowl.

Blacking out in fear, Lex retracted his hand, no, he did.

gestured: Yes.

Tyransavari continued to sleep.

Grant poked him in the air with a finger. Lex came over quietly, and she gestured to him.
getting into the raft; Then Tim came in and they both put on their shirts. Grant came in and jumped.
The boat drifts silently out of the bay. Grant picked up his paddles and put them on.
ship. They pulled away from the other side of the mountain.

Lex sat down and breathed heavily in relief. Then he felt as if he had left, and he thanked
mouth. His body shook, with little noises: he was trying to cough.

He was always diagnosed at the worst times!

"Lex," Tim growled, turning back towards the river.

He shook his head violently and pointed at his throat. She knew what he meant: a change.
His voice. All she needs is a drink of water. Grant was rowing, and Tim leaned on him.
He reached into the pool and held her hand towards him.

Lex coughed loudly and burst out. To Tim's ears, the sound bounced off the water like a
Guns.

Tyransaurus smiled lazily and rubbed the back of his head with his hind legs like a dog. it
She nodded again. She was heavy after a big meal and would slowly get up.

Inside the ship, Lex was making a small gagging noise. “Lex;

Shut up!" Tim said.

"| I can't help it," he murmured, then coughed again. Grant worked the boat to move the boat.
He forced his way into the middle of the lake.

On the beach, Tyransaurus got back to his feet.

"| I can't wait, Tim!" Lexi cried out loudly. "I couldn't help it!"

"Shhh!"

Grant was steering the boat as fast as he could.

"It's okay anyway," she said. "We're very careful. She can't swim.

"Of course she can swim, you idiot!" Tim yelled. On the beach, Tiranapur
He got out of the boat and jumped into the water. He followed them into the lake.

"Well, how is he supposed to | know?" she said.

"Everyone knows turkeys can swim! It's in all the books! Anyway, all mammals can swim!"

"Snakes can't."

"Of course death can. You idiot!"

"Sit down," Grant said. "Grab something!" Grant was looking at Tyransaurus.
Observing how an animal swims. Tyransaurus was now submerged in water, but he could
Its huge head lifted above the ground, and Grant realized that the animal could not swim, and that was it.
in walking, because after a while only the eyes and nose from the top of the head appear
above. At that time it looked like a duck and swam like a duck, changing its shape
The tail ebbs and flows, and the water churns behind it. Behind the head, Grant was the head
the back, and the thighs were at full length, as if breaking the brain occasionally.

He thought as happily as a crocodile. The biggest crab in the world.

"I'm so sorry, Dr. Grant!" Lex yelled. "I didn't want him!"

Grant glanced over his shoulder. Here the lake was no more than a hundred meters wide.
And they were getting to the middle. If it is allowed, the water level will constantly decrease.
Tyransaurus can walk again and is fast in shallow water. grant
He turned the boat around and started sailing south.


"what are you doing?"

The Tyrannosaurus was now only a few yards away. Grant could hear his ragged breathing.
As it gets closer. Grant looked at the pads in his hands, but they were blank.
All weapons.

Tyransaurus threw his head back and opened his lips, showing sharp teeth.
and then, with a burst of feverish muscle, he leaped forward towards the ship, the wheel unfastened;
The big head bounces down, and the water vibrates over the top of the bridge.

The Tyrannosaurus descended below the lower one, leaving the glands behind. The lake was still there. Lex
He gripped the gun and looked back.

"Is it in your nose?"

"No," Grant said. He saw bubbles - then a small puff moving towards the mountain -

"Attention!" he cried as he lifted his head from under the rubber, bent the boat and lifted it up.
He's in the air, spinning them madly before slamming back down.

"Do something!" Alex shouted. "Do something!"

Grant removed the air piston from his belt. It looked so small in his hands, but it was there
Maybe if he killed the animal at a safe distance from the eye or nose.

Tyransaurus appeared at the side of the mountain, opened his lips and roared. Grant is targeted and
expel. The shield flashed in the light and struck the trunk. Tyransaurus shook his head.
And scream again.

Suddenly, they heard a scream coming from the water towards them.

As a result, Grant spotted the young T-Rex on the shore and focused on the slain sauropod.
He claims that the murder is his. The young man cut up the body, then lifted the head.
she screamed. The Great Tyrannosaurus saw it too, and the answer was the same - it went back to
Save the kill and swim towards the shore.

"It's going!" Lex yelled and slapped his hands. "Going on! Nh-n-n-n-
No߹ Stupid dinosaur!

From the shore, the young man shouted defiantly. Enraged, the Great Tyransaurus burst out
lagoon at full speed, with water pouring out of its main body and rushing up the hill past the shoreline.
The young man dropped his head and ran away, his jaw full of precious meat.

The dragon gave chase, ran past the dead monkey-foot, and disappeared over the mountain. they
She heard his last threatening echo.
lagoon, towards the river.

Exhausted from the paddling, Grant collapsed and tightened his chest. He could barely catch his breath.
He was in heaven on his knees.

"Are you alright, Dr. Grant?" Lex asked.

"From now on, what are you going to | Shall I tell you?"

'Oh-kay, " she cheered, as if she had just asked the dumbest question in the world.
He held his hand in the water for a moment. "You dropped the boat," he said.

"I'm tired," Grant said.

"So how are we still going?"

Grant sat down. It was good. The ship was moving slowly north. "Now there must be." that
The tube was taking them north to the hotel. He looked at his watch and was surprised.
Fifteen minutes past seven. Only fifteen minutes had passed since he was checked out.
His watch. It was like two hours.

Grant put it back on the tape and closed his eyes and went to sleep.


Fifth iteration.


"The system flaws will get worse now."
Ian Malcolm
search


Genaro sat in the jeep and listened to the sound of the sea lions, staring at the tall palm tree.
The trees are shaking with heat. He was surprised by what looked like a battlefield: grass was.
It’s a hundred meters in each direction. One large palm tree collapsed.
ground. There was a large pool of blood in the grass and on the rock from their
right.

Sitting down next to him, Mildred said "No doubt about it. Rex was in the middle of a Hadrosaurus." he
He took another sip of whiskey and capped the bottle. "It's a lot of resources," he said.

They waited and watched.

Gennaro drummed his fingers on the table. "What are we waiting for?"

The mayor did not immediately respond. "There's Rex out there somewhere," she said, glaring
Landscape in the morning sun. "And we don't have any weapons that matter."

"We're in the jeep."

"Oh, he can run in the Jeep, Mr. Gennard," Mildred shook her head. "When we leave
This way and towards open ground the most we can do in four points is thirty-four miles
One hour. It drives us down. It's no problem." Mud shrugged. "But | I don't see much
I’m going there now. Ready to survive the risk?"

"Sure," Genaro said.

Muldoon started the engine, and with a sudden roar, two small Otniellia
Grass made in front. Muldoon parked the car. He drove in a wide circle.
He found the hole and went inside and ran through some tunnels to the end
He came to a place in the field where the younger Othniels were. Then he got out and walked .
Continue through the grass, away from the jeep. When he stopped, a heavy mud cloud rose in the air.

"What is that?" Gennaro called out.

"Bring the radio," Mud said.

Genaro got out of the Jeep and accelerated forward. Even from afar, he could
Sour-sour smell that putrefies quickly. He saw something black in the grass with blood on it, legs
askew.

"Son of Hadrosaurus," Mildred said, turning to Suri. "Everybody was walking.
And the baby split open and a T-rex attacked it."

"How do you know?" Gennaro said. The meat was shredded by several pieces.

"You can tell by the bounce," Mildred said. "See those white things in the grass?"
It’s the Hadro Spore. Uric acid makes it white. But you look over there"-he pointed to a large mountain.
He lifts his shoulders into the grass-"That's tyrannosaur spoor."

"How do you know Tyrus didn't come later?"

"Kind of a legacy," Mildred said. "See those little ones?" He pointed at the bird.
"Those are from Autism. These scratches didn't bleed. They're post-mortems from deer."
Otis did. But Hadro fell with a chip in his throat - you see the big cut
There, over the shoulder, that's the T-rex, no question."

Genaro focused on the corpse, staring intently at its feet.
Not true. Next to him, Muldoon turned on his radio. "retention. "

"Yeah," John Arnold said over the radio.


"We found another Hadra dead. Juvenile." Muldoon crouched among the leaves and watched.
The skin on the bottom of the right foot. There was a number stamped, "Text is number HD/09."

The radio crackled. "I got something for you," Arnold said.

"Oh? What's that?"

"| Found Nedra."


The Jeep drove through palm trees on the eastbound side of the narrow road.
The career path, which leads to forestry. It was hot in this part of the park and very bushy.
and fetid around them. Muldoon was looking at Gibb's computer monitor, which now
He displayed a map of the resort with social networking sites. "They got it on remote video," she said
said. "Scot 1104 is up front."

Farther down the road, Gennaro saw a rock barrier, a jeep parked beside it. "he
He must have taken the wrong route," Muldon said. "Little fellow."

"What did he take?" Gennaro asked.

"Wu said fifteen young. Do you know what that means?"

Genaro shook his head.

"Somewhere between two and ten million," Mildred said. She shook her head. "Big sacks."

When they got closer, Janrod saw the body lying next to the car. The body was opaque and
Green – but then the green shapes are scattered, as the Jeep is being built.

"Comps," Muldoon said. "The Commisers got it,"

Twelve Prochomygnathidae , small animals larger than ducks, stand out .
In the woods, shouting for joy, the men got out of the car.

Dennis Nedry lay on his back, his face red and swollen. The mice are gone.
Open mouth and heavy tongue. His body was damaged - torn ribs, one
foot caught to pass. Genaro turned quickly, looking at the focused dwarves.
Their hind legs stretched out a bit, and they looked curiously at the men. There were dinosaurs.
Five fingers, he noticed. They rubbed their faces and chins and gave them the scarecrow.
Best Which-

"I curse," Mildred said. "There was no time for a committee."

"what?"

Mildred was shaking her head. "See those marks? On his shirt and face? You smell him."
Smells like old dried up vomit?"

Genaro rolled his eyes. He smelled it.

“It’s sweaty,” Muldoon said. "Dilophosares are gone. You see the damage
corneas, all that red. To the eyes it is painful but not fatal. You have about two hours to wash
Out with the antennas; We keep it all around the park whenever possible. That it doesn't matter if this
bastard. They blinded it and then cut it right down the middle, not the right way. There may be
There are bugs in the world, after all."

procompsognatbids screamed and jumped up and down as Genora opened the back door
From the door remove a gray metal pipe and a steel box. "It's all still there," he said. he
He handed two dark pills to Gennaro.

"What is this?" Gennaro said.

"The way they are," Muldon said. "Rockets." When Genaro returned, he said;
You don't want to step into something."

Genaro caressed my foot over Nedry's body. Muldoon took the tube and went to the other Jeep;
and put it in the back. He climbed into the back of the car. "Let's go."

"How's she?" Genaro said, pointing to the body.

"How's she?" Mildred said. "We have things to do." He started the car. I'm looking.
In the background, Genaro sees the cars beginning to feed. One flew up and landed on Nedra’s shoulder.
He opened his mouth and chewed the flesh of his nose.


The forest cover has decreased. The beaches on both sides were closed so that no trees or leaves were allowed.
These meet at the top and block out the sun. Tim heard the birds chirping and he
Small dinosaurs darted among the trees. But mostly it was quiet, the air warm;
Under a canopy of trees.

Grant looked at his watch. It was eight o’clock.


They walked peacefully through the light. If so, it seems like they
It's getting faster than before. You had just woken up and Grant was lying on his back staring at the trees.
Top of the head. By the way, he saw her waking up.

"Hey, what are you doing?" she said.

"Do you think we can eat these fruits?" He pointed to the trees. Some called
The branches were too hard to touch. Tim saw bright red berries on the branches.

"No," Grant said.

"Why? Those little dinosaurs eat them." He pointed out the tiny dinosaurs running
Its branches.

"No, Lexi."

He was happy, dissatisfied with his strength. "| I wish my father were here," she said. "Always
He knows what he's doing."

"What are you talking about?" Tim said. "He never knows what he's doing."

"Yeah, she does," he sighed. Lex watched the trees as they passed, their massive roots swaying
Towards the water’s edge. "Because you're not his fan..."

Tim turned away, not saying anything.

"But don't worry, you like it too, Dad. Even when you're into computers and gyms."

"Mom's an athlete," Tim explained to Grant.

Grant shook his head. Up in the branches of the trees flew tiny yellow ants.
From tree to tree. They had a ceramic-like skull. "You know what they call those?" Tim said.
"Microcertop."

"Big deal," Leake said.

"| I thought you might be interested."

"Only little boys are interested," he said, "in dinosaurs."

"Who says?"

"daddy."

Tim started to cry, but Grant raised his team up. "Children," he said, "shut up."

"why?" Lex said, "|can do what | I want to, if I-"

Then she shut up because she heard it too. It was a scream coming from somewhere.
The bottom of the river.


Well, where the hell is Rex?" Mildred said, talking into the radio. "Of course we don't know.
see him here." They were back at the edge of Sarpoda, looking at the trampled grass
This is where the Hadrosaurs lived. Tyrannosaurus was nowhere to be found.

"Watching now," Arnold said and pressed.

Muldoon turned to Genaro. "Watching now," he repeated sarcastically. "Why didn't he
Have you tried before? Why didn't he try it?"

"|I don't know," Janari said.

“It’s not showing,” Arnold said after a moment.

"What do you mean he doesn't show?"

"It's not on the cameras. Motion sensors don't get it."

"Hell," Mildred said. "That's a lot for motion control. You see Grant and the kids?"

"Soft movements don't get them either."

"Well, what should we do now?" Mildred said.

"Wait for us," Arnold said.


"Look! Look!"

Ahead of them, a great dome of birds rose above them. Grant had only ever seen him.
far; Now he realized it was four miles or more away. example
Zedis struts glistened in the mist and his first thought was that glass must
It weighs one ton. Then, when they got closer, he saw that there was no glass at all, only staining. Soft wire
It hangs in the elements.

"It's not over," Lex said.

"|I think that's how open it is," Grant said.

"So all the birds can fly out."

"If they're big birds," Grant said.


The river swept them under the cliff. They were looking at the ceiling. Now they were
Inside the kitchen, it’s still coming down to the surface. But within a few minutes.
That he was invisible in the fog. Grant said, "|I seem to remember there being a second room
Here." Shortly thereafter he bought a home in the trees on the north side.

"You want to stop?" Tim said.

"Maybe there's a phone. Or abnormal movements." Grant headed for the beach. "We need to try
To contact the Control Center. Time is running out."

They climbed out of the water, slipping on the muddy water, and Grant pulled the boat out of the water.
Then he tied the rope to a tree, and they went out into a dense forest of Indian trees.


vehicle;


"|I just don't understand," John Arnold said over the phone. "I'm not Ricky, and |
Also, don't come anywhere with Grant and the kids."

He sat in front of the consoles and sipped another cup of coffee. All around, control.
The house was littered with paper plates and half-eaten sandwiches. Arnold was exhausted. I was
Saturday at 8:00 A.M. In the fourteen hours since Nedry has destroyed the computer.
In Jurassic Park , Arnold patiently resets the systems, one after another. "The whole park
The systems are back and working great. The phones work. I called a doctor.
you."

At the other end of the hallway, Malcolm was skeptical. Arnold was talking to her in her room.
Logic. "But you're having trouble with motion sensors?"

"Well I'm not getting | what I'm looking for."

"Like Rex?"

"She's not reading right now at all. She started north, about twenty minutes away, and went
on the day of the holiday, and then | It’s destroyed. | I don't know why, except that he's always asleep."

"And you can't have Grant and the kids?"

"No."

"I think it's pretty simple," Malcolm said. "Social movements cover an irregular space."

"It doesn't fit?" Arnold frowned. "They're closing ninety-two-"

"Ninety-two per cent of the earth's surface, | remember," said Malcolm. But if you put the others down.
places above the plate, | Imagine you will find that eight percent is kinetically unified, i.e.
that these parts are related. Essentially, the animal can freely roam anywhere in the park.
Explore escapes to protect roads, forests, rivers, and streams.
whatever."

"Even so," Arnold said, "animals are too stupid to know."

“It’s not clear how sensitive the animals are,” Malik said.

“What do you think Grant and the kids are doing?” Arnold said.

"Not now," Malcolm said, paying her again. "Grant is no genius. He obviously wants to be
Let him know from you. She and the kids often hide from whatever motion sensors are in sight. But it’s possible
They have other problems we don’t know about. Or maybe they're on the river."

"|I can't imagine they'll ever reach the river. The sides are too low. It's impossible to walk on
there."

"Would the case bring them all the way here?"

"Yeah, but it's not the safest way, because it goes through the birds…."

"Why weren't the birds on tour?" Malcolm said.

"We had problems with the design. Originally, the park was just a tree top
Built high above the ground, visitors can observe the glaciers at flying level. We are
He's found four dactyls in birds now - actually, they're cearadactyls, which are giant fish-eating dactyls."

"How are they?"

"Well, while we finished the house, we put ducks inside the birds to train them. But that
That was a big mistake. Looks like our whalers are territorial.”

"Tyretori?"

"Hard earth," Arnold said. They fight amongst themselves over land and invade
"Every other animal came to the place they marked."

"attack?"


"She's amazing," Arnold said. "Birds fly up to the top of the bird, flap their wings, and
dive. A thirty-pound animal would smash a human to the ground like a brick. They were
The workers were beaten and intended to be brutally mutilated.”

"Doesn't that hurt the ducts?"

"Not even this."

"So if the kids are in the birds.. ."

"They're not," Arnold said. "At least, I hope they're not."


"Is that Lori?" Lex said. "What a bag."

Under the canopy of birds, Peteratops Lodge is built above ground in the treetops
pylons, in the center of the tree. But the house was unfinished and unpainted; that
The windows were boarded up. The trees and the house were covered with huge white petals.

"I guess they didn't finish for some reason," Grant said, hiding his disappointment. he
He looked at his watch. "Let's get back to the club."

The sun rose as they traveled, and the morning was pleasant. Grant looked
A network of shadows on the ground from the dome above, he noticed that the ground and
The leaves were examined in broad strips of the same white material as on the
at home. And the smell hung in the morning air.

"It stinks in here," Lex said. "What's all the white stuff?"

"It looks like pigeon feeding. Probably birds."

"How come they didn't finish Lorraine?"

"|I don't know."

They entered a clearing of grass covered with wildflowers. They heard a long whistle.
Then the whistle blew, from the other side of the forest.

"What is that?" "I don't

know."

Then Grant saw a shadowy cloud in front of the grass. the shadow was
Going faster. Within moments, he had them captured. He looked up and saw it was very dark.
Blowing out the sun from their sky.

"Yes!" Lex said. "Is it pterydactic?" "Yes,"

Tim said.

Grant didn't answer. He was a great jumper, he flew. above
Overhead, the pterodactyl let out a low whistle and made a graceful roar, turning towards them.

"How are they not on tour?" Tim said.

Grant was wondering the same thing. Flying dinosaurs are so beautiful and graceful.
They were moving through the air. As Grant looked up, he saw a second bird in the sky.
The third and the fourth.

"Maybe because they didn't finish the lodge," Leake said.

Grant thought these were no ordinary pterodactyls. They were too big. They should
cearadactyls, large flying reptiles from the early Cretaceous. If they were at the top, they wou
such as small aircraft. When they came down, he saw animals with wingspans of fifteen feet.
Body feathers and heads like crocodiles. They ate the f out of his mind. North America and
Mexico.

Lex opened his eyes and looked up at the sky. "Can they hurt us?"

"|Don't worry. They eat fish."

A figure spun on the ground, and a glowing black shadow screamed past them and the police.
Hot air and acrid smell.

"Wow!" Lex said. "They're really big." And then he said, "Are you sure they can't hurt us?"

"He's sure."

The second duct sprang into action faster than the first. He came from behind and drew.
on their heads. Grant bit his lip and licked his body. Looks like a big deal.
bat, he thought. But the animals' crazy appearance impressed Grant. Their mother
The wings are spread out – the bright red feathers stretched over it – so at least it was light.
The whole thing encouraged the taste of the Ducts.

"Oh!" Lex screamed and grabbed his hair. "He sent me!" "he

What?" Grant said.


"He beat me! He beat me!" When he picked up his broom, he saw blood on his fingers.

Upstairs, two more Doctors grabbed their wings and collapsed into tiny blankets that
He fell to the floor. They made a sort of scream as they ran downstairs.

"come on!" Grant said grabbing their hands. They ran past each other and .
With a scream, he threw himself to the ground at the last moment and dragged the children
He gets off as the two dogs whistle past them, flapping their wings. grant
He felt as if he had added the shield to his back.

Then he stood up, got Lexus to his feet and ran with Tim a few steps forward while he
Two other birds flew overhead, shrieking. At the end of the day, he
Knocking the children to the ground, the shadows moved further and further.

"Uck," Lex said, confused. He saw that the birds had white feathers.

Grant scrambled to his feet. "come on!"

As he was about to run, Lex cried out in fear. He turned around and saw something .
dactyls had clutched at his shoulders with hind shields. animals with large, leathery wings;
Gleaming in the sunlight, it’s flapping on both sides. The doctor was trying to get up.
But Lex was heavy, and as he fought, he hit his head several times with his height.
The tip of the jaw.

Lex was screaming and waving his arms wildly. Grant did the only thing he could think to do. he
He rushed forward, jumped, and threw himself at the Duke’s body. He hit her.
His back was on the ground, and he fell on top of the body. The animal cried out;
Grant put his head to his lips and leaned back as loud rumbles beat around him.
body. It was like being in a tent in a breeze. He couldn't see; He couldn't stand it; There was
Nothing but flapping and screaming and leather whips. His feet are scratched.
on his chest. Lex was screaming. Grant turned away from Dactyl and shouted.
And he flinched as he changed gears and tried to twist to right himself. Finally, he gave in .
His wings like those of a mouse curled up and he lifted himself on his claws and started to walk down the aisle.
Suddenly he stopped.

He could even walk on his wings! Lederer’s hunch was right! But then there were the other doctors.
He thought of them, Grant was dazed and off balance, in horror he saw Lex running, his
Hands on her head. . . Tim screams at the top of his lungs. . . .

The first of them fell to the ground and threw something with a dash whistle.
And to stagger. The other ducts immediately scrambled up and chased the first one upstairs. The fourth
dactyl flew wildly through the air to join the others. Grant looked up, stared.
What had happened. The three doctors demanded of the former, shouting angrily.

They were the only ones on the show. "what

Alright?" Grant said.

"They got my gloves," Leake said. "My Daryl Strawberry Special."

They started walking again. Tim put his hand on his shoulder. "Are you okay?"

"Of course, silly," he said, shuddering. She looked up at the ceiling. "|I hope they get confused and die,"
she said.

"Yeah," Tim said. "me too-"

They are ships on the seashore. Grant looked at his watch. It was eighty-thirty. he
Now he had two and a half hours to get back.


Lex shouted as they passed the Silver Birds Dome. Then, in 1990, the beaches closed.
On either side, trees meet the forest. The river was smaller than usual, in some ways.
The holes were tens of meters high, and the water was flowing very fast. Lexi reached up and touched the branches.
Like they’ve passed on.

Grant sat in the boat and listened to the hot rubber band of the water. they
They were going now and then, and now the branches of the trees were passing by. It was awesome. He is .
A gentle breeze through the warm, waving branches. And that meant they would get that
Too soon.

Grant couldn’t be sure how far they’d reached, but they must have been miles away
sauropod where they spent the night. Maybe four or five miles. There can be many.
This means they can only take an hour’s walk from the hotel once they leave the ship. But then the


aviary, Grant wasn’t in a hurry to leave the scene again. Now they were doing good
period.

"| I wonder how Ralph is doing," Lex said. "Maybe he's dead or something."

"I'm sure it's fine."

"| I wonder if she'll let me take her." He was happy to sleep under the sun. "It'll be fun to run
Ralph.”

Tim said to Grant, "Remember your Stegosaurus? Last night?"

"Yes."

"How come you asked them about Tortoise's DNA?"

"For health," Grant said. "They can't explain why dinosaurs surviv
Since they're spinning them, and since they're all women."

"right."

"Well, radiation is notoriously unreliable and probably doesn't work. You'd think it would."
is shown here. But there is still the problem of dinosaurs being female. How can they survive
When are they all women?"

"Right," Tim said.

"No, throughout the animal kingdom, sexual reproduction is a strange kind."

"Tim is very interested in sex," Lex said.

Neither of them looked like him. "For example," Grant says, "most animals have sex
If we never develop a relationship. The male releases a sperm containing
The lion, the woman will pick it up another time. This exchange doesn’t require much
There are as many physical differences between men and women as we think. man and
Women are more similar to some animals than they are to humans."

Tim shook his head. "But what about the frogs?"

Grant heard a scream from the trees above as the Microcertopsians disappeared in a panic.
The branches shook. From the left the huge head of Tyransaurus burst through the foliage.
The tables are served on the ship. Lex screamed in panic and Grant ran over to the side.
But the lake here was only ten meters deep. Tyrannosaurus caught in overgrowth
He turned his head and screamed. Then she tilted her head back.

Among the trees that lined the banks of the river they spotted a large black Tyransaurus.
He heads south, looking for a spot among the trees on the beach. All microservices had
They went to another beach, where they shrieked, screamed, and jumped up and down. In the
raft, Grant, Timothy, and Lexus were on a collision course when Tyransaurus tries to break through again, but
There were very many trees along the river. Tyrannosaurus changed again.
Down at the bow, he tried again, the branches shaking furiously.

However, this did not always succeed.

Then he moved further down. "I

I hate it," Leake said.

Grant sat in the boat, very shaken. If Tyransaurus broke, he wou
Nothing could be done to save them. The river was rough and small.
ship. It was like being in a cave. The rubber bands usually scratch the sand like a boat.
He was pulled by the fast current.

He looked at his watch. Nine is close. The ship went down.

"Hey," Lex said, "Listen up!"

He heard a scream, interspersed with many screams. Screams were coming from the back
Legal, down the river. He listened, and heard the screams again.

"What is that?" Lex said.

"|I don't know," said Grant. "But there's more than one." He took the boat to
In front of the bank, he grabbed a tree branch to steady the boat. The screaming was repeated. Then more screaming.

"Looks like a bunch of owls," Tim said.


Malcolm shouted. "Isn't it time for the Middle East?"
"Not yet," Ellie said.
Malcolm sighed. "How much water have we got here?"
"| I don't know. There's plenty of water in the tap-"
"No, | I mean, how much is left? One?"


Eli raised his hand. "nothing."

"Go to the rooms on this level," Malcolm said, "and fill the tubs with water."

Ellie blinked.

"Also," Malcolm said, "will we have a power supply? Lamps? Aluminum? Sterna fuses?"
Things like that?"

"I'm looking around. Are you planning for an earthquake?"

"Something like that," said Malcolm. The Malcolm Effect represents a drastic change.

“But Arnold said all systems are working well.”

"That's when it happens," Malcolm said.

Ellie said, “You don’t think much of Arnold, do you?

"Okay. It's the store. Uh is the same. They're both tech. They're not
tip. What do they have | Call it a 'mindset'. They are looking into the matter now. They think
narrowly and they call it 'focusing.' They are not around. They're not
effect. That’s how you get a club like this. From smart thinking. Because you
He cannot create an animal to be unknown. To escape. But they
Don't see it."

"Don't you think that's just human nature?" Ellie said.

"God no," Malcolm said. "That's like saying that scrambled eggs and saba for breakfast are human
nature. It's nothing like that. It's only Western training, for most of the rest of the world.
Just thinking about it." He frowned irritably. "The morphine makes me a philosopher."

"You want water?"

"No. I'll tell you the problem with engineers and scientists. There's a scientifically proven way
bullshit about how they seek to know the truth about the state. Which is true, but it's not
Which sets them apart. Nobody approaches things as 'truth seeking'.

"Scientists are concerned. So they're focusing on whether
They can do something. They never stop to ask if they need to do something. They are vulnerable.
Interpret those numbers as unimportant. If they don’t, someone else will. knowledge, they
Dale, that’s impossible. So they just try to do that first. That’s what’s in science. Even pure science
Discovery is a bad thing that gets inside. Handles heavy equipment and replaces
The world after that. Particle accelerators burn the ground and leave behind special radioactive by-products. Space
Leave the garbage on the moon. There is always evidence that scientists were there to make their
Discoveries. Exploration is always an encroachment on the natural world. always.

"Scientists want it that way. They have to get their equipment into it. They have to go
Their symbol. They just can’t watch. They just can’t be grateful. They just can’t fit in the space.
order. They need to do something non-emergent. That’s the scientist’s job, and now we
They have whole teams trying to be scientists.”

Ellie said, "Don't think you're growing-."

"What will one of your huts do after a year?"

"Pretty was," she admitted.

"Don't you always set the ground after your dream?"

"No."

"why not?"

He raised his hand. "There's no money | think. . . .

"There's money to dig in, but not to fix?"

"No, we work in the wrong countries..."

"Only bad countries," Malcolm said, shaking his head. "Just shit. Just the periphery of things. Just the periphery."
Consequences . . . I guarantee you scientists like it this way. They just want accessories and junk.
and tissues and bones. It’s their way of entertaining themselves. It’s built on science.
And it's getting worse."

"So what's the answer?"

"Remove the wise men from you. Remove them from power."

"But then we lose all progress-"

"What's improving?" Malcolm said angrily. “How many hours do women spend on household chores?
It hasn’t changed since the 1930s, despite all the progress. vacuum cleaners, washers and dryers;
Trash compactors, trash disposals, laundry and clothes. .. Why does it take so long to..
Clean up the town like it was in the 1930’s?”


Ella said nothing.

"Because there was no progress," Malcolm said. "Indeed. Thirty thousand years
Since the men who did the cave painting at Lascaux, they worked twenty hours a week.
They give themselves food, shelter, and clothing. The rest of the time they could play or
Sleeping or whatever they do. And they were living in a world where there was clean air and clean water.
Beautiful trees and sunsets. Think about that. Twenty hours a week. Thirty thousand years ago."

“You want to take a break?” Ellie said.

"No," Malcolm said. "| I want people to wake up. We've had four hundred years today
Science, and we should know by now, is both good and bad. It’s time to
change."

"Before we destroy the world?" she said.

She took a deep breath and closed her eyes. "Oh, my gosh," she said. "That's the last thing | I worry about."


In the dark tunnels of the forest, Grant walked hand in hand, grasping at the logs and shaking.
The raft is powered forward. He could still hear the noises. And finally he saw the dinosaurs.

"Aren't those poisonous?"

"Yeah," Grant said. "Dylophosaurus."

Two dilophosphates were present at the mouth of the water. Spears longer than ten feet were colored yellow.
And black. Below, the birds were bright green like rabbits. The first pair of red curls escaped.
The top of the head from the eyes to the nose forms a V shape on the top of the head. bird-
As is evident from the way they walk, they tease them to drink water from the river and then take off to
snarl and hoot.

Lex said into the speaker, "Should we go out for a walk?"

Grant shook his head no. The dilophosaurs were smaller than the triazoles, being significantly smaller
to hide in the dense foliage at the edge of the river. And they seemed to be as fast as they
They screamed and shouted at each other.

"But we can't go past them in the ship," Leake said. "They're poison."

"We have to," Grant said. "somehow."

The dilophosaurs continued to drink and whine. They seemed to be interacting with each other.
Incredibly ritualistic and repetitive. The animal on the left smirks and drinks, closing its mouth
Mouth bares his long teeth, then screams. The animal on the right has
boot in reply and turning to drink is the first movement image of the beast. after
The sequence is repeated.

Grant noticed that the animal on the right was smaller and had smaller spots on its back and a
Christian was red.

"I curse," she said. "It's a sexual rite of passage." "can

Shall we pass them?" Tim asked.

"Not like now. They're at the water's edge." Grant often knew animals.
She would perform these sexual rituals for hours at a time. They went without food and refreshed themselves.
Nothing else. . . . He looked at his watch. twenty-nine.

"What are we doing?" Tim said.

Grant sighed. "|I have no idea."

He sat him down in the boat, and the Dilpozors cried out again and again;
bad. He looked up. Both animals were oriented to the situation.

"What is that?" Lex said.

Grant smiled, "I think we're getting some help." He jumped to the bank. "I want you
Two children on the platform. We go through as fast as we can. But remember: whatever
happens, you didn't say anything, and you didn't move- okay?"

The ship began to slide down towards the Dilophosores. He’s got speed. Lexi believes
Grant's feet stared at him with watery eyes. They were getting closer to the Delphosaurs.
Those who are still close to the river. But he took out his air piston, and looked around the room.

The boat continued on and they smelled a peculiar smell, sweet and irritating at the same time.
period. It smells like dried vomit. The screams of the dilophosaurs were loud. The ship arrived.
Rounding out one final turn, Grant held his breath. The dilophosores were only a few miles away,
Whispering in the trees behind the river.


Just as Grant had suspected, they were buzzing about Tyransaurus. Tyransaurus was trying to
As they crunched leaves, the monkeys stamped their feet in the mud. The ship was going
than them. The smell was infuriating. Tyransaurus was screaming, probably because he was a survivor.
But for another time . . .

leather.

The club stopped him from walking. They were only a few feet from the edge of the cliff.
below from delfosors.

Lexi whispered, "Oh, great."

There was a faint sound of the boat faintly on the sand. So, the ship was going
further. They were going down the river. Tyransaurus cried out one last time and took off; one
The dilophosaur watched in surprise and cried out. Another dilophosphate shouted in response.

The boat was floating on the river.


Tyrannosaurus


The jeep was flying off into the bright sunshine. Muldoon was running, with Genaro at his side. they
They were in an open field, taking pictures of the rough leaves and the green palm trees.
The river is one hundred meters long on the eastern side. When they came up, Muldoon
car.

"Col, it's so hot," he said, wiping his forehead with the back of his hand. He drank the bottle.
A whiskey between his knees, then handed it to Gennaro.

Genaro shook his head. He looked at the landscape glistening in the morning heat. Then he
He looked at the ship’s computer and video feed mounted on the dashboard. TV
It showed the view of the park from distant cameras. There is still no sign of Grant or the children. or
Thirmansaurus.

The radio crackled. "Mildred."

Muldoon picked up the cell phone. "Yes."

"Got your key? | You got Rick. He's at 442 grits. He's going to 443."

“Just a minute,” Muldoon said. switching on the TV. "Yes. I got it now. Follow the river."
The beast was walking along the leaves of the trees that lined the edge of the wall towards the north.

"Go easy on her. Just move her."

“Don’t worry,” Muldoon said, squinting into the sun. "| Won't hurt him."

"Remember," Arnold said, "Tiransaurus is our biggest tourist draw."

Muldoon turned off his radio with a steady sound. "Smart, Joel," he said. "They're still talking
On tourists." Muldoon started the engine. "Let's go see Rexy and give him some medicine."

The jeep rocked on the ground.

"You look forward to this," Gennaro said.

"I've been wanting to put a needle in this big guy for a while," Muldoon said. "And there it is."

They came to a stop. Through the windshield, Genaro immediately saw the Tyrannosaurus.
They walked ahead among the palm trees by the river.

Muldoon downed the bottle of whiskey and threw it in the backseat. She shook his hand.
tube. Gennaro watched the video, which showed their Jeep and Tyransaurus.
There must be a camera in the trees somewhere in the back.

"You want to help," Mildred said, "You can smash those canteens on your feet."

Gennaro turned and opened a stainless steel Halliburton box. He was wrapped inside with
Fim. Four cylinders, each about the size of a can of milk. They were all.
The designation is MORO-709. He took one out.

"You poke his head in and kind of smile," Muldoon explained.

Gennaro found a plastic pump of large needles, each about the diameter of his thumb. he
Touch one of the canteens. On the other end of the drum was a circular weight.

"It's a plum. It's about competition." Muldoon sat forward with an air gun.
The knees. It was made of heavy gray metal and had the shape of a Janro, like a bassooka or a shark
producer.

"What is Moro-709?"


"The standard animals are working on it all over the world. We're going to look at a thousand cc
To begin with.” Muldoon opened the closet big enough to fit his fist.
He carried the box back into the closet and closed it.

“It should be,” Muldoon said. "Normal cows get about two hundred cc, but they
Only two or three tons each, Tyrannosaurus rex is eight tons, and much more massive. This is important.
Dosage.”


"why?"

“The dosage is part body weight and part shape.”
Being an elephant, hippo, and rhino, you move the elephant around, so it stands still like
statue. You slow down a hippo, so it falls asleep, but it keeps going. And Richard has
Just be crazy in combat. But on the other hand, you drive the car in over five minutes.
car and dies from an adrenaline rush. Amazing problems that are hard and complex.”

Muldoon drove slowly towards the river and approached the bank. "But that's all
Independence. We learn a lot about mammal conservation because the animals are built around large
Mammal attraction – lions, leopards, bears, elephants. We don't know much about cultures. and
Nobody knows anything about dinosaurs. Cannasauruses are new animals."

"You consider them future?" Gennaro said.

"No," Muldoon said, turning his beam. "Dinosaurs don't fit into existing islands." He turned and left.
Avoid getting stuck in a marriage. "Really, what we're finding is that dinosaurs were evolving just like mammals are today, as they are today.
Some religions are sweet and beautiful, and others are sweet and savory. Some of them look good and
Others don’t. Some of them are dumb and some of them are very smart."

"Like the Raptors?" Gennaro said.

Muldoon shook his head. "Reptiles are smart, very smart. Believe me, they have all the problems
far away," he said, "It's nothing compared to what we get when retirees leave their
Reading material. Ah. | He thinks this is as close as we can get to Rexy.”

Above, Tyransaurus was poking his head through the trees, looking out over the river.
You try to get through. The animal then moved a few feet to the ground to try again.

"What do you see there?" Gennaro said.

"It's hard to know," Mildred said. “Maybe he’s trying to catch up with the Microceratopsians.
Swim in the branches. They'll happily chew it up."

Muldoon stopped the Jeep about fifty meters from Tyranchore and turned the car around.
around. He started the engine and ran. "Get behind the wheel," Mildred said. "And wear your commitment."
on." He took another can and stuck it on his shirt. Then he left.

Genaro slid to the back of the car. "How many times have you done this?"

cried Muldoon. "Never. I'll always try to win it. We'll see how it goes
goes from there." He walked ten yards behind the jeep and crashed into a bush
knee. He set the large knife towards her and breathed a sigh of relief.
Muldoon turned to the Tyrannosaurus, who still didn't pay any attention to them.

A black gas exploded and Genaro saw a white trail in the air towards the side.
Thirmansaurus. But nothing seemed to happen.

Tyransaurus then moved slowly through the search to observe them. He moved his head from side to side.
sideways, as if looking at them with a certain eye.

Muldoon downed the developer and loaded the second drum.

"Did you hit him?" Gennaro said.

Mildred shook her head. "She said. Laser lights... Check if there's any batteries in the box."

"What?" Gennaro said.

"It's the battery," Muldoon said. "Bigger than your finger. Gray markings."

Gennaro leaned in and looked at the steel box. He heard the Jeep shake, he heard the engine.
Continued. He didn’t see the battery. Tyransaurus shouted. For Gennaro, it was terrifying.
The sound that emanates from the chest of the beast, echoing through the earth. he
He stood up and reached for the steering wheel, placing his hand on the gas shifter. On radio, he
She heard a voice say, "Muddie. This is Arnold. Get out of there. Go away."

"|You know what I'm doing," Myrtle said. that

Tyransaurus worried.


Mildred stood her ground. Although the gap is slowly and steadily moving towards
He raised his shield and aimed and grabbed. Another time, Genaro saw a puff of smoke, and it was white.
The streak of the canister goes back to the animal.

Nothing happened. The Tyrannosaurus continued to charge.

Presently Meade was on his feet and running, shouting, "Go! Go!" Genaro parked the Jeep.
and Muldoon threw himself out the side door as the Jeep surged forward. Tiransaurus was
It closed quickly, and Muldoon opened the door and stepped inside.

"Go, put it! Go!"

Gennaro lowered it. The jeep flew violently in front of the nose, and for a moment they just saw
The sky goes up in the air, then falls back to the ground and runs forward
further. Genaro headed towards the stand of trees to the left until he saw a mirror.
the tyrannosaur gives one last roar and turns.

Gennaro slowed the car. "Jesus."

Mildred was shaking her head. "I could have sworn | beat him a second time."

"I mean, you missed him," Jannard said.

"The needle must be broken before injection."

"You admit, you didn't miss it."

"Yes," Mildred said. She cheered. "|Jenny. The battery is dead on the laser beam. My
fault. | He should have seen it when he went out last night. Let's go back and get some more
Canisters."

The jeep headed north toward the hotel. Muldoon picked up the radio. "retention."

"Yes," Arnold said.

"We're going back to base."


The river was choppy now and flowing fast. The boat was getting faster and faster. I was
It starts out as a fun adventure in the park.

"Wee!" Lex yelled, shooting him. "Quick, quick!"

Grant looked into his eyes. The river was narrow and dark, but she could see far
You finally came to the end of the trees, and then there was bright sunlight and a distant rumble. river
It seemed like it was going to end somehow. . . .

The ship was moving faster and faster forward. grant

He gripped his paddles.

"What is that?"

"It's watered down," Grant said.

The ship came out of darkness into the bright morning sunlight and ran.
Proceeding in the fast flow towards the mouth of the river. There were screams in their ears. grant
He gripped the boat as hard as he could, but he couldn't get the boat to turn. it
He continued towards the gate.

Lex leaned towards her. "I can't swim!" Grant saw that he didn't have his cheerleader
But there was nothing he could do; They came to the door with terrible speed, and
The sound of water seemed to fill the world. Grant sank his boat into the water a
Drink and drink, mouth to mouth; The rubber bucket jiggled in the water, but they didn’t go through.
Grant squeezed past the edge, glanced sideways, and saw a drop about fifty feet down.
The downstairs pool.

And standing in the overflowing pool waiting for them was a tyrannosaurus.

Lex was screaming in terror and then the boat spun and the rear end fell off and ran
They came out of the wind and the swirling water and fell down sick. Grant threw his hands in the air and
The rest of the world is silent and slow.


He seemed to fall for a long minute, and he had time to look at Lex in his orange jacket.
fall down beside him; He had time to look at Tim, and look down; He had time to
Look at the flowing white water; Had time to check out the pool below.
Bowed slightly, there is silence at his side.

Then, with a loud crash, Grant plunged into the frigid water, surrounded by boiling white puddles.
He fell and spun around to see Tyranxhor's foot spinning in front of him.
Stepping down into the pool and out of the river afterwards. Grant swam to shore and was caught warm.


Rocks, he whispered, grabbing a tree branch and finally pulling himself out of the mainstream. It's blowing.
He pulled himself onto his stomach and onto the rocks, looking down at the river just in time to see red.
The kitchen continued. Then she saw Tim, fighting the water, and she reached out to pull him
He coughs and shakes, and goes to the beach next to her.

Grant turned towards the water and bashed Tyransaurus's head down.
The water at his feet. The big head rocked and filled the water on both sides. He was
Something between his teeth.

And then the north reared its head again. Lex's Life is Lex's Orange.
taste.


A moment later, Lex jumped onto the surface near the dinosaur’s long tail. He is lying face down.
Water, her small body drenched in sweat. Grant fell into the water on his back.
He was once a water bearer. A moment later he settled on the rocks a
A lifeless heavyweight. His face was dusty. Water gushed out of his mouth.

Grant nodded, giving him the door-to-door, but he was skeptical. Then he vomited yellow.
Green water and a head of snakes. His eyes fluttered. "Thank you," he said. She smiled weakly. "We did
it."

Tim started to cry. She coughed again. "Will you stop? What are you crying for?"

"because."

"We were worried about you," Grant said. The little whites were coming down the river.
Tyransaurus was adding fun flowers. Still, he turned away from them and faced the river. but
At any minute the animals might turn and look at them. . . . Come on, kids," he said.

"Where are we going?" Lexi says he'll investigate.

"come on." He was looking for a place to hide. He sees only open grassy plains on the banks of the river.
It offers no protection. Up the river were dinosaurs. Grant then noticed a trail of dirt along the river. it
It was like going to the bottom of the water.

And it’s a clean, dirty man’s shoe. And lead the way.

The Tyrannosaurus finally turned around, roaring and staring at the pile of ashes. it
They seemed to feel left out.

He was looking for them on the ground. Grant and the kids hid among the large trees that were connected to
At the coasts. And he sent them away, and departed into the south. "Where are we going?" Lex said. "We're going
back."

"|know."

They were now close to the water, and the sound was very loud. The rocks became cold.
Dirt road. There was always fog. It was like walking in a cloud. way
It looked like it was going underwater, but when they got closer, they saw that
He went to the back of the water.

The Tyrannosaurus continued to watch the water, even with its back turned to them. They hurried away.
trail to the falls, and was about to go behind the waterfall plateau when Grant
The smile of Tyransaurus. So they were completely behind the water, and Grant couldn't see
from the Silver Sheet.

Grant looked around in amazement. There was a recess here, no bigger than the garage, and
It’s full of gadgets: tiny pumps, big filters, pipes. Everything was damp and cold.

"Is that us?" Lex said. He should have screamed at the sound of falling water. "Where are you
we? What is this place? Is it us?"

"Just a minute," Grant said. He was looking at the equipment. Obviously, this is a park machine.
And there must have been electricity to run it, so there was probably also a telephone to communicate.
It filtered through the filters and pipes.

"what are you doing?" Lexi shouted.

"I'm looking for a phone." By now it was almost 10:00 and they were just past one.
It took an hour before the ship reached land.

Found a steel door marked MAINT 04 but it was locked properly.
Next to it was a security card. Next to the door, he saw a row of metal boxes. he
Opening the drawers one by one, there were only switches and watches inside. There is no telephone.
And nothing is more than an open door.


She almost missed the box to the left of the door. When he opened it, he found a nine-key keyboard;
It’s covered in dots of green molecules. But it seemed like a way to close the door, and it was
Imagine that the phone was on the other end. Scratches were made in the metal of the case.
Number 1023. He jumped at her.

With a shout, the door opened. Darkness walks down with heavy steps.
On the back wall he sees the CHARGER MAIN VEHICLE 04/22 with the yellow indicator
Go down the stairs. Could that mean the car was still there? "Hello, kiddos."

"Forget it," Lex said. "I'm not going in there."

"Come on, Lex," Tim said.

"Forget it," Lex said. "There's no lights or anything. I'm not going."

“It’s nothing,” Grant said. There was no time to argue. "Stay here, I'll be right back."

"Where are you going?" Lex said suddenly scared.

Grant walked in the door. It made an electronic beeping sound and closed it behind him.
in the afternoon.

Grant was in complete darkness. After a short illness, he turned to the door and
Her exterior felt wet. There was no code, no line. He turned to either side of the wall.
The door, the switch feel, the control box, everything….

There was nothing.

As he was fighting back his fear, his fingers closed around a cold metal cylinder. He ran his hands.
On one side of the fan, a flat surface. . . Dark pressed it, and the beam was there.
It’s amazingly shiny. He looked back at the door, but saw that it wasn’t opening. Should have
Wait for children to open it. Meanwhile . . .

He started with the steps. They were soaked and sticky with mud, Janet explained.
As he walked down the stairs, he heard a moan and the sound of nails scraping against concrete. he
He drew his pistol and advanced cautiously.

Footsteps drew him around the corner, and as his light flashed, a strange light shone out from behind.
And then, after a moment, he saw it: a car! It was an electric car that looked like a golf cart and looked pretty
A long tunnel that seemed to stretch for miles. A bright red light flashed on the driver's wheel.
The car, then, is probably more common.

Grant heard the noise again, and he wheeled around, seeing a black object rising towards him.
It flies through the air, the rules are loose, and Grant unexpectedly takes off. Banga descended upon it.
He hit the ground and rolled in terror, but BANG .
She didn't get up, and she felt relieved when she saw it.

It was a Velociraptor, but much smaller and less than a year old. It was about two feet long, about 2 feet wide.
A medium-sized dog, lying on the ground, breathing shallowly, with a leash stuck underneath.
jaw. There was probably too much anesthetic for his body weight and Grant pulled the trigger.
brief. Velliciraptor looked at him with glowing eyes for a moment.

Grant clearly felt intelligence from this creature, a different kind of gentleness.
It was a surprise and a threat to him from the adults in the pen. He patted the man's head.
velociraptor, he hopes will calm her down. He looked down at the body, which was shaking slightly like a
The sedative was applied. And then she saw it was a man.

Young, young, and male. There was no question he was there. This Velociraptor
was in the forest.

Excited about this, she hurried up the stairs to the door. With his lamp, he
while the outer surface of the door is smooth and unmarked, and the interior walls. Running his hands.
At the door, she gradually realized that she was locked from the inside and couldn’t open it unless
The children were wise enough to open it for him. He could faintly hear them on the other side.
believe.


"Doctor Grant!" Lex yelled and slammed the door. "Doctor Grant!"

"Relax," Tim said. "He'll be back."

"But where did he go?"

"Listen, Dr. Grant knows what he's doing," Tim said. "He'll be back in a minute."

"She should be back by now," Lex said. He pressed his fingers against his waist and squeezed his breath.
wide. He kicked his leg angrily.

And then, with a scream, the north's head popped out of the water towards them.


Tim looked up in horror and his mouth hung open. Lexi yelled and threw herself.
ground. The head rocked back and forth and out again. But Tim could see the shadow.
The animal’s head rests on the grass.

He dragged Lex to private and as the jaws exploded again, he screamed, heavy.
The tongue moves in and out quickly. Water rushes all the way from the head. Then he left
further.

Lex rolled over next to Tim and shivered. "|I hate it," she said. He turned, but the rest.
It was only a few meters away, and it was crammed with machines. There was nowhere they could hide.

The head came back into the water, but slowly this time, the jaws came to rest.
ground. Tyransaurus turned his nose up as he blew out a breath. But there were eyes
Water in the flask.

Tim thought: He can't see us. He knows we’re here, but he can’t see underwater.

Tyransaurus snorted.

"What's he doing?" Lex said again.

"Shhshb."

With a small cry, the jaws slowly opened and the tongue slipped out. It was sweet and blue.
Black, with a small knob at the end. It was about four feet tall.
The high wall of the building. The scratch tongue was slid over the filter cylinders. Tim and
Lex pressed the pipes.

His tongue moves to the left, then to the right, hitting the device.
He twisted his head around the pipes and faucets and felt them. Tim saw that the tongue had muscle.
movements such as ivory,
He was pulled to Lex's feet.

"Eeww," Leak said.

The tongue stopped. He turned and stood up like a snake, his body on the side.

"Don't laugh," Tim whispered.

. .. across his face, then up towards Tim and finally wrapped around his neck. Tim
He closed his eyes as heavy muscle covered his face. It was hot and wet and felt like
Urine.

He swirled, his tongue gently dragging along her open lips.

"Timmy…."

Tim couldn't answer; The mouthpiece was covered with black tongue paint. He could see, but he
I can't talk. Lex took her hand.

"Come on, Timmy!"

His tongue dragged it towards her palate. He felt hot breath on his feet.
Lex was pulling, but it wouldn't match the force of the muscles holding him. Tim left her.
He pressed his tongue with both hands back to her head. He couldn’t move it.
She dug her heels into the dirt, but pulled herself forward anyway.

Lex had wrapped his arms around her waist and was walking after her, yelling at her, but she
He couldn't do anything. He was starting to see some. A kind of peace has been reached .
He felt an almost irresistible sense of peace as he walked away.

Timmy?"

And then the tongue is relaxed, to let go. Tim felt it slide off his face. His body .
It was covered with white teeth and the tongue fell to the ground. beards;
slapped shut, to bite the tongue. Black blood came out and mixed with the mud. that
Nose was breathing ragged.

"What's he doing?" Lexi shouted.

And then slowly, slowly, the head began to tilt backwards out of the tunnel to .
Tall roots in the mud. And eventually it all disappeared and they could only see money
Pink rainbows.


retention
"Okay," Arnold said from the control room. "Rex is downstairs." He leaned back in his chair and


She smiled, lit the last of her cigarettes, and rolled up the pack. That’s what happened: the last step to
park back to normal. Now all they had to do was get out and move it.


“City boy,” Muldoon said, looking at his TV. "| I got him after all." He stepped forward.
Gennaro. "It took him an hour to absorb it."

Henry Wu glared at the screen. "But he could have drowned right there…."

"He's not going to whistle," Mauldin said. "I've never seen an animal so hard to kill."

"|I think we should go out and move it," Arnold said, "We

will," Muldoon said. Not loud enough.

"This is a precious animal."

"| I know he's an important animal," said Myrtle.

Arnold turned to Gennard. He couldn’t face a moment. "I'll show you," he
He said, "That the park is going back to normal now. Whatever Malcolm's math
It was going to happen. We're always under our control."

Genaro pointed to the screen behind Arnold's head, "What is that?"

Arnold turned around. It was the System Status box, in the upper corner of the screen. It was
empty. Arnold was surprised to see that it was now flashing in yellow: AUX PWR LOW. Forum
For a moment, he didn’t understand. Why should the donor power be reduced? They were running on the highway.
Power, not help power, he thought maybe it was a status check on the helper.
Power, possibly checking the fuel levels or charging the battery. .. .

"Henry," Arnold said to Wu. "Look at this."

Wu said, “Why are you running from a department store? "I am

No," said Arnold. "Looks like you are."

"|Impossible."

"Get out the traffic condition book," Wu said. The log was to log the system over the past few moments.
hours.

Arnold pressed a button, and they heard the click of a printer in the tunnel. Wu walked up to him.

Arnold looked at the TV. The box has now changed from bright yellow to red, and the message
Now please read: AUX PWR FAIL, counting started from sound.

"What's going on?" Arnold said.


Carefully, Tim walked a few steps along the dirt path into the sunlight. He looked
He looked round the river and saw the cross lying beside it, floating down on the shore.

"|I hope he's dead," Lex said.

Tim saw that he wasn't: the dinosaur's chest was still moving, and one arm was curled.
spasm. But there was something about her. So Tim is the white circle stuck in the background.
in the head, by removing the ear.

"He was killed by the sword," Tim said.

"Okay," Leake said. "He ate us."

Tim watched, breathing heavily. He was angry that he hadn't expected to see such a big creature.
It’s as low as this. He didn't want her to die. "It's not his fault," she said.

"Oh sure," Leak said. "He ate us, and it's not his fault."

"He's a carnivore. He's doing what he used to do."

"You wouldn't say that," Lex said, "if you were inside her right now.

Then the sound of the water changed. From a loud scream, it became soft and quiet. that
and the waters prevailed in the sky, and became a river . . .

And it stopped.

"Tim. The water's stopped," Leak said.

He was going to rot like a pot that hadn’t been completely killed. Waterfront Pool
There was water. They were standing near the top in a tunnel filled with machinery.
Looking below.

"The fountain shouldn't stop," Lex said.

Tim shook his head. "There must be power... someone turned off the power." Behind them,
All the pumps and filters were closing one after the other, the lights were flickering and
The machine turns off.

And then a solo disappeared, and the door to MAINT 04 swung
Open it up slowly.


Grant stepped out, touched his face in the light, and said, "Good job, kids. Lock the door."
"We didn't do anything," Leake said. "Oh

The power’s out,” Tim said.

"Never mind," Grant said. "Come see what I got."


Arnold looked at him worriedly.

After a while the screens went black, then the house lights went out and
into the control room into darkness and gloom. Everyone started crying at once. Mauldin to .
The blind let the light in, and Woo came to print.

"Look at this," Wu said.


Weather Event System Status [Code]
05:12:44 Security | Open Activity [AV12]
05:12:45 Security 2 Locked [AV12]
05:12:46 Security 3 Task Break [AV12]
05:12:51 Shutdown command shutdown [-AVO].
05:13:48 Opening of start mode [-AVO}
05:13:55 Security 1 on shutdown [-AVO}
05:13:57 Security 2 on shutdown [-AVO]
05:13:59 Security 3 on shutdown [-AVO}
05:14:08 Start Command Channel Start - Aux Power [-AV1]
05:14:18 Monitor-Masterwork - Auxiliary Power [-AV04]
05:14:19 Security - Super Active - Wake Power [-AV05]
05:14:22 command-worker - Walk Power [-AV06]

05:14:24 Laboratory - Super Active - Wake Power [-AV08]
05:14:29 Telecom-Webb Opera - Auxiliary Power [-AV09]

05:14:32 Master Plan - Strong Energy [-AV09]

05:14:37 Get the job done - Wake Power [-AV09]
05:14:44 Mode Control Mode Driver - Power Controlled [-AV09]
05:14:57 WARNING: Valley Mode [NB] Worker - Maximum Power [-AV09]
09:11:37 WARNING: Overfuel (20%) Operation - Overfuel [-AVZZ]
09:33:19 WARNING: Fuel Vacuum (10%) Operation - Vacuum Power [-AVZ1]
09:53:19 Warning: Overfuel (1%) Operation - Overfuel [-AVZ2]

09:53:39 Warning: Fuel Oil (0%) Off [-AVO]


Wu said, "You closed at fifteen this morning, the day you started when you
It started with donor power."

"Jesus," Arnold said. Apparently the main power had not been turned on since the lockdown. When he
powered back up, only Japanese support would come. Arnold thought that was great when
He was grateful and realized that was a good thing. That’s what was supposed to happen. He’s
Before: The electronic auxiliary switch is switched on first;
Because it took a heavy charger to start the big circuit. That was the way
It was ready.

But Arnold never got the chance to turn off the main power supply. and when the views and .
The screens in the control room were on and it never occurred to him that the main power supply wasn't either.
It has been restored.

But it didn’t, and every time since then, while they were looking for Rex and being
For one thing and another, the park was busy at a slow pace. And that wasn’t good enough
mind. In fact, the impact was beginning to hit him.

"What does this address mean?" Muldoon said, looking over the list.


05:14:57 WARNING: Valley Mode [NB] Worker - Maximum Power [-AV09]


“That means the alert system status was sent to the controllers in the control room,” Arnold said.
"About the birds."

"Did you see that warning?"

Arnold shook his head, "Nope.
Look at her."

"What do you mean, alert: collision status'?"

"Well, | I didn't know it at the time, but we were running fast," Arnold said. "and
The backup does not generate enough energy to power the electric fences, so
It’s turned off automatically.”

Mildred frowned. "Were the walls locked?"


"Yes. "

"Besides the Velociraptor walls?"

Arnold sighed in relief. "Yes."

“Christ Jesus,” Muldoon said. "Five hours. These animals can leave."

And then, from some distance away, they heard a scream. Mildred started talking too much .
fast. He went around the house giving out portable radios.

"Mr. Arnold is heading to the equipment repair shop to turn on the main power supply. Under the supervision of Dr. Wu To
shelter. Only you can operate the computers. Welcome back, Mr. Hammond.
Logic. Don't get ahead of me. Go now. Lock the doors and stay behind them until you hear a
I. I help Arnold deal with the retorts. " He turned to Janard. "He likes to live in danger
further?"

"That's not true," Genaro said. It was too full.

"Good. Then you and the others head home." Mildred turned around. "That's all. Now
move. "

“But what are you doing with my cattle?” cried Hammond.

“That’s not really a question, Mr. Hammond,” Muldoon said. "The question is, what is that
You going to be us?"

He walked through the door and hurried down the corridor to his office. Genaro fell into step.
Next to him. "Change your mind?" cried Muldoon.

"You need help," Gennard said.

"I can be." Muldoon went into the room marked Animal Control and took the ashes.
shoulder launcher, and opens a panel on the wall behind his desk. There were six cylinders.
and the sixth canteen.

"The thing about these wines," Muldon says, "is that they're really boring
systems. They don’t die quickly even after they leave the brain. And they stand strong; Heavy interests.
make a shot to the heart dicey, and they’re hard to shoot from the legs or back. slow
bleeders, slow to die." He was opening the cylinders behind his back and falling into
Cantors. He threw a hard kick at Genord. "Shut it."

Gennaro pressed the key, and Muldoon passed him the locks. "All we can hope for is
is to blow them. Unfortunately, we only got six birds here. This includes eight reports
The colored town. Let's go. Stay by your side. You have fertility."

Muldoon got out and ran across the field, looking across the field towards the road.
which leads to the intake. Gennaro was panting next to him. They arrived.
down and out of the glass doors, and Muddy stood.

Arnold was standing behind him in the training room. Three people approached him.
Arnold picked up a stick, waved it at them, and shouted. The reps appeared as
They drew near together, one staying in the middle and the other two moving on each side. Organized.
smooth. Gennaro shuddered.

Packing status.

Muldoon was already focused, with the developer slung over his shoulder. "Dawn," he said.
Genaro pushed the giant behind the launcher. There was a short circuit. nothing
done. "Col, you got it later," Mildred said, straightening the stick to drop the gravel.


Gennaro's hands. Genaro is uploaded again. The retorts were screaming at Arnold when the beast
On the left.
Tomatoes scattered on the walls of the room. The lower body falls to the ground, the legs
Jumping into the air, tail wagging.

“It wakes them up,” Muldoon said.

Arnold ran to the equipment door. The Velostrators turned and started to
Mauldin and Genaro. They exchanged as they got closer. Somewhere far away, near a
at the lodge, he heard screaming.

"This could be a disaster," Genaro said. "Donnie," Mildred said.


Henry Wu heard the explosions and looked towards the control room door. She whirled.
around the consoles, and then stopped. She wanted to go out, but she knew she had to stay in the house.
If Arnold can restore power - if only for a minute - then Wu can restore power.
Generator.

He should have stayed in the house.

She heard someone scream. It was like Mildred.


Muldoon felt a sharp pain in his ankle and fell down a cliff to the ground.
running. Looking back, he saw Genaro running in the opposite direction through the forest. reps
They weren’t in Genera, but they were replacing Muldon. They had now reached less than twenty feet.
Muldoon shouted at the top of his lungs as he ran, wondering where he would end up.
go. Because he knew he had ten seconds before they found him.

Ten seconds. maybe

quite.


Ellie had to help Malcolm back up and Harding hit the needle and injected the morphine. Malcolm
He sighed and fell backwards. It seemed to get stronger by the minute. On the radio, they
He heard screams.

Hammond entered the room and said, "How is it?"

"It sucks," Harold said. "A little delayed."

"I'm nothing like that," Malcolm said. "|I'm very clean." They listened to the radio. "it
It feels like there's a war."

"The retorts are gone," Hammond said.

"They did," Malcolm said with a slight sigh. "How can that be?"

"It was a broken system. Arnold didn't know there was auxiliary power and the walls."
Cut it out."

"Did they?"

"Go to hell, you bad boy-."

"If | you remember," Malcolm said, "I said a standard wall couldn't fail."

Hammond took a deep breath and sat down heavily. "Damn it all," he shook his head. "Should
We haven’t escaped the notion that what we’re looking at here is the worst of the worst.
Simple concept. My colleagues and | It was decided many years ago that it was possible to clone
DNA from extinct animals and breeding. It was a fantastic idea for us.
Time Travel-The only time travel in the world. Bring them back alive. And since he was
That was exciting, and since it was doable, we decided to go ahead. We found this class and
We moved on. It was all so easy."

"simple?" Malcolm said. Somehow he found the strength to sit up in bed. "Easy? You're
A bigger fool than he thought you were. and | He thought you were an idiot."

Ellie said, "Doctor Malcolm," and tried to calm him down. But Malcolm was having none of that.
He looked at the radio, the screams and the screams.

"What is this, going on out there?" she said. "It's your simple idea. Simple. You're reinventing
Lifestyles, about which you know nothing at all. Your Dr Wu doesn’t know .
For the things he creates, he cannot be bothered with details such as the name of the object;
One that is. You make so many of them in a short amount of time, you never know anything
They, however, you expect them to obey you because you created them, so you assume
Belong to them; You forgot that they are alive, conscious, and capable of


Don’t do your request, forget what little information you have about them, you can’t
Do the things you call simple things.... Dear God. . ."

He thought he was paying.

"You know what's with the power of knowledge?" Malcolm said. "It's kind of a rich heritage.
And you know, people who are rich. He never fails."

“What’s he talking about?” Hammond said.

Harding made a gesture, indicating he was upset. Malcolm looked up.

"| Tells you | what I'm talking about," he said. "Different types of violence require greater
Anyone who wants power will sacrifice. There is a learning curve, which lasts for most people
years. The power you want. Company President. The black guy in the cartoon. Spiritual
Guru. You have to put in time, hard work, and dedication to anything you aspire to. You should .
up a lot to get it. It must be very important to you. And if you’ve got it, that’s yours.
pressure. It can’t be given: it’s up to you. This is the result of your discipline.

"Now, what's interesting about this is, when someone
He could be killed with his bare hands, and he’s also old enough to use it in a stupid way.
So that kind of control is built into it. The discipline of gaining power changes you in that way.
that you will not harm him.

"But the power of knowledge is like lost wealth: acquired without discipline. You read what other people
Do it, and you'll take the next step. You can do it while you’re young. You can improve a lot
fast. There is no control that lasts for decades. There is no kingdom: the old sciences are wrong.
There is no degradation against nature, there is only initial wealth.
philosophy. Cheating, lying, lying - it's not worth it. To you, or your colleagues. Nobody
You are being criticized. Nobody has anybody. They’re all trying to do the same thing: do something .
Yes, and do it quickly.

"And because you can stand on the shoulders of giants, you can do something
brief. You yourselves don’t know exactly what you did, but you already said,
He took the patty and sold it. And customer discipline is less than that. Customer Simplicity
It buys energy like anything else. The customer doesn't even notice any of that.
Maybe it's necessary."

“You know what he’s talking about?” Hammond said. Eli

She nodded.

"|I have no idea," Hammond said.

"I'll make it easy," Malcolm said. "A karate master doesn't kill people with his bare hands."
He doesn’t kill her in his anger. The person who is killed is the one who doesn’t .
Observation, not control, and which bought its power on a particular Saturday night.
And that is the negative force that science inculcates and justifies. And that's why you think that
Building a place like this is easy."

"It was simple," Hammond insisted.

"Then why be evil?"


Dazed by the pressure, John Arnold opened the door to the maintenance room and entered.
The darkness within. Jesus, he was black. He should have realized that the light would go out. she thought.
The cool breeze, the space tunnels, extending two floors below, a had to
Get the pole. He had to strengthen it or he would break.

traveler.

He groaned like a blind man until he realized it was nothing. Somehow, he had to find his light
shed, returned to the door and painted four bays. It shed a lot of light. but
There was no way to close the door. He quickly took off his shoes and tossed them at the door.

He went over to the platform and saw it easily. He stepped on the metal cylinder and heard it.
The difference in her steps, one louder, one softer, but he could see the light. The front was
A staircase leading down to the generators. Ten more places.

obscure.

The light was gone.

Arold glanced at the door and saw that the light had been blocked by the body of the Velociraptor.
The beast smiled and sniffed his shoes carefully.


Henry Wu walked. He ran his hands over the computer consoles. She touched the screens. he
He was constantly in motion. He was concerned witb tension.

Here’s a look at the steps he took. It should be fast. The first screen will appear, and
It was pressed-

"Whoa!" The radio shouted.

He grabbed it. "Yeah. I'm here."

"Got some blood power yet?" It was Muldoon. There was something off about his voice.
Something hollow.

"No," Wu said. She smiled, happy to know that Meade was alive.

"| Mind you, Arnold got to the toilet," said Mildred- "After that, I don't know."

"where are you?" Wu said.

"I'm full."

"what?"

"It's stuffed in the blood pipe," Mildred said. "And I feel so much better now."


Muldoon thought it was like being in a tube. There were many waterfall pipes
It circled behind the visitors’ center, and he rebounded it to near midfield and hit it as
The poor. The meter pipes, they were too tight for him, but they couldn’t penetrate behind him.

At least, after he stuck his foot out of one when the bad-nose got too close to the pipe.
Tortoise was roaring, and the others were now respectful. His only regret is that he
He hadn’t waited to see the nozzle at the end of the pipe before pressing the button.

But he probably still got his chance because three or four were outside screaming and
He screams around her.

“Yeah, it’s very popular,” he said on the radio.

Wu said, "Does Arnold have a radio?"

“Don’t even think about it,” Muldoon said. "Just sit down. Wait."

He didn't care what the other end of the pipe looked like - he got there too soon - and he
I can't see right now. It was written. He could only hope that the last thing was unlocked. Jesus,
He didn't like having his backside picked off by one of these bastards.


Arnold followed him to the patio. The Velostrator was only ten meters away, and he was right behind him.
Stepping forward into the darkness. Arnold could feel his faint grin on the metal.

But it was slow going. He knew that an animal could see well, but Polish Grill
The familiar mechanical smells made him wary. That attention was his only chance at Arnold.
thought. If only he could have gone up the stairs, down to the bottom . . .

Because he was convinced that the velvet cannot move in stairs. It’s not small, it’s hard.
stairs.

Arnold looked at her shoulder. The stairs were only a few meters away. A few more steps. . .

There it was! When he arrived, he felt the ramp and started flying down almost vertically.
The steps. Her feet touched the small concrete. Twenty feet above him, Rapor screamed in pain.
Patty.

"Too bad, buddy," Arnold said. She turned away. He was very close to the current assistant.
Generator. Just a few steps away, even in this dim light. . . .

There was a knock behind him. Arnold

She changed.

The retort stood on the street, crying. it

He was flying on the ground.

He quickly looked for a weapon, but was suddenly shot in the back.
concrete. Something heavy was pressing against his chest and it was impossible to breathe.
Realizing the animal was standing above him, he grabbed the legs as they dug into the meat
His chest, smelling foul breath coming from his head, opened it.
The door screams.


Ellie held the radio in her hand as she listened. Two other Tikan employees arrived at the hotel.
It was as if they knew it was safe here. But there weren’t any others involved in the final minutes. and
It was quiet outside. Over the radio, Muldoon said, "How long has it been?"


"Four five minutes," Wu said.

"Arnold should have done it by now," Mildred said. "Probably. Any ideas?"
"No," Wu said.

"Did we hear from Gennaro?"

Genaro pressed the button. "I'm here."

"Where are you?" Mildred said.

"I'm going to daycare," Gennard said. "Give me a chance."


Gennaro leaned his head back in the leaves and listened.

Ahead, he saw a distinct path leading towards the visitor center. Gennaro knew
There were furniture somewhere to the east. He heard the birds chirping in the trees. a
There was a soft mist in the air. A retort was screaming, but it was off in the distance. His voice broke.
His place. Genaro started, stepping out of the way and down into the leaves.

Do you want to live at risk? not

really.

The truth was, he didn’t. But Gennaro thought he had a plan or a chance that could
work. If she lives in a house on the north side of the continent, she can take care of the maintenance.
He came out later. All the fish were probably around the other houses to the south. there
There was no house in their forest.

At least, he hoped not.

She moved it as much as she could and knew it was making a lot of noise. He’s a victim.
He slowed his pace and felt his heartbeat. Here the leaves were much sparser; He couldn't
Six or seven steps forward. He began to worry that he would never be adopted again.
the whole shed. But then he saw a house to his right at the top of the platforms.

He moved closer to her and rolled to the side. He found the door, opened it, and stepped inside. it
It was very dark. He fell for something.

Man shoes.

Genaro frowned. He opened the door wide and walked deeper into the room. he
He saw a traveler ahead of him. She realized she didn’t know where she was going. and it
He had left his radio behind.

damn!

The radio may be located somewhere in the nursery. Or is she just lookin
Generator. He knew what genius was like. It was probably somewhere below
down. He found a ladder leading down.

It was dark downstairs and it was hard to see anything. He felt his way through the pipes.
He holds his bars so he doesn’t hit his head.

He heard the screech of an animal and froze. He listened, but the voice did not come again. He changed.
Proceed forward with caution. Something dripped onto his shoulder and his bare arm. It was as warm as water.
He touched her in the darkness.

Sticker. He smelled it. blood.

He looked up. The raptor was sitting on the pipes, just a few feet above his head. There was blood.
It bounces off his shoulders. She wondered if he’d been hurt. and then
He started to run, but the retort jumped out of his back and pushed him to the ground.

Gennaro was strong, he stood up, hit the retort and flew away.
concrete. When he turned around, he saw that the dog had collapsed next to him, breathing heavily.

Yes, he’s injured. Her leg hurts for some reason.

Kill him

Gennaro scrambled to his feet, looking for a weapon. The reporter was still cheering.
concrete. He looked for something to use as a weapon. When he changed
back, t he raptor was gone.

He shouted, raising his voice in the darkness.

Genaro turned a full circle and felt his outstretched arms. And then she heard something strange
Pain in his right arm.

teeth.

He was going to destroy it.


The man shook his head and Donald Gennaro slipped to his feet and fell.


Malcolm laid on the bed, sweating, listening as the radio played. "anything?" Mildred said.
"You got anything?"

"No word," Wu said. "Hell,"

"There was," Mildred said.

withdraw.

Malcolm sighed. "I can't wait," he said, "to hear his new plan."

"What | we want," Muldoon said, "is to get everybody home and back to normal. But | not
Look at the way."

"There's a jeep outside the auditorium," Wu said. "If | runs away from you, you can get
Inside yourself?"

"Maybe. But you're leaving the control room."

"I can't do anything here anyway."

"God knows it's true," Malcolm said. "A private home without electricity is not uncommon
The control room.”

"Okay," Mildred said. "Let's see. This is bad."

Laying back on his bed, Malcolm said, "No, it's not right. Sounds like an accident."

Wu said, "The team's coming right behind us."

"We're still good," Malik said. "Let's go."

The radio is turned off. Malcolm closed his eyes and breathed slowly as he regained his strength.

"Just relax," Ellis said. "Just make it easy."

“You really know what we’re talking about here,” Malik said. "To observe all this . . . .
We’re talking about five hundred years old Western ideas. They then started .
At the time Florence, Italy was the richest city in the world. Basic scientific idea - what
There was a new way to look at reality, that it was okay that it didn’t depend on your beliefs
Or your country, she thought—the idea was new and exciting at the time. He is .
promise and hope for the future;
10 years. Politics, religious beliefs, and hatreds of the medieval world
He fell in the face of science. But, in reality, this was because the medieval universe wasn’t working anymore.
It didn’t work economically, it didn’t work spiritually, and it didn’t fit the new world that was
which are produced.

Malcolm hesitated.

"But now," he continued, "science is a matter of belief that is centuries old. And as
Before the medieval system, science began to relate to the world. Science has
He gained so much power that his limits became apparent. Perhaps through science.
Billions of us live in one small, crowded, interconnected world. But science cannot
Help us decide what to do in this world or how to live. Science can build a nuclear reactor, but
He can’t tell us to stop it. Science can invent medicine, but it cannot tell us to use it. and
Our world is starting to get polluted in more fundamental ways—air, water, and soil—because
Inevitable knowledge." He sighed. "This much is obvious to everyone.”

There was silence. Malcolm was closing his eyes, his breathing labored. No one spoke up.
It was as if Malcolm had fallen asleep. Then he got up again, to the pole.

"At the same time, there has been a great deal of scientific interest. Since
The theory of Newton and Dickett clearly showed us the view of general observation. Science has
He ultimately sought the power to control everything through his understanding of the laws of nature. but
By the twentieth century, this claim had become irreparably damaged. First, Heisenberg
The uncertainty principle sets the limits on what we can know about the subatomic world. Oh, okay, we
state. None of us live in a world without atmosphere. It makes no difference how we go
in our lives. Later, the definition of G"del pushed limits on mathematics in a formal language.
science. Mathematicians used to think that their language had a special truth.
derived from the laws of logic. Now we know that what we call 'consciousness' is just a concept
game. It’s not as special as we thought.

"And now chaos theory implies that the impossible is built into our daily lives. It seems that the universe
Like the rain we cannot predict. So the most enlightened scientist of centuries -
The dream of total control is dead, in our century. And with it comes a lot of nuance, opinions.


For science to do what it does. And let's hear it. Science has always said that it cannot
You know everything now, but he will eventually. But now we see that this is not true. That’s gratitude.
Like a genius, and like a child who jumps off a building because he believes he can
fly."

"This is terrible," Hammond shook his head.

"We are witnessing the end of the scientific age. Science, like other ancient systems, is
He destroys himself. As he gains strength, he proves that he cannot control the force. because
Things are moving fast now. Fifty years ago, everyone was on the atomic bomb. that
was a force. No one could think anything of it. Nevertheless, only a decade after the bombing, we started
To obtain mathematical power. Genetic power is also stronger than nuclear power. And that’s in 2019.
Everybody’s hand. It will be in the gardeners’ box. presentations for students. cheap
labs for terrorists and dictators, and that forces everyone to ask the same question - what
should | Am I doing what I want? Science says it can't answer that question."

"So what's going on?" Ellie said.

Malcolm looked up. "Change."

"What prank?"

“All the big changes are like death,” he said. "You can't see the other side until you're there.
And he closed his eyes.

"Poor thing," Hammond shook his head.

Malcolm sighed. "Do you have any idea?"he said how it's impossible that you or any of us would
Did you get off this island alive?”


Sixth iteration.


"Restoring the system may be impossible."


Hi Malcolm
return


Its electric motor roared and the car lurched forward down the dark tunnel. Grant drove
His feet are on the ground. The tunnel was only marked by the occasional wind generator on top, shaded.
To protect from the rain, the system thus allows less light to penetrate. But he noticed that there were
There were white beasts in many places. Obviously there were a lot of animals here.

Sitting next to him in the car, Lex shone a flashlight on the back where the Velociraptor lay.
"Why is she having trouble breathing?"


"Because | he was shot with a tranquilizer," she said.

"Is she dying?" she said.

"|Hopefully not."

"Why would we take it?" Lex said.

"To show people in the middle class that dinosaurs are really active," Grant said.

"How do you know they're alive?"

“Because this is a young man,” Grant said. "And because he's a dinosaur boy." "is

it?" Lexi said as she stared into the lamplight.

"Yeah. Now you're turning on that light up front, aren't you?" She reached down and handed him her watch.
"What does it say?"

"She says... fifteen."

"ok."

"That means we only have forty-five minutes to compete against the club," Tim said.

"We need to get closer," Grant said. "I think we should get to the visitor center now."
He wasn't sure, but he figured out that the blade was slowly tilting upwards, leading them back
outside, and-

"Wow!" Tim said.

They fly through the sunlight with breathtaking speed. There was a light mist blowing in some places.
The building above them darkened. Grant immediately recognized him as a visitor.
between. They had reached the front of the garage!

"Yes!" Lexi shouted. "We did it! There!" She bounced up and down on the seat as Grant stood.
The car is in the garage. There were animal cages along a wall. They inserted the velostrator in one day.
with a glass of water. Then they started up the stairs towards the ground floor.
Visitor Center.

"I'm going to go get a hamburger! And fries! Chocolate milkshake! No more dinosaurs!"
Yay!" They came to the door and opened it.

So they shut up.


At the entrance to the visitor center, glass doors were broken and a dusty substance was blown away.
to the main tunnel. A symbol that reads when dinosaurs ruled the earth
At one point, she was screaming into the air. The giant Tyransaurus robot was awake and lying down.
Its legs are in the air, its tubes and metal insides exposed. Outside, inside, they saw
Rows of palm trees, shadows in the shade.

Tim and Lex approached the security guard at the metal desk. Grant picked up the guard's radio.
and view all channels. "Hi, this is Grant. Anyone there? Hi, this is Grant."

Lex stares at the body of the guard laying on the ground to the right. He couldn't see anything but
His legs and feet.

"Thank you, Grant. Thank you."

Lex was leaning forward, staring at the office door. Grant shook his hand.
"Hey. Stop it."

"Is he dead? What's that thing on the floor? Blood?"

"Yes."

"How is it not red?" "You're

morbid," Tim said.

"What's 'sick'? | I'm not."

The radio crackled. "My God," came a voice. "Grant? Is that you?"

And then: "God? God?" It was Ellie. "I'm here," Grant said.

"Thank God," Ellie said. "Are you okay?"

"I'm fine, yeah."

"What about the kids? Have you seen them?"

"| Children like me," Grant said. "You're good."

"Thank God."

Lex was fidgeting at the side of the desk. Grant tapped his hip. "Get back here."

The radio crackled. "-n Where are you?"

"In the stage. In the stage of the mansion."


On the radio, he heard Wu say, "My God. They're here."

“Alan, listen,” Ellie said. "The coaches let them go. They can close the doors. They can be
Like one house."

"Great. Where are you?" Grant said. "We're in S o."

Grant said, "And the rest? Mild, everyone else?"

"We lost a few people. But we sent everyone else home."

"And do the phones work?"

"No. The whole system is down. Nothing works."

'How can we fix the situation?'

"We tried."

"We've got to get it right now," said Grant, "if we don't do it in half an hour
It reaches the mainland."

He started to explain about the mountain when Myrtle cut him off. "I don't think you understand.
Dr. Grant. We don't have half an hour here."

"How about that?"

"There were a few teams behind us. We've got two now."

"So what? This house is untenable."

Muldoon snorted, "Apparently not. He didn't expect the animals to get up."
roof." The radio crackled. "-He must have planted a tree too close to the fence. The reps are gone.
Through the fence and up the building. Either way, the metal rod on the top light should be
There is electricity, but the power is off. They're smashing skylights."

Grant said, "Flirting in the woods?" He shrugged, trying to think it over, "How fast?"

"Yes," said Mildred, "their shit weighs fifteen thousand pounds an inch.
They're like rats, they can teleport and-" The transmission cut off for a moment.

"How fast?" Grant said again.

"I think we've got another ten or fifteen minutes before they're through," Mildred said.
He entered the house through the light above. And when they entered. . Ahhh, that's it.
Minister Dr. Grant."

The radio is turned off.


In the ceiling light above Malcolm’s bed, scratches chewed up the first strip of steel.
One report grabbed the end of the barrel and pulled it, pulling it back. He put on a strong back muscle.
The ceiling light and glass shattered, shining on Malcolm's bed below. Ellie reached it.
and remove large items from the plate.

"God, they're bad," Malcolm said, looking up.

Now that the glass was broken, they could hear the screams and yells of the retorts, screaming
Their teeth on the metal as they mixed the brownies. Where there were small areas of silver.
They were confused. Splashing saliva all over breakfast and bedside tables.

“At least they can’t get in yet,” Ellie said. “They’ll just have to break down at another bar.”

Woo said, "If only Grant could somehow get to the repair shop . . ."

"Bloody hell," Mildred said. He walked around the room on his broken leg. "Can't find
There too fast. He can’t get stronger quickly. To stop this."

Malcolm hesitated. "Yes." His voice was as soft as the wind.

"What did he say?" Mildred said.

"Yeah," Malcolm replied. "can. . ."

"What could happen?"

"Anxiety . . ." She shrugged.

"What kind of show?"

"Go to the fence. . ." "Yes?

And do what?"

Malcolm smiled weakly. "Stretch out your hands." "Oh

Jesus, Muldoon said, turning away.

"Hold on a minute," Wu said. "Sure. There's only two retorts here. That means they're
There are at least four more. We can go out and relax."

"And then what?"

"Then Grant can go to the accessories shop and fire up the engine."


"And then go back to the control room and start shooting?"

"exactly."

"No time," Mildred said. "There's no time."

"But if we can discourage the retorts here," Wu said, "maybe they'll get rid of them
The skylight. It can work. It's worth seeing."

"Grandpa," Mildred said.

"exactly."

"Who's going to be the anchor? I'm no good. I lost my leg." "sick

Do it," Wu said.

"No," Muldoon said. "You're the only one who knows what to do with the computer. You need
Talking to Grant through the start."

"Then I'll do it," Harold said.

"No," Ellie said. "Malcolm needs you. I will."

"Hell, | he didn't even think about it," Myrtle said. "You've got repeaters all around you, repeaters on the building. . . .

But he was already changing, lacing up his running shoes. "Just don't tell Grant," she said.
"That worries him."


The hallway was silent, the cool elements passing by. For several minutes, the radio went silent.
Tim says why aren't they talking to us?

"I'm hungry," Leake said.

"They're trying to strategize," Grant said.

The radio crackled. "Grant, y-nry Wu is talking. Are you there?" "I am

Here," Grant said.

“Listen,” Wu said. "Can you see the back of the traveler's room from where you are?"

Grant looked back through the glass doors at the palm trees and the grass. "Yeah," Grant

said.

Wu said, "There's a path that cuts through the trees to the training room, which is
Where electrical equipment and wiring are located. | Be sure you have seen the maintenance room.
yesterday?"

"Yeah," Grant said. Though he was momentarily confused. Just yesterday he checked.
Into the house? It seemed like years ago.

"Now listen," Wu said. "We thought we could get all the retorts here next door, but we
You are not sure. So be careful. Give us five minutes."

"Okay," Grant said.

"You can leave the kids in a restaurant and they should be fine. Don't take the radio with you
If you're leaving."

"ok."

"Turn it off before you go, so it doesn't make any noise outside. Call me when you can."
adoption home."

"ok."

Grant turned off the radio. Lex returned. "Shall we go to a restaurant?" she said.

"Yeah," Grant said. They got up and started walking through the mist that was blowing in the wind. "I

I want a hamburger," Leake said.

"|Don't think there's no electricity to cook with."

"Then ice cream."

"Tim, you have to keep helping him."

"I will."

"I have to go for a while," Grant said.

"|know."

They moved to the entrance of the cafeteria. The door opened and Grant saw the square dining room.
Then there are the tables and chairs and the swinging steel doors. On the side, a bill of exchange and a cover, and
Gum and Bombay.

"It's alright, kids. | You guys want to stay here no matter what. Understood?"

“Leave the radio on for us,” Lex said.

"| Can't. | Need to. Just stay here. I'll be gone in five minutes. Okay?"


"ok."

Grant closed the door. The restaurant went dark. Lex took his hand, "It's light."
The views,” he said.

"I can't," Tim said. "There's no grace." But he took out his other night light.

"That's fine with you. How about me?"

"Just hold my hand. We'll have something to eat." He let her go forward. He saw a green light.
Tables and chairs. On the right, a bright green bill of exchange and a cake with tooth and
A monkey. He grabbed some candy hands.

"| Told you," Lex said. "I prefer cream, not candy."

"Take this anyway."

"Ice cream, Timmy."

"No, no."

Tim stuffed the candy into his pocket and led Leica into the dining room. He touched
On his team. "I can't see the sun," she said.

"Just walk with me. Hold my hand."

"Then slow down."

Behind the tables and chairs were two sliding doors with small windows in them.
Maybe they went to the kitchen. He pushed open a door and it was wide open.


Ellie Sattler walked out the bedroom door and felt the cold mist on her face and
feet. Her heart was racing, even though she knew she was safe.
fence. Directly ahead, he saw heavy bands embedded in the material.

But he couldn't see much behind the wall. Twenty more places before the landscape.
It turns out to be white milk. And he hasn’t seen any retorts yet. Actually, there were gardens and trees.
He's almost silent. "Hey!" He screamed into the fog and tried.

Muldoon leaned against the doorframe. “I doubt that’s possible,” he said. “You should
noise. " He went out and picked up an iron bar that was under construction inside. He hit the bar
and bars like buffet dinners. "Come get her! Dinner's ready!"

"It's so funny," Ellis said. She glanced anxiously upwards. He didn’t see any retorts.

"They don't understand English." Mildred smiled. "But | suppose they get all the ideas. . .

He was still nervous and his sense of humor annoyed her. He visited the home of the visitors.
It’s close to the material. Muldoon hit the taps again. In the limits of his vision, he almost disappeared in 1914.
Through the mist he saw a clear animal. rept.

"Customer first," Mildred said.

The dog disappeared and the white shadow returned, but did not approach anyone.
He was close, he was.
Starting to worry. Unless he could lure the elders to their bedroom, Grant would be in danger.

"You're making a lot of noise," Ellis said.

'Bloody hell," Mildred said.

"No, you are."

"| Know these animals-"

"You're drunk," he said. "Let me handle it."

"And how do you do that?"

He didn't answer her. He went to the door. "They say retirees are smart."

"They're sweet. At least, like champagne."

"Are they okay?"

"Yeah, that's fine."

"Maybe they know this sound," he said and opened the door. Metal row, but off.
The mist there is already screaming. He closed it again and opened it with another creak.

He left it open.

"| wasn't doing that," said Myrtle. "You're going to do that, leave it alone. I'll take the launch."

"Get the printer."

She took a deep breath in her mind. "Genard has the guards."


"Well, then," he said. "Keep your eyes open." And he came in through the door from the outside.
Brushes. Her heart was beating so fast she could barely keep her feet on the dirt. He changed.
He quickly disappeared into the fog. Soon he disappeared behind her.

As he had expected, Muldoon started screaming at him in a fit of hysterics. "God damn it, girl."
Don’t do that,” he shouted.

"Don't call me 'girl,'" she whined.

"I'll call you everything | I want," Mildew cried.

He wasn't listening. As she turned slowly, her body was looking in all directions. He was
At least twenty yards from the bird now, he could see the mist drifting in like the light rain that had passed.
Leaves. He turned away from the leaves. He passed through the dark shadows of the world. that
The muscles in his legs and shoulders ached from the pressure. His eyes went wide.

"Can you hear me?" shouted Muldoon.

How cute are these animals? He wondered to himself. Okay to cut my time short? There was no
Far back on the mountain, it’s not.

They attacked.

There was no sound.

The first animal to return the leaves from the bottom of the tree to the left. moves forward and
He turned and ran. The second one attacks from the other side, obviously holding the
He ran, he flew through the air, his legs raised and he attacked, he ran like a broken racetrack, and
The animal collapsed in the dirt. Now he was running and couldn’t look back, his
Inhaling leads to deep breathing.
Muldoon threw open the door, saw him reaching for her, yelled at her, grabbed her arm and
He pulled so hard that he slipped off his feet and fell to the ground. And then he changed
Time to see the first, then the two-then tbree-animals are in the hut and howling.

"Good job," cried Mead. He was now teasing the animals, screaming and driving
Their name. They threw themselves at the wall, jumped forward, and one of them nearly managed to
above. "Col, that was hard! These bastards can fly!"

He rose to his feet, inspecting the scratches and wounds, blood streaming down his leg. everything
One could only think: Three animals here. And two above. That means one is missing.
Somewhere.

"Please help me," Mildred said. "Let's take care of them!"


Grant left the visitor’s center and moved forward quickly into the bubble. He found his way .
Palm trees followed it to the north, and above, a square maintenance building emerged from
Fog.

There was no door he could see at all. He continued walking around the corner. in the back,
screened by planting, Grant is a street lined with trucks. He stood up and faced her.
The vertical door, wrapped in armored steel, was locked. He jumped back down and continued.
Around the house. Far ahead, to his right, Grant saw an ordinary door. It was created
with men's shoes.

Grant went inside and hunched over in the dark. He listened, and heard nothing. He took
His radio was on.

"This is Grant," he said. "I'm inside."


Wu looked up at the light above. Two repeaters were peeping into Malcolm’s room, but they
He seemed to be forgotten by the sounds outside. She went to the window of the house. Outside, the three
the velociraptors continued to hunt. Eli was running back and forth, safely, behind her
Brushes. But it seemed like the Raptors weren’t serious about trying to get him. Now they’re like
Being playful, spinning off the wall, lifting up and screaming, then falling back down.
Use the gun and finish the charge. Their behavior took the characteristic form of expression.
rather than aggravated assault.

"Like birds," Mildred said. "Having a show."

Wu shook his head. "They're smart. They see they can't get it. They're not really trying."

The radio crackled. "-around."

Wu grabbed the radio. "Say that again, Dr. Grant?" "I am

Inside," Grant said.


"Doctor Grant, are you in the intensive care unit?"

"Yeah," Grant said. And he added, "Maybe you call me God."

"It's alright, God. If you stand in the doorway, you'll see lots of pipes and tubes."
Wu closed his eyes and looked at her, "Because there's a big hole in the middle of the
Two-story basement apartment. On your right is a railroad track and a shark."

"| Look at him."

"Go ahead and walk down the road."

"I'm going." He had a radio on his phone.

"After you've gone twenty or thirty meters you'll come to another road going off to the right." "I

Look,” Grant said.

"Continue this walkway."

"ok."

"If you keep going," Wu said, "you'll come to a set of stairs on your right. You go down into the pit."

"| Look at him."

"Go down the stairs."

There was a long pause. Wu ran his fingers through his damp hair and Muldoon frowned.

"Well, I'm moving," Grant said.

"Okay," Wu said. “Now, there should be two large yellow tanks in front of you.
It is marked 'fire." "

"They say, 'Fire.' And there's something at the bottom in Spanish."

"They are," Wu said. "These are two e-fuel tanks. One of the
It’s dry so we need to change into one. If you look below
Tanks, you see a white pipe coming out."

"PVSWS.- Four?"

"Yeah. PVC. Put this pipe on and it's going."

"Okay. I'm following her. . . Oh!"

"what happened?"

"Nothing. | I hit my head.” there

It was a build-up.

"Are you okay?"

"Yeah, it's fine. It just gave me a headache. Stupid."

"Keep following the pipe."

"Okay, okay," Grant said. He looked like he was angry. "Okay. The pipe goes in a big aluminum container
with vents in the corners. He says, 'Honda.' It's like an engine."

"Yeah," Wu said. "This is a producer. If you walk to the side, you see a plate."
Two buttons.”

"|Look at them. Yellow and red?"

"That's it," Wu said. "Press the yellow one first, then you're going to push it. Press the red
one."

"right."

There was another position. It lasted about a minute. Wu and Mid looked at each other.

"God?"

"It didn't work," Grant said.

"Did you grab the yellow first and then the red?" Wu asked.

"Yes, | I did," Grant said. He looked angry. "I'll do exactly what you told me. There was
A hum and a click, a click, very fast, and then the hum stopped and nothing after that."

"Try again."

"|He already did," Grant said. "It didn't work."

"Okay, just a minute." Wu frowned. "It's like the engine is trying to fire up but can't
For some reason. God?"

"I'm here."

"Go to the back of the engine where the paint hose runs."

"ok." In a scene; Then Grant said, "The pipe goes into a hollow black cylinder that looks like
Fuel pump."

"That's it," Wu said. "That's right. It's the fuel pump. Look for a small valve
above."


"Sometime?"

"It's supposed to be stuck at the top, with a little metal seat that you can twist."

"| He found it. But it's on the side, not on top."

"Okay. Shut it."

"The wind is coming up." "good.

Wait till-”

"Now it's coming out water. It smells like gas."

"Okay. Close the valve." Wu turned to Midwife, shaking her head. "The pump lost its prime. God?"

"Yes."

“Look at the buttons again.”

Moments later, Wie heard a small cough and wind as the engine revved and
Then a steady chugging sound like it’s been trapped. "It's on," Grant said.

"Good job God! Good job!"

"Now what?" Grant said. His voice was flat. "The lights aren't even on here."

"Go back to the control room and I'll talk to you about manually restoring the systems."

"Is that what | have to do now?"

"Yes."

"Okay," Grant said. "I'll call you when | get there." The screaming finally came, and then silence.

"God?"

The radio was dead.


Tim walked through the doors to the back of the restaurant and entered the kitchen. a
The large table in the center of the room has a large fireplace burning to the left, and
Then there are the large mobile fridges. Tim started opening the fridge to make ice cream.
Smoke billowed into the humid air as each one opened.

"How does a fire burn?" Lex said letting go of her hand.

"It's not."

"They all have little blue flames."

"These are pilot views."

"What's a pilot light?" They had electricity at home.

"It's nothing," Tim said, opening another fridge. "But that means | can cook something for you."
In the next fridge she found all kinds of stuff, milk cartons and vegetables and
lots of T-bone steaks, fish - but no cream.

"You still want ice cream?"

"I told you, did |?"

The next fridge was bigger. The door is solid steel with a wide horizontal piano. he
He grabbed the handle, opened it, and saw a moving insect. It was a whole room.
Cold cold.

"Tim.. ."

"Are you down a minute?" She said she was angry. "I'll try to make your cream.

"Timmy… there's something here."

He kept saying the kiss, and for a moment the last two words were not registered. Then Tim rushed
Back in the freezer, I saw the rim of glossy green smoke. Lexi was standing.
steel work table. He was looking in the kitchen.

He heard a hiss like a big snake. His voice rose and fell. I was
It won’t be long. It may have been the wind, but he somehow knew there wasn't.

"Tim," she whispered, "I'm scared."

He turned towards the kitchen and looked outside. In the dark restaurant, he
Table top arrangement of green rectangles. And walked among them, silent as
ghost except for its breathing sound, it was a velociraptor.


In the darkness of the maintenance room, Grant felt around the pipes and went back to
ladder. It was hard to find his way in the dark and somehow he found the sound
Product orientation. He came to the stairs and started to go up when he realized.
There was something else in the room than the sound of the generator.

Grant stopped and listened.


Only a man was crying.

It was like Genoa.

"where are you?" Grant shouted.

"Here here," Genaro said. "In the truck."

Grant couldn’t see any trucks. He squinted in the darkness. She looked back at him.
eye. He saw green things glowing and moving in the darkness. Then he saw the truck and he
He turned to her.


Tim saw the silence and froze.

The Velosraptor was six meters tall, and very built, even with pointed legs and a tail.
It’s hidden among the tables. Tim could only see the muscles of his upper body clenched in both hands.
Next to the body, the legs are spread out. He could see the glowing smiles.
back. Velliciraptor was cautious, shaking his head as he stepped forward.
With lizards that look like birds. The head was also moving up and down with a rapid length
tail dipped, causing a bird to frown.

A large, silent bird of prey.

The restaurant was dark, but it looked like the retrofit could use adequate lighting to move forward
forward. From time to time, he lowered his head and ducked his head under the tables. Tim heard a
A quick kiss. Then the head rises up and becomes as thick and straight as that of the bird.

Tim watched until he was sure Velociraptor was coming towards the kitchen. Was that the reason
Based on their smell? All the books said dinosaurs didn’t smell, but this
She seemed to be getting better. Anyway, what did the books know? This was the real deal.

and came towards him.

She went back into the kitchen.

"Is there something out there?" Lex said.

Tim didn't answer. He slammed it under a table in the corner, behind a large trash can. he
She leaned closer to him and whispered fiercely: "Stay here!" And then ran back to the fridge.

She grabbed a bite of cold meat and hurried back to the door. He dropped the first one.
The steaks were on the ground, and then he backed up a few paces and put down the second one. ...

Through his glasses he saw Lex peering around the haze. She turned behind her. He is .
Third meat, and fourth, going deeper into the kitchen.

The scream grew louder, and then a locked hand grabbed the door, and his big head looked back.
Be careful with the surroundings.

Velliciraptor stopped at the entrance to the kitchen.

Tim stood half-naked in the back of the room, near the long leg of the steel workbench. but
He hadn't had time to hide himself; His head and shoulders rose above the table;
He was in clear sight of the Velociraptor.

Slowly, Tim lowered his body and got down under the table. . . . Velostrator shook his head.
Looking around, he looked directly at Tim.

Tim froze. He was there, but he was thinking of making a change. that

The velociraptor stood in the doorway. A kiss.

It’s too dark in here, Tim thought. He can't see clearly. That makes it powerful.

But now he could smell the dragon and saw the glasses.
The dinosaur eats in silence, flicking its long snout to reveal rows of teeth. that
the velociraptor looked away again and shook his head to the side. Big eyes were rolling.
Pole bones.

Tim felt his heartbeat. In some ways it was cruel to deal with an animal like this inna
Kitchen, instead of an open forest. Size, fast movements, strong smell, screams.
breath...

Perhaps he was more afraid of the animals than Tyransaurus. Tyrannosaurus was
He was big and strong, but he wasn’t smart. Velostrator was about the size of a man and was
He is obviously quick and intelligent; Tim dreaded search terms as much as important teeth.

Velosrapport buried him. He moved on - from now on to the Lakers! He must smell it.
somehow! Tim's heart sank.

Velocirapport stopped. He gradually became interested.


He had a dream.

Tim wanted to bend over, look under the table, but he didn’t move. He was built of frost.
a half-crouch, listening for the sound of the crickets. He was being eaten by a dinosaur. Bones and all.

Rator raised his small head and looked around. He grieved. It’s a second dream. it
He moved forward quickly. He looked down.

silence.

The cake didn’t eat it.

The head came up. Tim’s legs burned from his pack, but he didn’t move.

Why didn’t the animal eat the second piece of meat? A dozen ideas flashed through his mind.
He didn’t like the taste of beef, he didn’t like the cold because the meat wasn’t good.
Alive, he smells like Jean, he smells like Lex, he smells like Tim, he's Tim

Velliciraptor is now moving faster. He found the third piece of meat, dug his head in and looked away.
Moving forward.

Tim caught his breath. The dinosaur was only a few feet away, and now Tim could see the tiny
It wraps around the muscles. He could see the red blood on the hands and feet.
He could see fine lines in the broken furniture and in the smooth skin.
The voice below the jaw.

Velosrapport buried him. He shook his head and looked at Tim. Tim almost gasped.
afraid. Tim's body was dry and wet. He watched the deer look around at the house.
Another kiss.

"He caught me," Tim recalled.

Then, the head jerked forward, and the animal went on to the fifth carcass. Tim
Thought, Lex please don't change please don't change anything please don't...

Velliciraptor shaped the meat and continued. She now had the freezer door open.
Tim was blowing smoke out of there and turning on the floor towards the animal's feet. one big
clawed foot lifted, and then lay silent again. The dinosaur is in doubt. Too cold, Tim thought.
He won’t go in there, it’s cold, he won’t, he won’t….

In came the dinosaur.

The head disappeared, then the body, then the tail.

Tim ran, threw his weight on the steel door, and slammed it shut.
He was smitten with the first thing! The door won’t close! Velostrator cried out in horror.
noise. Unconsciously, Tim took a step back, closed the door and
Hear it by clicking! It’s closed!

"Lex! Lex!" She was about to scream. He heard the rapper knocking on the door, heard him knock
Steel. He knew it had a metal plate in it, and if the retort hit it, it would
The door is open. They had to be settled. "Lexi!"

Lex was at his side. "what do you want!"

Tim leaned on the horizontal doorknob and held it shut. "There's a pin! Little pin! Get it.
Pine!”

Velostrator roared like a lion, and his voice was like sharp metal. It all fell apart.
The body is in the mouth.

"I can't see anything!" Lexi shouted.

The pin was placed next to the door handle, swinging on a thin metal rope. "Okay
there!"

"| I can't see it!" he cried, and then Tim realized he didn’t have his glasses on.

"Think of it!"

He saw her small hand reaching out to touch the pin and closer to him
He could tell how nervous she was, her breath scared as if she was holding onto Pin.
And Velostrator knocked on the door and it was open-God it was open-but no
He wasn't expecting it and went back for another look and Tim closed the door
further. Lex stepped back and reached into the darkness.

"|He has it!" Lex yelled, grabbing Pin by the arm and pushing him into the hole. She slipped.
Take it out again.

"From upstairs, downstairs!"

He grabbed it again, lifted it over the chain, swung it over the arm, and went down. In the city.

It’s closed.


Velostrator shouted. Tim and Lex return to the door as the dinosaur knocks.
Inside again. With each blow, the heavy steel walls creaked, but they held on. Tim didn't.
You think the animal might open the door.

The raptor was closed.

He let out a long breath. "Let's go," he said. he

She took his hand and they ran.


"You should have seen them," Jannard said as Grant escorted him out of the facilities
building. "It must have been twelve. Committee. | had to go in the truck to .
Stay away from them. They were all over the air. There we hide and wait like muscles.
But they fled when you came."

"Scavengers," Grant said. "They're not going to shoot anything that moves or looks powerful. They
Attack anything that is dead or dying. Either way, he's not moving."

They were now climbing towards the door.

"What happened to the retort that attacked you?" Grant said. "|Don't

Find out,” Janrod said.


"Did he leave?"
"| Not seen. | Gone, | Think because he's injured. | Think Meade is on his feet and he
Blood was coming out, he was here. then. . . | I don't know. Maybe he went back outside. It can be


die here. | I don't see it."
"And it's probably still here," Grant said.


Woo looked out of the bedroom window. They looked like they were still playing.
making a mock attack on Ellie. This behavior continued for a long time and came to
It’s too long. It seems they were trying to get Eli's attention, century.
He was trying to treat them the same way.

Wu had always taken the dinosaurs’ behavior for granted. And it’s good:
The behavior was second-order effects of DNA, such as protein folding. You were unpredictable.
Behavior, you can only control it in hard ways, like creating an animal.
It is associated with a food to protect an enzyme. But in general, behavioral effects
They couldn’t understand. You can’t look at the DNA sequence.
to predict behavior. That was impossible.

It was Wu’s DNA work test. It was just funny how
Today the craftsman can repair an old clock. You were doing something.
The past, something built with old materials and following old rules. You couldn’t
Learn why it works as it does, and was refined and refined countless times already
Developmental forces over time. So, as an operator that is triggered and then
Checks if the clock is running properly, Wie performs an adjustment, and checks to see if the animals
She pushed harder. And he only tried to correct bad behavior:
Electric fences or applying bark to tree trunks. These are the actions that sent him .
Back to the drawing board.

And the limits of his science left him with a secret sensor on dinosaurs.
park. He wasn't sure if the animals behaved.
Accurate history or not. Were they acting like they had in the past? It was open.
A question that cannot be conclusively answered.

Although Wu never admits it, he discovers that dinosaurs give birth.
This is a great validation of his work. The survival of the animal is important.
In a strict sense; It shows that Wu put all the pieces together well. It was-
He created a million-year-old animal in such a way that the animal could
Not living in himself.

But, still, looking at the retorts from the outside, he was concerned about their condition.
The raptors were smart, and smarter animals got nervous quickly. Intelligent animals have also evolved
plans, and-

Harding left Malcolm’s room and went into the hallway. "Where's Ellie?"

"Still outside."

"You better put it on. The guards are out in the light from above."


"when?" Wu said walking towards the door.

"It's not just a moment," Harold said.

Wu opened the front door. "Ellie! Inside now!"

She looked at him, confused. "No problem, everything is under control..."

"now!"

She shook her head. "I know what I'm doing," she said.

"Now, Ellie, damn it!"

Muldoon didn't like standing there with the door open, he almost said;
He saw a shadow fall from above, and now he understood what had happened. Wu was
Body out the door, Muldoon heard Ellie scream. Mildred reached the door and
When he looked up, he saw that Wu was lying on his back, his body pressed against the deer.
And the retort was shaking his head as he sucked in Wee's breath, even though Wee was still alive
He raises his hands and crushes the huge skull he was eating as he
He’s still alive, and then Ellie stops screaming and starts running through the fence, and
Muldoon closed the door as he looked around nervously. It happened quickly!

Harding said, "Did he fall off the roof?"

Muldoon shook his head. He went to the window and looked outside and saw three meals.
was now running outside the fence. But they were not following Eli.

They were going back, towards the launch pad.


Grant came to the door of the maintenance room and peered ahead into the fog. He could
He heard the retorts scream and it sounded like they were getting closer. Now he could see them.
Bodies running in front of him. They were going to the auditorium.

He turned back to Gennaro.

Gennaro shook his head, no.

Grant leaned in and whispered in his ear. "There's no choice. We have to turn on the computer."

Grant stepped out of the fog.

After a moment, Zener followed.


Eli didn't stop to think. When the retorts fell off the fence and fell into the w
He ran as fast as he could towards the end of the room. There was a fifteen-meter
It is high between the fence and the house. He ran, he didn’t hear the animals chasing him, just
He listened to his own breathing. He rounded the corner and saw a tree growing beside the house.
And he jumped up, grabbed a branch of a tree, and stood up. He wasn't afraid. He felt a sense of happiness as
He saw her feet and lifted them up in front of him and put them on a branch
farther up, clutching his belly, and stood up quickly.

He was twelve meters below and the Reapers were still not behind him and he
He was about to relax when he saw the first animal in the woods. mouth
He was covered in blood and had chunks of flesh hanging from his mouth. He walked away quickly and waved.
Hand, he can go, he can see the top of the building. She looked down.
further.

Two retorts were climbing the tree.

Now that he was on the rooftop, he could see the cliff only four feet away and
By the lights above the glass pyramid, there was a door on the city ; He could
Go inside. In a great effort, he threw himself into the air and fell
Grotto. He scratched his face, but somehow the only feeling was pleasure, like
The game he played, he wanted to win. He ran to the door leading to
Centuries later, he could still hear the retorts shaking the tree branches. They were still
Inside the tree.

He reached the door and turned the knob. The door was seated.

It took a while for that meaning to cut into his mood. The door was seated.
He was on a horse and couldn’t get off. The door was seated.

He pounded on the door with his heart, then ran upstairs, hoping that
See a trail below, but only the green edge of the pool was exposed by the wind
mist. All around the pool was paved. Twelve feet of concrete. He's more
Jump through. Not another tree to climb down. There are no stairs. There is no fire escape.


nothing.

Ellie turned and flew the retorts easily up the roof. He ran away.
He hoped there might be another door, but there wasn’t.

People slowly approached him, followed him, and slid silently between the glass pyramids.
She looked down. The edge of the pool was ten meters away.

It’s too long.

The retorts were getting closer and closer, and he thought: Isn't this always
way? A few small mistakes ruin it all. He was still dizzy, he was still happy, and he
Somehow he couldn't believe these animals were coming, he couldn't believe that now his
Life was coming to an end for you. It seemed impossible. It was in some sort of protective
Happiness. He didn’t believe it would happen.

the Raptors cheered. Ellie returned and moved him to the end of the roof. He took a deep breath.
And then he started running towards the door. As he ran to the side, he saw the snail.
The pool, he knew was too high but he figured, hell, he jumped up.

And he collapsed.

and with terrible confusion he felt himself surrounded by coldness. He was in the water. it
He would! He came to the surface and looked up, he saw the retorts watching
Get down on it. And he knew that if he could do it, the Reps could too. He changed the air.
Water and thinking, can reptiles swim? But he was confident they could. Probably
Swim like pirates.

The guards turned from the door of the house. And then she heard Harold calling
"Sater?" She realized that he had opened the door to the room. The cakes were moving towards her.

He quickly climbed out of the pool and ran towards the bedroom.


Harding had climbed the stairs to the attic twice at once and opened the door though
Thinking. "Sater!" she screamed. And then he stopped. There was a mist between the firmids on the roof.
The retorts were out of sight.

"Sater!"

She was so worried about Stirling that it wasn't long before she realized her mistake. he
He must be able to see the animals in his mind. In the next hour, a wrist nail was broken.
Near the door, he felt a pain in his chest;
Pulling back and closing the door with his hand, he heard it from downstairs.
Muldoon said, "He's here. He's already inside."

From the other side of the door, the redhead screamed, Harding banged on the door again, and
Fingernails tugged, he closed the door with a metallic clang and examined.
down.


"Where are we going?" Lex said. They were watching from the second floor. Glass-
The wall ran the full length of the building.

"To the boardroom," Tim said.

"Where's that?"

"Down here somewhere." Tim looked at the names written on the doors as he walked past.
they. These seemed to be offices: Park Ward guest services. .. general
Leader... Supervisor...

They came in a glass case marked with the following symbol:


Open space
Authorized users only


Beyond this point.


There was a security card, but Tim just opened the door.
"How was it created?"
"It's over," Tim said.


"Why are we going to the control room?" she asked.

"To get a radio. We need to call someone."

Outside the glass door, the hall stretched on. Tim remembered this place, he was looking at her.
He was there during the tour. Lex hopped beside him. In the distance they .
reports. It looked like the animals were getting closer. Then Tim heard their gasp.
The glass is on the floor.

"They're there . . ." Lex whispered.

"never mind."

"What are they doing here?" Lex said.

"On it now."

Park Ranger... Operations... Chief Supervisor...

"Here," Tim said. He shut the door. The control room looked exactly as he had seen it.
before. In the center of the room was a console with four chairs and four computer screens. that
All the rooms were dark except for the televisions, which displayed colored rectangles.

"So where's the radio?" Lex said.

But Tim had forgotten all about radio. He stepped forward and stared at the computer screen.
The screens were on! This cannot mean -

"The power must be returned... ."

"Ick," Lex said as he shifted his body.

"what."

"|was in someone's name," he said.

Tim wasn't awake when they walked in. He looked behind him and saw only ears.
He was lying on the ground.

"It's really weird," Leake said.

"never mind." He turned to the reporters.

"Where's the rest?" she said.

"Don't be anything now."

He looked at the TV intently. There was an array of colored symbols on the screen:


"Well don't cheat on that, Tim," she said.

"Don't worry, | won't happen."

Before he saw expensive computers as sitting in homes
His father worked on it. These computers controlled everything from elevators and security to
Heating and cooling systems. They looked like this - different colored dots - but they
It was easy to understand. And there was almost always a sign of help, if needed.
Learning Kenko, however, is not helpful here. He checked again to be sure.

But then he saw something else: numbers clicking in the upper right corner of the screen. they
Read 10:47:22. Then Tim realized it was time. It was only thirteen minutes.
boat-but he was worried about the people in the house.

There was a cross. He turned around and saw Lex holding a radio. He was spinning.
buttons and dials. "How does it work?" she said. "I can't work."

"Give me that!"

"It's mine! | I got it!" "Like

To me, Lexi!" "I can use it.

first!"

"Lexi!"

Immediately, Radio Fora. "What's going on!" Muldoon’s voice said.

Suddenly, Lex dropped the radio.


Grant turned and leaned his head between the palm trees. Through the fog in front of him he could see
raptors hopping and snarling and they’re banging their heads against the roof of the lions. but,
In between shouts, they would open their mouths and raise their heads, as if listening for something far away.
And then they would make little noises.


"What are they doing?" Gennaro said.

"It looks like they're trying to get into the cafeteria," Grant said. "What's in the restaurant?" "I

left the children there. . ." Grant said.

"Can they break this glass?"

"|Don't even think about it, no."

Grant looked around, and suddenly he heard the crackle of a radio wire and the repeaters began
hopping in a dangerous way. They started running after each other, until
Eventually spotting the first of them, he jumps to the second floor and from there to
in the second floor of the Visitor Center.


In the control room on the second floor, Tim picks up the radio that Lex dropped. he
Press the button. "Thank you? Thank you?"

"-s that you, Tim?" It was Muldoon’s voice.

"I am, yes."

"where are you?"

"In the control room. The power is on!"

"All right, Tim," Muldoon said.

"If someone tells me to, I'll do it." There was silence.

"Hello?" Tim said. "Did you hear me?"

"Ahh, we have a problem with that," Mood said. "No one, uh, anyone here knows how to do that
that. How shiny computers are."

Tim said, "What, are you kidding? No one knows?" It seemed strange.

"No." is built. "I think that's one thing about being a big network. Being a big network... you
You doing anything to the computer, Tim?"

Tim stared at the screen. Lex slapped him. "Say yes, Tim," she said.

"Yeah some. | Know something," Tim said.

"Maybe try," Muldoon said. "Nobody knows what he's doing. And Grant doesn't know
On computers.”

"Okay," Tim said. "I'll try." He turned off the radio and stared at the screen to read.

"Tim," Leake said. "You don't know what you're doing."

"Yes | do."

"If you know, then do it," Leake said.

"Just a minute." As a way to start, he pulled the chair closer to the keyboard and pressed
Turtle owners. These are the buttons that surround the circuit on the screen. But nothing
done. Then he pushed the other buttons. The screen did not change.

"good?" she said.

"Something's wrong," Tim said, his eyes dry. "You

I just don't know, Tim," she said.

He checked the computer again and scrutinized it. The keyboard had an array of functions.
Above the keyboards, like a normal computer keyboard, the camera is large and colorful. but
The control room was unusual. Tim looked at the edges of the screen and saw several errors.
Red light zones.

red light, around the border of the screen. .. What could that be? He wiggled his finger.
He walked towards the light and saw a red glow on his skin.

He touched the screen and heard a beeping sound.


After a while, the message box disappeared and the home screen flashed again.

"what happened?" Lex said. "What did you do? Touch something."

of course! She thought. She was touching the screen. It was a touchscreen! Red lights.
There should be infrared sensors around the edges. Tim had never seen a screen like this, but he read it.
about them in the magazines. He touched it.

RESET/REVERT.

Suddenly the screen changed. She got a new message:


Computer will now be configured
Make your choice on the main screen.


On the radio, they heard the retorts screaming. "| I want to see," Leak said. "You should
See VIEW."

"No, Lexi."

"Well, | I want VIEW," he said. And before he could raise his hand, he pressed VIEW.
The screen changes.


"O-oh," she said.

"Lex, will you cut it?"

"see!" she said. "It worked! Still."

Around the room, the observers quickly changed the appearance of the various parts of the park;
Most of the photos were gray due to the fog outside, but one shows the outside
In the living room, a dog is on the ceiling.
pointing to a boat in bright sunlight

"What was that?" Tim said as he leaned forward.

"what?"

"This picture!"

But the picture had already changed, they could see the inside of the room, one.
In the back of a room, then he saw Malcolm lying on a bed-

"Stop it," Leake said. "| Look at you!"

Tim touched the screen several times, accessing submenus. Then some menus.

"Hang on," Leake said. "You're messing it up... ."

"Shut up! You don't know anything about computers!"

Now he had a line of drawings on the screen. One of these was listed as SAFARI LODGE: LV2- .
4. Another was REMOTE: ship (VND). He clicked the screen several times.

Video images came on the TVs around the room. One showed the side of a mountain of goods.
and the sea front. In the distance, Tim could see earthen houses along the beach, and the harbour. he
He knew the port because he used to fly over it in a helicopter back in the day. I was
Puntarenas. It looked like the boat was only a few minutes away from docking.

But his attention was drawn to the next screen, showing the ceiling of the Safari Room;
Gray fog. The reptiles were behind the pyramids, but their heads were raised and
down, to come to light.

And then, on the third screen, he could see into a light. Malcolm was lying in bed and
Eli stands beside her. They were both staring at the sky. While they were looking, Mildred entered.
And he joined them, looking up with an expression of concern.

"They see us," Leake said.

"|Don't worry."

The radio crackled. On the screen, Muldoon raised the radio to his lips. "Hello, Timmy?"

"I'm here," Tim said.

"Oh, we haven't got much time," Muldoon said dryly. “Better turn on that power grid.”
Then Tim hears the screams of the retorts and sees a tall head fall.
Glass, entering the picture from above, tightened his jaw.

Quick, Timmy!" Lex said. "Turn on the lights!


network;
Tim suddenly found himself lost in a jumble of screen controls while trying to


Back to the big screen. Most systems had only one button or one command to go back.
previous screen, or go to the main menu. But this behavior wasn’t—or at least wasn’t—known. also,


He was sure there were help messages logged in the system, but he couldn't find them.
Or else, and Leica was jumping up and screaming at the top of her voice, which annoyed her.

In the end he won the grand prize. He didn't know what he did, but he succeeded. he
paused, looking for a word.

"Do something, Tim!"

"Are you going to shut up? I'm trying to get help." He grabbed the MAIN-TEMPLATE property. The screen is full.
A more complex table, with boxes and arrows.

Not useful. Not useful.

He grabbed the COMMON INTERFACE property. The screen changed:


"What is that?" Lex said. "Why don't you turn on the curtain, Tim?"
She ignored him. Support systems on this system are often called "data." He received the INFO.


"Tim-ee," Lex cried, but he was already holding FIND. He found another window that wasn’t that useful. he
He pushed her back.


Over the radio, he heard Muldoon say, "How's it coming, Tim?" He didn't bother to answer.
Danger, he pressed the buttons one after the other.
Suddenly, without warning, the main screen returned.


He studied television. The main circuit and SETGRIDS DNL both seemed to be able to
There is something about rails. He noted that safety/health and stricter lockdowns can
It's important, too. He heard the retorts scream. He had to make a choice. He pressed
SETGRIDS DNL, ​​and when he saw it:


He didn't know what to do. He pressed the STANDARD PARAMETERS property.


Standard settings.


Park Rail B4-C6 Outdoor Rail C2-D2.
Solution Grade BB-07 Plate Grade R4-R4.
Lori Grades F4-D4 Mantle Grades E5-L6

Main grid C4-G7 Sensor grid D5-G4.
The effective network of AH-B5 The core network of AlCl


Individual circuit not tested.
Security networks remain autonomous.


Tim shook his head heartily. It took him a moment to realize that he was .
Important Information. At least he knew some ways around the lodge now! He pushed relay F4.


PowerGrade F4 (Safari Lodging)


COMMANDS cannot be executed. Error-505
(POWER is not compatible with COMAND ERROR.
See page 4.09-4.11)


"It's not working," Leake said.
"|Know!" He pressed another button. The screen flashed again.


D4 Power Grid (Safari Lodge).

COMMANDS cannot be executed. Error-505
(POWER is not compatible with COMAND ERROR.
See Manual Page 4.09-4.1 1)


Tim tried to calm down and think about it. For some reason it kept getting a big error
Each time the message tried to click on a grid. He said that the government and
He was giving the order. But what does that mean? Why were there power imbalances?

"Tim . . ." Lex said, taking her hand.

'Not now, Lexi."

"Yeah, now," he said and took it off the screen and off the console. And then a
He heard the retorts scream.

He was going outside.


The skylights above Malcolm’s bed were about to bite the second metal bar.
Now they could stick their heads fully into broken glass and jump and scream
People on the ground. Then after a while they would withdraw and start chewing on the eggs.
"It won't be long now, three or four minutes," Malcolm said. He pressed the radio button:
"Tim, where are you? Tim?"
There was no answer.


Tim peeked out the door and saw the Velociraptor at the end of the corridor, standing there.
the balcony, he looked around in surprise. How did it get out of the freezer?

Then, as he looked, a second raptor sounded, and he realized.
The report had not yet aired. He was going outside. He was flying out.
Down, down. The second knee landed silently, balanced on the carpet. Tim couldn't
Believe in that. The huge creature plunged ten straight feet into the air. More than ten feet. Their legs should be .
It’s very powerful.

Lexi whispered, "I thought you said they couldn't-."

"Shhh." Tim was trying to think, but he was looking at her with a look of horror as the third
the raptor flew to the ballet. The animals milled about in the road for a while and then
They started moving forward in single file. Coming over to her and Lex’s side.

Silently, Tim slammed the door behind him and stepped back into the control room. But da
was stuck. He finished the silence.

"We're locked outside," Lex whispered. "see." He showed the security card cover.
Near the door. A bright red dot glowed. In some ways, the security gates were activated.
"You idiot, you locked us outside!"

Tim looked down the corridor. He saw a lot of doors, but all of them had flashing red lights.
side. That means all doors are locked. There was nowhere else they could go.

Then he saw something down at the end of the aisle. It was the dead guard. a
Attached to his waist was a white security card.

"Come on," she whispered. They ran into the garage. Tim gets the card, and returns. but
But when the people saw them, they screamed and blocked the road to the control room.
They started spreading apart, blowing air out of the way and surrounding Tim and Lex. Their heads.
He started to fall into a rhythm.

They were going to attack.


Tim did the only thing he could. Using the card, he opened the nearest door to his room.
And holding Lexus. The door slowly began to close behind them, the reptiles screamed and
Paid.


Logic


lan Malcolm took each breath as if it would be his last. He looked at the retorts with wide eyes.

Harding took his blood pressure, frowned, and took it again. Ellie Sattler was buried in the cemetery;
Shivering and cold. Muldoon sat down on the floor and leaned against the wall. Hammond was looking

Above, there are no words. They all listen to the radio.

"What happened to Tim?" Hammond said. "Still no word?"

"|I don't know."

Malcolm said, "They're ugly, aren't they. Really ugly."

Hammond shook his head. "Who would have thought it could be like this."

Ellie said, "Looks like Malcolm did."

"|I haven't thought about it," Malcolm said. "I figured."

Hammond was pleased. "This won't happen again, please. He says I told you hours ago. But."
Nobody wants this to ever happen."

"It's not something you want or don't want," Malcolm said with his eyes closed. She spoke slowly to
Drugs. "It's something you think you can do. When the butcher goes out in the rain
in the forest to search for food for his family, does he dare to take over the settlement? No, he thinks the seat is
The back. It was beyond his comprehension, and he couldn’t reach it. He may be praying for the community,
The nature of the forest that sustains it. He prays because he knows he is not in control. He's
His mercy.

"But you decide you're not going to be at the mercy of the community. You decide to take control of the community and get out
Then you’re in deep trouble, because you can’t do it. However, you have built some systems.
Ask you to do it. And you can't do it-and you never have-and you never will. Don't confuse
stuff. You can build a boat, but you can’t build the ocean. You can build an airplane, but you
can't wind up. You are less powerful than you dream.
believe."

"It ruined me," Hammond said with a sigh, "where's Tim gone? He looks like
Calm boy."

“I believe he’s trying to control the situation,” Malcolm said. "Just like everyone else."

"And Grant, too. What happened to Grant?"


Grant arrived at the back door of the ambulance service, which he left for twenty minutes.
before. He grabbed the hand: it was closed. Then he saw a small red light. Security
The doors were working again! damn! He ran to the front of the house and crossed
He pushed through the front doors into the department and stood next to the guard's desk where he had been before.
He could hear the dry hum of his radio. He went to the chicken coop, looking for the children, but.
The restaurant was closed and the kids had left.

He went upstairs, but came to the glass where the closed area was marked and the door was
It’s closed. He needed a security card to travel farther.

Grant could not enter.

From somewhere in the alley he heard the screams of the retorts.


The dragon's fur touched Tim's face, claws tore through his shirt, and Tim fell on his back.
She cries out in fear.

"Timmy!" Lexi shouted.

Tim scrambled to his feet again. Baby Velociraptor sits on his shoulders, cooing.
She cries out in fear. Tim and Lex were in White foster care. On the floor were the toys: spinning
Yellow balls, dolls, and plastic glitter.

"That's a baby raptor," Lex said, pointing at the creature clinging to Tim's shoulder.

The giant burrowed his head into Tim's neck. Maybe poor thing was starving Tim
thought.


Lex pulled him closer and the boy jumped onto his shoulder. He whispered into her throat. "Why is it
Would you do that?" she said. "Is he scared?”

"| I don't know," Tim said.

He walked past the raptor to Tim. The baby was screaming and screaming and jumping.
and leaning over his shoulder happily, he watched her head move rapidly. Without a doubt
That little detail worked and-

"Timmy," Lex whispered.

The door didn’t close as they entered the nursery. Now, mother
the velociraptors were coming. First, then second.

The baby was obviously crying and jumping on Tim’s shoulder. Tim knew he had to.
far. The child will probably work them out. After all, he’s a kid. She pulled out the small
The animal was removed and thrown into the house. The baby ran between his legs.
Adults. The first goat put his nose in and sucked the baby carefully.

Tim took Lex's hand and pulled him into the nursery. He had to find a way to
leave-

There was a loud cry. Tim looked back and saw the boy in the older man's jaw. a
A second velostrator came forward and ripped the baby’s legs off, trying to pull it out
The first day. The two friends wrestled over the baby while she screamed. Blood boils.
He falls to the ground.

"They ate it up," Leake said.

The monsters fought over the other children, rearing back and kicking heads. Tim is
The door—was open—and he walked through, dragging Lex after him.

They were in another room, and she realized it was outside.
DNA extraction laboratory, high-resolution array acoustic microscope
A screen showing large black and white images of insects. The teeth and claws that were.
Dinosaurs bit millions of years ago and sucked the blood, which was now being used to recreate
Dinosaurs in the Park. They ran into the lab and Tim could hear the wheezes and sniffles
People chase them, approach them, and then go behind the lab and pass.
There should have been an alarm at the door, because in the narrow corridor the siren sounded intermittently.
shrilly, and the lights overhead flickered brighter and brighter. While running, Tim fell.
Going into the darkness and then into the light again, the sound of an alarm, he heard the dogs howling.
snort as they followed him. Lex was screaming and screaming. Tim saw another door ahead and
He knocks on the door and walks past, and suddenly.
Then something big hit and Lex screamed in fear.

"Calm down, kids," a voice said.

Tim stared in disbelief. Dr. Grant was upstairs. Next to him was Mr. Gennaro.


Outside in the corridor, it took Grant about two minutes to realize the guard was dead
He probably had a security card . He comes back and gets it and puts it on top.
Cordova, to go quickly to Core. He followed the sound of the retorts and found the Soldiers .
They fight in the palace. He was sure the kids would go next door and
Now run back to the production lab.

And there he met the children.

Now the repertoire was coming at them. The animals seemed to hesitate for a moment.
He was surprised at how many people showed up.

Grant patted the kids on Genora's arm and said, "Get them somewhere safe."

"but-"

“There,” Grant said, looking over his shoulder in the distance.
room, if you can. You should all be safe there.”

"What are you going to do?" Gennaro said.

People stood near the door. Grant noticed that they waited until all the animals.
together, and then they moved forward as a team. Easter butchers. She shuddered.

"|There's a plan," Grant said. "Now fire away."

Gennaro sends the kids off. The retorts continued slowly to Grant, passing
Large computers, rather than monitors that are still touched at the computer


Code. People came forward without hesitation and grieved the village and repeatedly approached
The heads.

Grant heard the door slam behind him and glanced over his shoulder. Everyone was standing
On the other side of the glass door, look at him. Genaro shook his head.

Grant knew what that meant. There was no door to the control room beyond that. Gennaro et al.
The children were trapped there.

He felt so alone now.


Grant slowly pulled away, circled around the lab, away from Gennaro and
Children. There could have been another door near the front marked TO LABORATORY.
Whatever that means. He had an idea, and he hoped it was right. The door was in blue.
Biohazard markers. The retorts were getting closer. Grant turned and knocked on the door and
He walked away, and there was a deep, hot silence.


She turned away.

Yes.

Where he wanted to be, where he wanted to be: under red lights, with long tables and aisles
Eggs and some mist. The figures on the tables were shuffled and blown away.
The mist rose from near the tables and onto the floor, where it disappeared.
It’s hard.

Grant immediately ran to the back of the bathroom and into a glass-walled lab lit by green light.
His clothes were shining. He looked around and looked at the glass, a bowl full of glass, glass.
dishes . . . All laboratory equipment.

The retorts entered the room slowly at first, sniffing the damp air and looking into the distance
Sliding Side Tables. The animal who wiped the blood from his mouth on the back of his hand. in silence.
The figures passed between the long tables. Animals were passing through the house.
In a more orderly way, stopping by from time to time to check on the tables.

They were looking for it.

Grant focused, moved to the back of the lab, looked up and saw the metal box.
It is symbolized by a skull and bones. A sign said WARNING toxic animal A4.
There are needs. Grant thought the Regiment had said they were in power.
Poisons. Only a few molecules are directly killed. . . .

Kate was sitting on the lab table. Grant couldn't put his hand in her ass.
He tried to open it, but there was no door, no handles, no path he could see. . . . Grant Ross
Slowly, and looking right at the main room. Executives kept walking between the tables.

He turned to the captain. It was a metallic jar lying on the table. It's like
such as a closed outdoor circuit. He lifted the lid and saw a button.
He pressed it.

With a soft yelp, Capone flew higher and higher.

He saw crystals above and rows of bottles marked with skulls and bones. he
Try to install: CCK-5 5... Tetipa-Alpha Secretion .. . Tymolevin X-1612. ... o
The liquid glows whitish green in green light. Nearby, he saw a bowl with a spring.
The plums were small, each with a small amount of sparkling water. It depends.
blue darkness, Grant reached out and grabbed the prince. The needles on the syringes are capped.
Lightning. He pulled a cap out of his teeth. He looked at the small chair.

He stepped forward. As for the retorts.

He has spent his life studying dinosaurs. Now he sees how he really is.
a. Velociraptors were small carnivorous dinosaurs, like oviraptors and dromaeosaurs.
Animals long thought to steal eggs. As some new birds eat the eggs of others.
Birds, Grant always assumed velociraptors would eat dinosaur eggs if they could.

He shuffled over to the table closest to his range. Slowly, he raised his hand out of the mist.
He took a big bite from the shaking table. The side could have been used for football cream.
Colored with a small pink stripe. She held the egg carefully as she inserted the needle.
and inject the contents of the syringe. The egg glows blue.

Grant fell again. He saw the retorts’ legs under the table and the mist running
Drop down from the top of the table. He rolled the glowing egg across the ground towards the demons. that


the raptors looked up, hearing a small buzzing sound as the egg rotated and shook their heads.
Then they slowly began their search.

Fen stopped at several locations in the nearby Retort.

damn!

Grant did it all over again: reaching for an egg before lowering it, injecting it and swirling it around.
As for the retorts. This time, the egg came to rest on the leg of one Velociraptor. She shuddered.
Press it with the big toenail.

The reporter looked up in surprise at this new gift. He focused and listened to the glitter of the egg. it
He rolled the egg with his nose on the ground for a while.

And he didn’t mind.

Velociraptor rebuilt and slowly moved forward, continuing the search. it

It wasn't working.

Grant took the third egg and used fresh burritos. He grabbed the shiny egg.
His hands, turning k . But he spun this one quickly like a ball. Power is out.
Going downstairs is absolutely necessary.

An animal hears the noise, sees it coming, and gives chase.
Something moving, quickly tasting between the tables, grabbing the egg and swirling it around. Beaks
It was struck and bitten in the stomach, shattering the rock.

The report stops, a white album is falling out of his mouth. He stroked his lips noisily, frowning. He’s
and dropped the egg on the ground, but he wasn’t worried at all. He was blocked.
Eating broken eggs again. Grant looked up to see what was going on. . . .

From across the room, Gnome spotted him. He was looking at her.

Velliciraptor screamed in horror. He turned toward Grant, then crossed the room at length.
A surprisingly quick step. Grant was shocked to see that happening when he suddenly froze in fear.
The creature made a sound of breathing and the mystery roared, and the huge body lifted him off the ground.
The heavy tail hit the ground with a thud. The report continued to make sounds.
punctuated by loud screams at times. Death comes out of his mouth. The head fell backwards.
And go. Tail snapped and snorted.

It’s the same, Grant thought.

But he wasn’t going to die soon. It seemed to take forever to die. Grant looked away.
egg-and saw that the other retorts in the room had been burned in the middle. They listened to the story.
on a dying animal. One raised his head, then another and another. The first animal .
He moved to look at the fallen reporter.

The dying retort was now trembling, and the whole body on the floor was shaking. She made obnoxious screams.
So much saliva came out of his mouth that Grant could no longer see the head. He left
He hit the ground and screamed again.

The second person focused on the fallen animal and examined it. He seems confused about this
Death is . He looked at the warm head and down at the whimpering tongue.
nerves and feet, .. .

And he took a bite in the back leg.

The dying animal howled and raised its head and spun it around and sunk its teeth into the ground.
on his attacker.

That’s two, Grant thought.

But the animal stood still. Blood gushed from his neck. She patted him on the back.
claws, and with one movement, tore open the fallen animal’s throat. The officers
The intestines fell out like fat sheep. The screams of the dying cake filled the room. attacker
He turned away, as if the fight had suddenly become more difficult.

She crossed the room and lowered herself to the glittery egg! Grant looked at him as
raptor bit into it, the shiny object disappearing from his hand.

That makes two.

The second knee was immediately hit, diagnosing and springing forward. It seems like it will
He knocked on a table. There were dozens of eggs spinning everywhere on the floor. Grant tried them last year.
disappointment.

There was still a third cake.


Grant had one pair of socks. If the center of mass revolves around the ground, it should be
Another thing. He was trying to decide what he was going to do when the last of the animals spat with rage. grant
looked up- said the reporter.

The last retort didn't move for a long time, just staring. And then came the slow
forward. Not looking for it. He goes up and down, looking first at the shadows of the tables, then at the tops of them. it
He moved easily, and carefully, without the speed he showed at the club. a
One animal now, he was careful. He never took his eyes off Grant. Grant looked around quickly.
There was no place where it could fit. He has nothing to do…

Grant's eyes were fixed on the raptor as he walked slowly to the side. Grant moved too. He tried to
He kept several tables between himself and the advancing animal. slowly . . . slowly ...
He moved to the left…

The knee pushed forward into the dark red embryo. His breath came in a low moan.
Through the nose tubes.

Grant broke the eggs at his feet, yellow sticking to the soles of his shoes. he
He focused, feeling the radio bulge in his pocket.

Radio.

He pulled it out of his pocket and lit it.

"Hi. This is Grant."

"God?" Eli's voice. "God?"

"Listen," he said softly. "Just talk."

"Alan, is that you?"

"Talk," he said again, slamming the radio to the ground, away from her, and going.
Report in Progress.

He leaned back at the foot of the table and waited.

"Alan, speak to me, please."

Then a crack and silence. The radio went silent. The reporter stepped forward and shouted softly.
breath.

The radio was silent.

What was the matter! Don't you understand? Out of the darkness the knight approached him;

"... God?"

The voice on the radio coming out stopped the loud animal. He sniffed the air, as if he could feel it.
There’s someone else in the room.

"God, it's me. | I don't know if you can hear me."

Now he turned away from Grant and walked towards the radio.

"God... please..."

Why hadn’t he turned on the radio so far away? The retort was moving toward it, but it was too close.
The giant landed very close to him. Grant could see pale skin and a soft green glow.
Strips of dried blood on a curved nail. He could smell the culture.

"God, listen to me... . God?"

The reporter turned to look down at the radio, watching. His body was changing.
From Grant. The cube was right over Grant’s head. Grant raised his hand and reached for the syrup.
to the flesh of the tail, and inject the poison.

Velostrator screamed and jumped. He rushed back toward Grant, his jaws.
wide. He jumped, closed his lips on the table leg, and raised his head. The table banged.
away, and Grant fell backwards, now completely exposed. Rotter had to get up to his
The head was whipped upwards into the infrared light, shaking like a madman.

"God?"

The man pushed back and raised his foot to kick. Grant spun and Sean tapped him.
down, it's just clean. He felt a sharp pain in his shoulder, suddenly hot.
Blood was running down his shirt. He rolled on the floor, cracked his eggs, scrubbed his hands, put
face. The man knocked again, shattered the radio, and checked the spark plugs. He screamed in pain.
And striking a third time, Grant came to the wall, not going anywhere else, and the creature lifted him up.
foot one last time.

and falling backwards.

The animal was gasping for breath. Air came out of his mouth.


Gennaro and the kids entered the room. Grant suggests that they stay behind. The girl looked at her.
The dying animal and said softly, "Wow."
Genaro helped Grant to his feet. They all turned and ran towards the control room.


retention


Tim was surprised to see that the screen in the control room was bright and shiny. Lex said.
"what happened?"


Tim sees Dr. Grant staring at the TV and moves his hand towards the clipboard. "|
I don’t know about computers,” Grant said, shaking his head.

But Tim was already shifting in the chair. He touched the screen quickly. On Video
monitors, he could see the ship approaching Puntarnas. Now there were only two hundred.
some distance from the hill. On another screen, he saw the building, the retorts were on the floor
ceiling. On the radio, he heard them screaming.

"You did something, Tim," Leake said.

It took the SETGRIDS DNL property, even though it flashed.

The screen responded:


CAUTION: Automatic control disabled (AUX POWER LOW)


"What does that mean?" Tim said.

Genaro snapped his fingers. "It's happened before. That means the support is weaker. You."
You have to turn on the mains power.”

"| Do?"

He grabbed the ELECTRIC MAIN.


Tim shouted.

"what are you doing now?" Grant said. The whole screen was flickering.
Tim held the MAIN.

Nothing happened. The screen kept flashing.

Tim pushed MAIN GRID P. He bent over in his stomach in fear.


Mains power grid not active / auxiliary power only.


The screen was still flickering. He pressed MAIN SET 1 .


Turn on the main power.


All light in the room was blocked. The entire screen stops flashing. "Hey! It's OK!"
Tim pressed RESET GRIDS. Nothing happened for a while. He watched the video.
monitors, then back to the main screen.


Grant said something that Tim didn't hear, he only heard the sarcasm in his voice. It was
Looking at Tim, he’s worried.

Tim could feel his heart pounding in his chest. Lex was yelling at him. He didn't want to watch.
There’s no video on TV. He could hear the sound of drills in the room and
the raptors scream. She heard Malcolm say, "God love..."

He took over the LODGE.


Specify GRID NUMBER to set.


For a moment he couldn't remember the numbers, but then he remembered
F4, and pressed that.


You will now update LODGE GRID F4.


On video footage, he saw flames explode from the ceiling.
Hotel home. The screen flashes white. Lex yelled "What did you do!" But almost immediately.
The shadow came back and they could see that the retorts were caught between the bars, spinning
and scream into a hot fire while Mildred and the others scream, their voices
on the tinny radio.

"That's it," Grant said and patted Tim on the back. "That's it! You did it!"

They were all standing and jumping up and down when Lex said, "How's the ship?"

"What?"

"Ship," he said and pointed to the screen.


On screen the houses on the side of the mountain were much larger and went
To the right, as the ship turned left, preparing to land. He saw the crew step out to the side.
Preparation is close.

Tim returned to his seat, staring at the start screen.

He studied television. Telecom VBB and Telecom RSD both looked like they could
Something that happens with smartphones. He pressed the TELCOM RSD.


You have 23 calls and/or messages.
Do you want to have them now?


He caught NO.

"Maybe the club was an invitation waiting to happen," Leake said. "Maybe that way you can get
Phone number!"

She ignored him.


Call up the desired NUM13ER or press F7 in the DIRECTORY key.


He pressed F7 and the names and numbers appeared on the screen, which was great
Path. It wasn't an alphabet, and it took some visual scanning to find it.
would ask:


W. C. Ann B. (Freddie) 708-3902


Now, all he had to do was figure out how to check the phone. He pressed a few buttons on the floor.
Screen:


Bed now or after bed?


He pressed the DIAL NOW.


We are sorry that your call cannot be completed as planned.
{ERROR-5981}
Please try again.


She looked at him again.

He heard the dial tone, then the numbers automatically dialing faster.
Competition.

"That's it?" Grant said.

"Very well, Tim," Lex said. "But they can get there." On screen, they can
Front mooring of the ship at the port of Puntarenas. They heard a loud scream and then
Ken said, "Uh, hey John, this is Freddie. Did you read me?"

Tim grabs a phone from the car, but all he hears is the phone ringing.

"Uh, hello John, is this Freddie out?"

"Answer it," Leak said.

Now they’ll pick up the phones and call all the phones out there, but they only heard the phones
Words. Finally, Tim noticed a phone stuck in the side of the console with a flashing light on it.

"Uh, hello, Col. This is Freddy. Will you read me?"

Tim picked up the receiver. "Hello, this is Tim Murphy, and | you need-."

"Uh, say it again, I don't understand that John."

"Don't miss the mountain! Can you hear me?"

There was a pause. Then a confused voice said, "Sounds like a child."

Tim said, "Don't miss the boat! Get back on the boat!"

The voices were distant and muffled. "Is her name Murphy?" And another language .
"I didn't get a name," he said.

Tim glared at the others. Genaro reached for the phone. "Let me do this. You can."
Know his name?"

There was a bad post on the site. "-should it be a joke or - should it be a joke
Nothing.”

Tim was working at the keyboard, so maybe there was a way to find out who.
Freddy was. . ..

"Can you hear me?" Genaro said into the phone. "If you can hear me, answer me now."

"Baby," came the blunt reply, "We don't know who you are, but you're no fun and
We’re going to put in and we’ve got work to do. Now either introduce yourself properly or get out of this
Chanel."

Tim looked at the screen Farrell, Frederick D, (Capt.) Print.

"Try this for identification, Captain Fair," Gennard said. "If you don't spin this boat
If you return to this island immediately, you will be found in violation of Clothing Section 509 .
maritime law, you will lose your license, the penalty is over fifty thousand.
$50 and up to five years in prison. Do you hear that?"

There was silence.

"Are you planning that, Captain Fair?"


And then, far off in the distance, they heard a voice say, "I'll have it ready," and another voice say, "It's all ahead."
The boat began to move towards the shore.

Lexus started to cry. Tim fell back in the chair, wiping the sweat from his forehead.

Grant said, "What's the one law of the sea?" "who

Hell knows?" Jannard said.

They all watched the TV excitedly. The boat was going far
shore.

"|Guess the trouble is over," Gennard said. Grant shook his head. "The hard part," he
He said it's just getting started."


Seventh iteration


“Going forward, math will take courage.”
Face the consequences."


Hi Malcolm
Destroying the world


They moved Malcolm to another room in the room and onto a clean bed. Hammond seems to have revived it;
and he began to touch it, and adjusted it, "All right," he said, "At least, accident averted."

"What the hell is this?" Malcolm said excitedly.

"Well," Hammond said, "they didn't set free and take over the world."

Malcolm sat down on one elbow. "Were you worried about that?"

"Really that's what it was all about," Hammond said. "These invertebrate animals can
Go out and destroy the world."

"You're stupid," Malcolm said angrily. "Do you have any idea what you're talking about
on? You think you can destroy the world? "My, what intoxicating powers you must have."
Malcolm flopped down on the bed. "You can't destroy this world. You can't get close."

"Many people believe," Hammond said gravely, "that the world is in danger."

"No, it's not," Malcolm said.

"Experts all agree that our planet is in trouble."


Malcolm sighed. “Let me tell you about our planet,” he said. “We have four and a half planets.
A billion years. Life on this planet is long overdue. Three billion eighths.
years. The first infection. And later, the first multicellular animals, then the first ice
Creatures, in the sea, on land. Then there are large breeds of animals - amphibians, and
Dinosaurs, mammals, each live millions and millions of years. Great Kingdoms .
Creatures that arise, develop, and die;
And violent earthquakes, tall mountains rising and falling, collisions of comets, volcanoes
Explosions, oceans rise and fall, entire continents move. . . Endless, Endless and Violent
change . . . Even today, the majority of geothermal energy on the planet comes from two major
The continents have been eroding and narrowing into the Himalayas over millions of years. that
The planet survived everything in time. We're really going to miss him."

Hammond frowned. "Just because it's been a long time," she said, "doesn't mean it's
permanent. If there was a genetic disaster . . ."

"Suppose he was," Malcolm said. "Let's say we had a bad drought with all the trees and
Animals died, and the earth warmed for hundreds of thousands of years. Life remains
Somewhere - underground or perhaps in an arc bed. And after all these years, when
The planet was no longer inhospitable and life would once again spread. Progress
The work would begin again. It may take a few billion years for life to return to normal.
And it was bringing the current system. But the earth was strong because of our violence.
Life was alive in our weakness. It's just we," Malcolm said, "we don't think it will."

"Well, if the ozone layer thins," Hammond said.

"There's going to be a lot of UV rays reaching the surface. So what?"

"No. It can cause skin cancer."

Malcolm shook his head. "Veterans are good for life. It's very energetic. It's
Change. “A variety of life forms can increase with increasing radiation.”

“And a lot of people are dying,” Hammond said.

Malcolm sighed. "You think this is the first time something like this has happened? Don't you know
For the wind?"

"| Know that it is necessary for life."

"It's now," Malcolm said. "But oxygen is protein poison. Gas is as damaged as
fluoride, which is used to make glass. The first stage of oxygen production was fertilizer production.
The emergence of plant cells—allegedly about three billion years old—has posed a problem for all other life forms in our
radius. These plant cells contained environmental contamination and weak poisoning. They were
removing a killer gas and increasing its dryness. There is less than one carnival-sized planet.
percentage of oxygen. On land, oxygen concentrations were rising rapidly—five, ten, at last.
Twenty-one percent! The air on the ground was filled with pure poison! And life isn’t fair! "

Hammond seemed furious. "So, what's your point? This modern garbage will include
also?"

"No," Malcolm said. "My point is life on Earth can take care of itself.
Human, a hundred years is a long time. A hundred years ago we didn’t have cars and
Airplanes, computers, vaccines. . . . It was otherworldly. But for the Earth, a
A hundred years is nothing. A million years is nothing. This planet lives and breathes so much.
A large number. We can't imagine his slow and powerful music, we didn't get humiliated.
being. We have been residents here except for one eyebrow. If we leave tomorrow, the earth will
Don’t forget us.”

And we can go," Hammond said as he exhaled.

"Yeah," Malcolm said. "We can be."

"So what are you saying? Shouldn't we take care of the place?"

"No, of course not."

"So what?"

Malcolm coughed and looked into the distance. "Let's be honest. The world is not in danger.
We are all in danger. We couldn’t destroy the world or save it. But we can
We have the power to save ourselves."


Under control.


Four hours had passed. It was the afternoon; The sun was setting. The air conditioner was back on.
In the control room, the computer worked fine. Did they come closer?
Of the twenty-four people on the island, eight are dead and six are missing. visitor
Both the center and safari lodge were safe, and the surroundings of the south were clear
Dinosaurs. They called authorities in San Jose, to help. The Costa Rican National Guard was
On its way, and an air ambulance taking Malik to the hospital. But on the phone,
The Costa Rican guards were alert – no doubt the calls were coming and going
between San Jose and Washington before aid was sent to the island. And now he was
It’s been growing for a long time—if the helicopters didn’t arrive soon, they’d have to wait until
morning.

In the meantime, there was nothing to bear. The boat was returning; The team had
They found three small repeaters running in a part of the stern of the ship and killed the
Animals. On Isla Nublar, the danger seemed to have passed, and everyone was on both sides.
Visitor center or hotel. Tim did well on the computer and shone.
New screen.





All animals 292
Expected patterns are found.

Thyroides 2 1
41

Mysore 22 20
2?

Stegosaurus 4 1
3.9.

Trisherrop 8 6
3.1.

Prochomycoagulants 65 , 64
2

Othniel 23 15
3.1.

Velociraptors 37 27
2?

Episode 17 12
3.1.

Hadrosaurus 11 5
3.1.

dilophosores 7 4
43

Petersor, 6 5
43

Hypsilophodent 34 14
2?

Yuplosplid 16 9
4.0

Styrosaurus 18 7
3.9.

Calvosaurus 22 13
41
Total 292,203


"What's he doing now?" Gennaro said. "Now he's saying animals are rare?"
Grant shook his head. "maybe."
Ellie said, "Jurassic Park is going to be great."


"What does it mean?"

"Balance." Grant pointed to the monitors. In one of them, the hypsolophodonts flew in .
Windmills such as the Velociprit have entered the arena from the north.

"The walls were gone for hours," Grant said. "Animals mix together
other. Societies reaching equilibrium in the true Jurassic equilibrium.”

"| I didn't think it was supposed to happen," said Genard. "Animals should never have
mess."

"No, they are."

On another screen, Grant sees a group of rappers running fast in an open field
to about four tons of Hadrosaurus. Hadrosaurus turned to run and a reptile jumped at him
In the back, biting his neck, the other runs forward, spins him around, and grabs his legs.
They jumped up and slashed his neck with their big talons. Within minutes, six by six arrived.
Take down large animals.

Grant looked at him silently.

“Did you feel that way?” Ellie said.

"|I don't know what | think," he said. She looked at the TV. "No, not really."

Muldoon said quietly, "You know, it seems like all the grown adults are out now."

Grant didn't pay much attention to it at first. He just watched the observers, their reactions.
Big animals. To the south, a stygosaurus was wagging its tail, gingerly wrapping its baby
tyrannosaur, which was looking at it, was confused, and occasionally lunged forward to pet
plates. The southern forties fought among themselves.
Loading and closing ports. One animal was mortally wounded.

"We've got about an hour of good sunlight left, Dr. Grant," said Muldoon. "If you want to try and
Get that nuts."

"Right," Grant said. "I am."

"|would have thought," Mildred said, "that if the Costa Ricans came, he might think
This island must be a military problem. Something's going to disappear quickly."

"Okay," Gennard said.

"They're going to blow it up in the air," Muldoon said. “Maybe napalm, maybe nerve gas, too. But.
out of thin air."

"|Hopefully they do," Jannard said. "This class is too dangerous. All animals must be on this class
Right, and the sooner the better."

"That's not satisfying," Grant said. He got to his feet. "Let's get started."

"| I didn't think you understood, God," Janrod said. "It's my opinion that this class, too
dangerous. It must be destroyed. All animals on this island must be destroyed, that's
The Costa Rican Guard will do that. | We think we should leave it up to them for skills. do you
Do you understand what I am saying?"

"Okay," Grant said again.

"So what's your problem?" Gennaro said. "It's the military's job. Leave it alone."

Grant's back grew angry, where the reporter turned. "No," she said. "We have to be careful
it."

"Leave it to the experts," Gennaro said.

Grant recalled how he found Gennaro drunk and terrified for about six hours in the 1990s.
Indoor maintenance truck cab. He suddenly became angry and struck.
The lawyer stands up and faces the street wall. “Listen, ma’am, you have a responsibility for this.
stuff and you're going to start living it."

"|am," Genora said coughing.

"No, you're not. You lost your privilege from the beginning."

"Hell-"

"You sold investors on a company you didn't fully understand. You were the owner of a
Work that you couldn’t control. You didn’t investigate the works of a man you knew .
You know you’re a liar and you let this guy get away with something worse
Technology in human history. I'm saying resign yourself."

Genaro was rewarded again. "Well, now I'll take responsibility."


"No," Grant said. "You're still avoiding. You can't do that anymore." produced
Genaro who suffocated her. Grant turned to Muldoon. "What have we got
Weapons?”

Muldoon said, "We're getting some draws and crap."

"How cute are these shirts?" Grant said.

"They're like rough sharks. They have broken conductors, they swim
contact. High voltage, low power. It's not understandable, but it can be hurtful."

"That's not going to happen," Grant said. "It's not in the box."

"What well?" Genaro said as he choked. "The raptor's shit,"

Ellie said.

"Rapport's taste?"

Grant would say, "Did you find a faulty radio?" "I am

sure we do," Mildred said.

"Get one. And is there anything else that might work?"

Mildred shook her head.

"Well, you can have anything you want."

Muldoon left. Grant turned to Gennard. "Your class is a mess, Mr. Gennard. Your
Watching is a mess. It needs to be cleaned up. But you can’t do that until you know .
mess. And that means getting traps on the mountain. Especially the retort wheels. They become
hidden. We must find them, examine them, and assess their strengths. We need to calculate
Every animal that was born on this island. Then we can burn it. But first we have a little work to do.”


Ellie was looking at the map on the wall that showed the current locations of the animals. Tim was working.
Keyboard. She pointed to the card. "The ridge is in the southwest corner, where the lower
fields of volcanic dust. Maybe they like the heat."

"Is there somewhere downstairs to hide?"

“There it is,” he said. "There's a lot of water use to prevent flooding
The Western Plates. Large underground area. Water and scent.”

Grant shook his head. "So that's where they'll be."

Ellie said, "I think there's an entrance on the beach as well." He turned to the consoles and
He said, "Tim, you're going to show us the springs." Tim wasn't listening. "Timmy?"

He was leaning back against the mountain. "Just a minute," she said. "| Got something."

"What is that?"

"It's an unmarked warehouse. I don't know what's in there."

"So, he might have a gun," Grant said.


They were all at the back of the training room, closing a door and lifting it up.
sunlight, revealing the rough steps leading down into the city. "Damn Arnold," said Mildred as
He walked down the stairs. "He should know this was always here."

"Probably not," Grant said. "He didn't try to get here."

"Well, Hammond knows. Someone does."

"Where's Hammond now?"

"I'm still in the living room."

They reached the bottom of the stairs and came to the electric gas columns hanging on the wall.
in plastic containers. They turn on their torches in the room and see a lot of heavy.
cubes of glass, two feet high, with steel lids. Grant could see little dark orbs inside the cubes. it
It was like being in a room full of giant peppers, he thought.

Muldoon opened the jacket of one, reached inside, and pulled out a ball. 4 He transformed it into light.
frown. "I curse."

"What is that?" Grant said.

"Mr.-12," Muldoon said. "That's nerve gas. That's gradations."
Grenades."

"Let's get started," Grant said sternly.


"I like it," Leica said, smiling. They were parked in the visitor's garage next to Fit
raptor that Grant shot in the head. He was pressing the raptor into the bars of the sandwich.
The beast squeezed her hand.

"I'll be careful there," Muldoon said. "They can create a terrible legacy."

"I like it," Leake said. "His name is Clarence."

"Clarence?"

"Yeah," Leake said.

Muldoon was clutching the leather collar with the small metal case attached. Grant heard
A distant voice in the ear. "Is it a problem to put clothes on an animal?"

Lex was still in control of the Raptor and reached the cage. "I think he'll let me put it on him," she
said.

"|I don't try," said Mildred. "They can't decide." "I

He'll let me," she said.

So Muldoon gave Lex the collar and he stretched it out so he could smell it. Then he
he whispered slowly in Bengali. The report turned bright green as Leica touched it.
and closed over the scapula. Then the animal calmed down and changed again.

"I curse," Mildred said. "It's

chameleon," Lake said.

"The other retorts couldn't do that," Mildred said, wincing. "This wild animal must be
different. Anyway, he turned to Grant, “If they’re all born to women, how do they survive?”
You never described that on Bor's DNA."

"That's not Born's DNA," Grant said. "It's amphibian DNA. But phenomena happen."
In particular, it has been documented in toads. Especially the West African tortoises, with | remember."

"What's that thing?"

"Gender change," Grant said. "Really, it's just a sex change." Grant explained that a
A number of plants and animals are known to change sex during life.
Orchids, some fish and crustaceans, and now ports. Frogs tested to give eggs had
He can transform in a few months into a full-fledged man. They took the fight first.
The role of men, they perpetuated the male sexual cycle, they triggered hormones and
They enlarged the male hormones and eventually successfully mated the females.

"You're kidding," Gennard said. "And what makes it happen?"

Change seems to be stimulated by the environment in which each animal lives.
Male and female. In this case, some aquariums will naturally begin to change sex from
A woman's man."

"And you think that's what happened to the dinosaurs?"

“As long as we have the right design, yes,” Grant said. "I think that's what happened. Now,
We get this one?"


Once they got stuck in the Jeep, Lex lifted Raptor out of his cage. The animal seems calm.
Almost going into his groups. She gave him one last push on his head and released him.

The animals were not moving.

"Go, Shi!" Lex said. "Go home!"

The man turned and fled into the leaves.


Grant grabbed the device and pulled the trigger. Mildred drove. The car took off.
Main Street, heading south. Genaro turned to Grant and said, “What’s that nest?

"Nobody knows," Grant said.

"But | I thought you'd bury them."

"I drew a dinosaur tattoo," Grant said. "But all streams have been changed by gravity
A thousand years. We've made some assumptions, hypotheses, but nobody knows what.
Cheeks were like that."

Grant listened for noises and signaled Muldoon to move to the far west. It seems like a lot and
As Ellie was right: The nest was in the volcanic fields of the south.

Grant shook his head. "Many are unclear about the nature of disability," he said. He found himself stuck.
It describes modern reptiles such as crocodiles and rabbits. Even the quality of their lives
It was not well understood. In fact, the American catfish has been studied more extensively than most and


case of alligators, only the female was expected to protect the embryo, and up to the time of birth. male
The alligator spent much of the early spring lying next to the female in a couple, purring for air
on his tests and give him other signs of masculinity that are designed to make him feel uncomfortable.
reception, which eventually led to him raising his head and threatening her, while lying next to her, put
male. By the time the woman took her life two months later, the man was gone too late. and
Although the female maintained her three-foot-high nest mound, she
She seemed less cautious over time and she left her eggs in time.
The chicks began to scream and come out of their nests. Thus, a baby alligator in the wild
It started life on its own, so its stomach is full of egg yolks.
Nutrition in its early days.

"So the adult elves don't protect the young?"

"Not like we think," Grant said. "Both parents abandon their young. But
There is a form of group protection. The young Alicorns have a distinctive cry;
He will attack anyone who hears him - human or not - and come to their aid with the most powerful attack of all time.
It’s not a threatening gesture. Full attack.”

"Oh." Gennaro was silent.

Grant continued, "But this is a distinguished species of dragon in every way." "For example,
The biggest challenge of the algorithm is to cool the eggs. Deer are always in the shade. a
A temperature of ninety-eight degrees Fahrenheit will kill a cuckoo egg, so the mother will be
She's protecting her eggs so they don't get cold."

"And dinosaurs aren't cultural products," Muldoon said cautiously.

"Exactly. Dinosaur nests can be very bonded."
Bird species-"

"So you're really saying you don't know," Janari said angrily. "You don't know what
Smell like that?"

"No," Grant said. "I don't."

"No," Gennaro said. "That's a lot for experts."

Grant ignored him. He could smell the sulfur already. And it’s a mystery called
Tacre areas.


Hot ground, Genaro thought, as he walked forward. It was really hot. and here and
The dust lifted up from the ground. And the smelly, sulfurous dust screams.
Great plums to go for. It was like walking through hell.

He watched Grant walk with his head held high, listening for the sound. Grant his
Kid shoes with his jeans and Hawaiian shirt, he looks pretty cool. Genaro didn't feel it.
nice. He was afraid of being in this place in an accident in hell, and the Velocitrators somewhere
around. He didn't understand how Grant could be so calm about it.

Or a woman. Satler. He too was walking, he was just watching in a calm mind.

"Doesn't that bother you?" Gennaro said. "| Meaning, are you worried?"

"We should do it," Grant said. He didn’t say anything else.

They all walked forward through the whirlwind. Genaro grabbed the gas cans.
He had put it in his effort. He turned to Ellie. "Why doesn't he care?"

"Maybe," she said. "But he thought about this all his life."

Genaro tilted his head and wondered how that would work. If he had something
He has been throughout his life. He decided there was nothing wrong.


Grant squinted in the sunlight. Ahead of us, through the squares of dust, an animal focused and watched.
they. Then he ran off.

"Was that a raptor?" Ellie said.

"| Think about that. Or else. Kids, anyway."

He said, "You're taking us away?"

"maybe." Ellie had told him how the retorts used to play on the wall to remind him of when
Another climbed up the house. If true, this behavior demonstrates superior mental capacity.
Almost all forms of life on earth. Traditionally, the ability to formulate and execute plans was thought to be
It has been identified in only three species: chimpanzees, apes, and humans. Now there was that .
It is possible that dinosaurs can do similar things.


The figure reappeared, leapt into the light, and then leapt up again, screaming. He really did.
He seems to be sending them away.

Genaro frowned. "How smart are they?" she said.

"If you think of them as birds," Grant said, "then you have to wonder. New studies show
A gray squirrel is as smart as champagne. And the chimpanzee can
Use language as creatively as possible. Currently, researchers are finding that heart .
A three-year-old child is developing, but their intelligence is unquestionable. Sleepers can
Symbolically theory, of course.”

"But I've never killed anyone with a suit," Genora spoke up.


In the distance, they could hear the sound of the waves at the bottom of the mountain. The tank areas were .
Behind them immediately, and they were faced with a stone wall. The little girl climbed a rock.
And then it completely disappeared.

"Where did he go?" Ellie said.

Grant was listening to headphones. The sound stopped. "It's gone."

Hastening forward, they found a small hole in the center of the rocks, like a rabbit’s den. I was
It can be two legs. As they watched, the little retort went off and blinked the
light. Then he ran off.

“Impossible,” Genaro said. "I'm not going there anyway."

Grant said nothing. He and Eli started drinking. Soon, he had a small video.
A camera attached to a handheld camera. He attached the camera to the cord, turned it on and turned it down.
In the city.

“You can’t see anything that way,” Gennard said.

“Let him settle,” Grant said. There was too much light in the sky for them to see
Dirty walls, then suddenly, suddenly, the tunnel opened. On cloud, they
He heard a scream. Then there was the sound of a trumpet. More noise from more people
Animals.

"It's like a taste, all right," Ellis said.

"But you can't see anything," Gennard said. He wiped the bandage off his forehead.

"No," Grant said. "But | can last." He listened to the timeout for a moment and picked up the camera
He threw it on the ground. "Let's get started." He climbed up towards the branch. Ellie went to
The darkness and the wand. Grant puts gas mask on his face and collapses
awkwardly, stretching her legs back.

"You can't be more wrong than that," Jannard said.

Grant shook his head. "That doesn't make me happy. I'll go first, then Ellie, then you come after."

"Now, hold on a minute," Zener said, desperately. "Why don't we drop those muscles
Where the grenades go down, and then you go down after that? Doesn't that make sense?"

"Ellie, you got the flashlight?"

He handed the lamp to Grant.

"How about that?" Gennaro said. "What are you saying?"

"I don't want anything better," Grant said. He followed her into the pit. "You've never seen a thing
Dying of gas poisoning?"

"No..."

"It usually comes with itching. The bad ones."

"No, I'm sorry if she doesn't like it, but-"

"Look," Grant said. "We're going into this den to find out which animals are missing. If
Kill the animals first, and some will fall on the insects in their spit, making us .
The ability to see what was. So we can't do that,"

"but-"

"You made those animals, Mr. Gennard."

"|Didn't."

"Your money did it. Your effort did it. You helped create them. They are your victims. And you
You can't just kill them because you're desperate now."

“I’m a little nervous,” Gennaro said. "I'm scared c-."

"Follow me," Grant said. Ellie gave him a candy bar. He pushed back more than
hole, and groove. "It fits perfectly."


Grant exhaled and clasped his hands in front of him, and there was a loud cry.
And he would go.
The mouth of the ball is empty and black.


"What happened?" Gennaro said, startled.

Ellie frowned and focused on the hole, listening to the opening. He pressed
The radio, said simply, "Alan?"

There was a long silence. Then they heard the words: "I'm here."

"Is everything alright, God?"

Another long silence. When Grant finally spoke, his voice sounded like
He was worried.

"Everything is fine," he said.


Standard approx.


In town, John Hammond was walking to Malcolm’s house. Hammond was impatient.
and restlessness. Ever since he set the belt in his last spring, Malcolm had been hooked.
coma, and now it appears to Hammond that he can actually die. Of course the helicopter was
He was called, but God only knows when to come. thinking that Malcolm might die .
At that moment, it filled Hammadi with shock and fear.

And, of course, Hammaud made it all worse because he doesn’t like the president.
So much. It was worse than if the guy was her friend. Hammond feels that Malcolm’s death
If it does, it will be the last support.

Anyway, the smell in the room was very pleasant. It’s terrible. Human footprint
flesh.

"Everything ...parade.. ." Malcolm said and threw himself on the pillow. "is

he waking up?" Hammond said. Harold shook his head.

"What did he say? Something about Paradise?" "I

He didn't grab it," Harold said.

Hammond has always made a trip. He rolled down the window to get some fresh air.
Finally, unable to take it anymore, he said, “Is there a problem with getting outside?”

"|Don't think so, no," Harding said. "I think this place is beautiful."

"Well, look, I'm just going outside."

"Okay," Harold said. It regulated the flow of antibiotics into the bloodstream.

"I'll be back soon."

"all right."

Hammond steps out into the sunlight, wondering why he bothered.
to Harold. After all, the man was her employee. Hammond wasn’t explaining himself.

He walked through the gates and looked around the park. It was around noon.
When the fog in the air thinned, and the sun came out again. The sun is out now, and
Hammond took it as a challenge. From what they say, he knew there were promises to his park. and
Even if that stupid Gennaro burned her to the ground, it wouldn't help.
difference.

Hammond knew that within two flights of stairs, there were dozens of people in Palo Alto.
The babies are frozen. It wouldn’t be a problem to hire them again, on another island, somewhere else next year.
The whole world. And if there were problems here, then next time they will deal with them
Problems. That was how progress was made. By solving problems.

Thinking about it, he concluded that Wu was not the man for the task. Wi had
He was obviously very proud of his hard work. And Wu was very worried
with the idea of ​​progress. Instead of creating dinosaurs, he wanted to be good.
On them. Hammond suspected that was the cause of Parker’s fall.

It was Wu.

Also, he had to admit that John Arnold was not suited for the job of Senior Engineer. Arnold was
He was lovely, but in the process he was tired and anxious . he
He was disorganized and missed things. Important things.


In truth, neither Wu nor Arnold had any remarkable qualities, Hammond confirmed.
Visual Characteristics. Great visual work that created something amazing.
park where kids climb the walls and marvel at the amazing diversity and come
alive in their storybooks. The true light. The ability to see the future. storage capacity.
Resources to make that future vision a reality.

No, Wu and Arnold were not up to the task.

And in that regard, Eddie Regis was also a bad choice. Harding didn't care.
choice. Mildred is drunk... .

Hammond shook his head. He’s going to be better next time.

Lost in thought, he headed towards his mansion and followed the small alley that ran north.
from the visitor center. He walked past an employee who lowered his head. Hammond did not
Move the brain. He found the Tikan employees innocent. To tell the truth, choice .
This island near Costa Rica was none the wiser either. He doesn't make those obvious mistakes.
further-

When he came, the dinosaur’s screams sounded close to frightening. Hammond whirled around quickly.
He fell on the road, and when he looked back,
He moves through the leaves beside the flagpole, moving away from her.

What was the T-Rex doing here? Why was he inside the walls?

Hammond felt some anger: then he saw a mill worker, running away for his life, and
Hammond took the time to scramble to his feet and ran to the blind man on the other side of the woods
On the way. He was in the dark - he fell to the ground, his face wet with leaves.
Then the ground is wet, he is small on his feet, he runs forward, falls again, then runs once more.
more. Now he was descending a steep hill, and he couldn't concentrate. He collapsed.
He couldn't roll and roll on the soft ground before he stopped.
group. He was thrown face-first into the deep, hot water that surrounded him and ran over him.
nose.

He was lying dead in a cot with his eyes closed.

He was scared! That’s so stupid! She had to go to her birthday party! Hammond cursed.
to himself. When he got to his feet, he felt a sharp pain in his right toe that brought tears to his eyes.
He tried, but: it would break. He forced himself to put all his weight on his
teeth. Yes.

It's broken.


In the control room, Lex says to Tim, "I'd like them to join us in the nest."

"We're very excited, Lex," Tim said. "We need to stay here. Hey, listen to this." he
Press another button, and a tyrannosaurus scream plays over the speakers
park.

"That's good," Lex said. "That's better than that."

"You can do it, too," Tim said. "And when you push this, you get a magic trick."

"Let me try," Lex said. He pressed the button. The Tyrannosaurus roared again. "We can do it
How long will it last?" he said.

"Sure," Tim said. "We're just changing this thing right here."


Lying at the bottom of the hill, Hammond heard Tyransaurus scream and cry out.
issue.

Jesus.

She shivered, hearing that voice. He was afraid to scream from another world. He waited.
To see what happens. What is a Tyrannosaurus doing? Has he already found that employee?
Hammond waited patiently, listening only to the sounds of the forest cicadas, until he realized he was gettin
Inhale, take a deep breath.

Because of his injured leg, he cannot climb the mountain. He had to wait downstairs.
The river. After the Tyrannosaurus leaves, he calls for help. Meanwhile, she wasn't at risk
here.

Then he heard a voice say, "Come on, Tim. | You see it too. Come on. Let me
Make noise."

Children!


The Tyrannosaurus roared again, but this time it had a distinctive rhythm and a kind of
echo, which remains afterwards.

''Good performance,'' the little girl said. "Do it again."

These damned children!

He should never have brought the kids. They were nothing but trouble from
beginning. Nobody wants them around - Hammaud only brought them along because he thinks
He was going to stop Genaro from destroying the resort, but Genaro was doing it anyway. and
Obviously the kids broke into the control room and started trick-or-treating now who let
that?

She felt her heart race and her breath short. He forced himself to smile.
relax. There was nothing. Although he couldn’t climb the mountain, he couldn’t pass .
Hundreds of acres of his own ranch and viewing area. Hammond sat down in the wet.
the ground, listening to the sounds in the forest around him, and then, after a while, he began to cry .
To help out.


Malcolm’s voice was louder than a murmur. "Everything is different ... on the other side,"
she said.

Harding approached him. "Some later?" He thought Malcolm was talking.
dying.

"When ... change," Malcolm said.

"Butterflies?"

Malcolm didn’t answer. Her stiff lips twitched. "Paradise," he said at last.

"Changing paradigms?" Harold said. He knew changing patterns. In recent decades,
They were new ways of talking about scientific change. The "paradigm" was another
The word referring to a model, but as scholars have said, the word means something, a worldview. mom
worldview. It’s been said that a paradigm shift occurs whenever science makes a major breakthrough
Changing his worldview. These changes were relatively rare and occurred only once.
century, Darwinian evolution forced a paradigm shift. quantum mechanics cheated
Small change.

"No," Malcolm said. "No. . . dimension."

“Don’t worry about… what… anymore.

Harding sighed. Despite all his efforts, Malcolm was quickly inclined towards a desperate end. her
The fever was high, and they were running out of his antibiotics.

"What don't you care?"

"Everything," Malik said. "Because ... there's everything ... on the other side."

And she smiled.


descent


"You're crazy," Genaro told Ellie Sattler, watching her squeeze into the rabbit.
hole, stretching his arms forward. "You're crazy to do that!"

She smiled. "Maybe," he said. He reached forward and
Press back against the sides of the hole. And he was going at it.

The pit was pitch black.

Gennaro started to sweat. He turned to Muldoon, who was standing next to the Jeep. "I'm not be
This,” he said.

"Yes you are."

"|can't do this. | can't."

"They're waiting for you," Mildred said. "You have to do it."

“Jesus knows what’s down there,” Gennaro said. "I'm telling you, I can't do it."

"You have to do it."

Gennaro turned, looked at the hole, and looked behind him. "I can't. You can't make me."

"|Don't do it," said Mud. He used waterproof steel. "Did you hear any shit?"

"He doesn't do much," Mildred said. "He can never be killed. He'll beat you, probably
It soothes your gut. But it usually has no lasting consequences. At least not against religions. but,
So the population is very small."


Genaro looked at the wand. "You won't."

"| in mind you better come down and take care of these animals," said Mud. "And don't hurry."

Genaro turned back to the opening of the hole, a door in the ground. Then he .
Mildred, standing there, is huge and immature.

Gennaro was sweating and started walking towards the pit. From a distance it
It seems so small, but it’s getting closer, it’s getting bigger.

"That's it," Mildred said.

Genaro climbed back into the pit, but was too afraid to continue.
Road - The thought of stepping into the unknown filled him with dread - so at the last minute he moved
He walked around and climbed into the hole, stretched his arms out in front of him, and stamped his feet.
Because he was going to see where he was going. He sprayed the gas on his face.

Suddenly he dashed forward, sliding in the darkness, missing the walls.
Stepping into the darkness before him, the walls tightened and tightened.
He complained of pain from the compression that gradually got worse.
It knocked the air out of her lungs and she could already tell that the tide was changing
A little higher, by the way, shifting his body, while breathing, seeing the dots before.
His eyes, and the pain was intense.

Then suddenly the tunnel tilted down again, widened, and Genaro felt
Rough terrain, pavement, and cold wind. Surprised by the freedom, she jumped and spun around.
concrete.

And then it collapsed.


The voices are dark. Fingers touch her, reaching forward to make the sounds of words. that
The air was cold as a mountain.

"-ok?"

"Sounds good, yeah." “It’s

Breathing. .. ."

"nice."

The woman's hand caressed his face. It was Ellie. "Can you hear?" She whispered.

"Why is everyone whispering?" she said. "because." He showed up.

Genaro turned, rolled over, and slowly got to his feet. He looked up as his vision adjusted to him.
The darkness. But the first thing he saw glowing in the dark were the eyes. bright green
eyes.

Dozens of eyes. All around.


It was located on a street, a narrow entrance seven meters high on the ground. huge
Steel boxes provided hiding places and protected them from view.
the velociraptors that stood in front of them, not five feet away. The animals were black.
green with red leopard stripes. They stood on their erect heads. they
They were completely silent, staring at him with big black eyes. adult leg kids
the velociraptors screeched and screeched. Far in the background, in the darkness, children were tumbling and playing.
Giving short and short snacks.

Genaro didn't hesitate and sighed.

Two raptors!

It was only a foot or two above the height of the animal’s head. reps
They were shaking, they were trembling with fear and anxiety. From time to time they had seizures.
Impatiently. Then they left, and returned to the main group.

Adjusting his eyes, Janrod could see now that they were on to something bigger.
Underground structures, but man-made, there were various crushers;
Protruding steel bars. And inside this vast temple were many animals: xenora
Imagine at least thirty raptors. There can be many.

"The club is," Grant said, grumbling. "Four or six adults. The rest is for babies and toddlers. in
At least two. one last year and one this year. These babies are about four months old.
He probably left in April.”


One of the curious children ran across the platform and joined them, shrieking. it
He was ten meters away now.

"Oh Jesus," Genaro said. But suddenly an old man came forward and raised his head.
and gently hold the baby to return. The boy protested, then jumped to his feet.
Adult on the nose. The adult moved slowly, leaving the child to rock his head down
His voice, his back. From this safe spot, the boy turned and shouted at the trio.
community.

The adults didn’t seem to notice them at all.

"|He doesn't understand," Gennard said. "Why don't they attack?"

Grant shook his head. "They don't have to see us. And there's no either side right now... .
It relaxes them."

"Are you comfortable?" Gennaro said. "How long do we have to stay here?"

"The height can be counted," Grant said.


As Grant saw it, there were three classes, three masters. Regional Distribution
It was in the middle around the ankles, although it looked like the babies were piling on each other and running to
Many regions. The adults were nice to the kids and tough on the kids.
Occasionally, older animals are very difficult to play with.

Just then, a reptile came up to Eli and pushed his head against his leg. it
He looked down and saw the leather box next to the black box. It was damp in one spot. And he was
He scratched the skin of the animal's belly.

cried the young man.

Downstairs in the large room, one of the adults turned curiously towards the sound.

"You think | can pull it off?" she asked.

"Just do it quickly."

"O-okay," she said, kneeling next to the small animal. he screamed again.

The adults shook their heads.

Eli hugged the small child, trying to soothe him to stop his screaming. He moved.
The hands went to the leather collar, lifting and lifting the fur coat with a slicing sound. The adults shook their heads.
Their heads.

Then one of them started walking towards him.

"Oh man," Genaro said under his breath.

"Don't move," Grant said. "Calm down."

The old man walked past them, his long toes tapping on the concrete. The animal stopped him.
in front of Ellie, who stayed with the masked boy behind the steel cabinet. was young.
He appeared, and Elliot's hand was still on the head. The giant raised his head and sniffed the air.
The giant’s head was close to his arm, but he couldn’t see it because of his busy schedule.
box. A tongue was removed and examined.

Grant took a grenade of gas, removed it from his belt, and pressed his thumb against the pin. Gennaro
He reached out a hand and shook his head, nodding at Ellie.

She wasn't wearing her mask.

Grant put down the grenade and turned to Prady. Eli was very old.

Ellie eased the leather strap. Metal was struck on concrete. adult head
jerked fractionally, then wiggled sideways, curious. She was moving forward again to
investigate, when the little mermaid screamed in delight and ran off. The adult remained
by Ellie. Then he turned and walked back to the center of the square.

Genaro took a deep breath. "Jesus. Can we go?"

"No," Grant said. "But | I think we can do some work for now."


In the green glow of the night lights, Grant looked around the room.
From the wall, look at the first nest. It was dirt and grass.
It’s a deep basket shape. He counted out the remaining fourteen eggs. Of course, he couldn’t count
The marriages themselves are this far away and anyway they were broken and torn
But he was able to count the fields in the mud. Apparently, the retailers have their
Their nests are formed before the eggs are laid, and the eggs leave a permanent mark in the soil. he
It was also evidence that one was broken. He counted thirteen animals.


The second leg was broken in half. But Grant estimated there were nine eggs. that
The third nest contained fifteen parts;

"What's that all about?" Gennaro said.

"Thirty-four people killed," Grant said. "And how

See more?"

Grant shook his head. Animals were running all over the interior of the cave, jumping
In and out of light.

"I was looking," Ellie said, shining her flashlight on her book. "You should go
Pictures to be sure, but not all baby nose symptoms are the same. My number is thirty-three.

"And the children?"

“Twenty-two. But God - did you notice anything funny about them?"

"Like what?" Grant whispered.

"How do they organize themselves in the environment. Do they fall into a pattern or
In-house preparation."

Grant sighed. "There's too much darkness," he said.

"No, look. Find yourself. Look at children. When they play, they fall and run
All the way. But apart from that, when the kids stand up, notice how they are directed.
Their bodies. They face that wall or the front wall. It's like they're getting along."

"| I don't know, Ellis. Do you think there's an island? Like honey?"

"No, not really," she said. "Well, that's better. It's just a theory."

"And the kids do?"

"No. They all do. Adults do too. Look at them. I'm telling you they line up."

Grant sighed. He seemed to be in a hurry. The animals performed all kinds of behaviors but
During breaks, times when they were watching or relaxing, they seemed to behave
In a special way, there seems to be no visible line of sight on the ground.

"He beats me," Grant said. "Maybe there's some wind . . ."

"| Don't know, God."

"What do they do? A form of social organization defined as spatial structure?"

"That doesn't make sense," he said. "Because they all do."

Genaro turned over his watch. "I knew this thing was going to be useful someday." below:
The clock face was a compass;

Grant said, "How many advantages do you have in court?"

"No." Genaro shook his head. "My wife gave it to me," he explained, "for my birthday." he
He looked at the compass. "Well," he said, "they're not planning on going anywhere... | guess
They're in the northeast - northwest, something like that."

"Maybe they're hearing something," Ellie said, "they're turning their heads so they don't hear anything . . ."

Grant sighed.

"Or maybe it's just a ritual," he says, "the specific nature of the species that serves to identify
They are together. But maybe it doesn't make much sense." Ellie sighed. "Or maybe
They’re delicious. The dinosaurs may be a mystery. Or maybe it's a form of communication."

Grant was thinking the same thing. Bees were able to communicate with the environment using
dance. Perhaps dinosaurs can do the same.

Gennaro looked at them and said, "Why don't they go outside?"

"They're suckers,"

"Yeah, but they seem to be hiding."

Grant raised his hand. At that moment the children started shrieking and jumping for joy. that
The adults watched with curiosity for a while. And then, with shouts and shrieks that spoke in the darkness
In the open space, all the dinosaurs turned on their wheels and ran, heading down into the concrete of the cave and into the
After the darkness.


Hammond


John Hammond sat down on the very damp ground of the hillside and tried to catch his breath.
For God's sake, she was warm, he felt. Hot and humid. He seems to be breathing.


Sponge.


He looked down at the river, forty feet below. It seems like hours since it was released.
The boiling water and began to move up the mountain. His ankle swelled and turned red. he
I can’t put any weight on it at all. He was forced to climb the mountain on one foot, which now
He was burning with pain and exhaustion.

He has a thirst. Before he left the river, he was drunk, although
He knew this was unwise. Now she was dizzy and the world was spinning around her again. It was
She is having trouble living. But he knew he had to climb the mountain and get back on the road
above. Hammond thought he had heard footsteps on the road many times in the past
Each time she would scream for help. But somehow his voice did not go far enough;
He wasn’t saved. Then, as the afternoon progressed, she realized that she would
Must climb mountain, injured leg or not. And that’s what was happening now.

Those damned children.

Hammond shook his head and cleared it—he’d been wandering around for over an hour and
He only went to the third pitch on the mound. And he was as tired as an old dog. her
His leg throbbed. He was dizzy. Of course, he knew it was harmless—he was
She almost went back to her birthplace, for God's sake - but she had to admit, she was tired. seated
At the end of the mountain, she found she didn’t want to go anymore.

And why shouldn’t he be tired? She thought. He was seventy-six years old. It's not the year
Look around the gates of the climbing mountain. Although Hammond was in good shape for his age.
Personally, he hoped to reach a hundred. It was really about taking care of yourself.
Noting things as they came. Now he had more reason to live. Other parks have
stop. More surprises to prepare-

He heard a cry and some small birds flying.
tall tree. He had been listening to the small animals all afternoon. There were all sorts of things.
Here: rats, posters, snakes.

The screams grew louder, and the small cities rolled around the mountain faster and faster. something
was coming. Then he saw a green animal flying up the hill towards him—and another—.
And another.

Compys, he thought coldly.

The laundrymen.

The comics were not dangerous. They were like chickens, and they wa
And go down with little hopes like a chicken. But he knew it was poison. Their legacies
It had a slow-acting poison that they used to kill animals.

He thought of the disabled animals and frowned.

The first committee was sitting on the edge of the mountain, watching him. He stayed about five feet away.
He couldn’t, and just looked at her. Others stopped shortly after, standing on top of each other.
observation. They were jumping up and down and splashing and waving their little arms.

"Sabo! Get out!" he said, tossing a rock.

The comics followed them, but only a foot or two behind. They weren’t afraid. It was like they knew.
He could do no wrong to them.

Hammoud angrily tore off a branch and struck them with it. The committees absconded;
She chews the leaves and cries out happily. It was like he was playing a joke.

Again he thought of the poison. He remembered that there was an animal catcher.
He was bitten by a signal in the cage. The officer claimed the poison was like a heroin drug.
Meat. There is no pain.

You just wanted to sleep.

The hell with that, he thought. Hammond picked up a ferret, aimed it carefully, and threw it.
striking a flat comy one across his chest. The little creature screamed in terror and kicked.
Back, wrapped around his tail. The other animals followed immediately.

better.

Hammond turned and began to climb the mountain once more . hands held in both hands
With hands, he jumped on his right leg, feeling the pain in his groin. It hadn’t been more than a dozen.
As he stepped, someone jumped on his back. He threw up his hands and struck the animal.
But he got out of his cage and rolled down to the bottom of the mountain. When it was established, Company II.
He flew forward and took a small piece in his hand. He looked in horror, seeing the bleeding
On her fingers. He turned and started back up the hill.


There was another comb against her and she felt a slight pain in the back of her neck.
he screamed and kicked the animal. He turned away from the animals, breathing heavily.
They were standing around it, jumping up and down, raising their heads to look. from
He felt warmth on his shoulders and down his spine.

Lying on his back at the bottom of the hill, he began to relax, somehow, into himself.
But she realized that nothing was wrong. There was no mistake. Malcolm was so wrong.
His investigation. Hammond was as relaxed as a child in his crib and enjoyed the peace.
When another commit came and shot him in the leg, he made a half-hearted effort to kick
far. The small animals drew closer. Soon they are talking all around her, seemingly happy.
Birds. He lifted his head as another landed on his chest, and the creature became surprisingly light.
And soft. Hammond felt only a little pain, very little pain, as the company choked and bit his neck.


beach;


Chasing dinosaurs, following concrete ridges and cliffs, Grant suddenly exploded
Crossing a dock and finding himself standing on the beach, looking out over the Pacific Ocean
ocean. All around him, young Velociraptors were kicking and punching at the sand. but,
One by one, the animals retreated to the shade of the palm trees at the car door.
mangrove swamp, and they stood, perched in their posture, looking out to sea.
They were looking north.

"|It's not his father," Janrod said.

"|You do, too," Grant said, except they obviously don't like the sun." The sun wasn't shining too brightly
the sea; A light mist blew away and the sea was misty. But why have they fallen out of favor in the post?
What brings all the warriors to the beach?

Genaro turned the mark of his watch and watched the animals stand.
"Northeast-Southwest. Same as before."

On the other side of the beach, deep in the forest, they heard the roar of the cruise ship. “At least we
You know how they come out,” Ellis said.

Then they heard the sound of gassing at sea, and through the mist they saw a ship coming out.
to the south. A huge freighter, slowly moving north.

"Is that why they left?" Gennaro said.

Grant shook his head. "They must have heard it coming,"

As the freighter passed, all the animals watched it, except for the occasional silence.
loss or damage. Grant was struck by the consistency of their behavior, their movement patterns and their
Act like a team. But maybe it wasn’t so secret. In his mind, he .
The sequence of events unfolding inside the cave.

At first the kids were nervous. So the celebrities took notice. And finally, all the animals were
They went to the beach. This sequence suggests that smaller, more robust animals
bearing, had first identified the ship. The adults then led the soldiers to the beach. And as a
Grant looked around, and saw that the club was now dominated by thousands. There was a clear spatial association
along the coast, and when the animals settled down, it didn’t move and shift as much as it had
was inside. But he was always working hard, getting ready. Adults were recruited for each
For a yard or so, every adult is surrounded by children. The children stood still.
Among adults and just for him.

But Grant also sees that not all older adults are the same. There was a woman who was very attractive.
stripe along her head, and she was in the middle of the group as if towards the sea-shore.
The same woman was left in the middle of the ring, too. He felt like some
Monkey armies, pastoral orders were organized around women, and this
The striped beast was the alpha female of the island. men, he has named them.
Defensively around the group.

But unlike the apes, who were easily organized, the dinosaurs settled
rigid arrange- looks like a military unit. Then, too, there was the matter of
Northeast-Southwest space orientation. It was after Grant. But in another sense, he was
Not surprisingly. Paleontologists have been digging up bones for so long they've forgotten how
Limited information could be obtained from some of the clades. Bones can tell you something.
The general appearance of the animal, including its height and weight. They can tell you something about how


attached nerves and therefore something about the complex behavior of the animal during life.
They can give you answers to a few diseases that have affected the bones. But the skeleton was poor.
Something, really, from which we can reproduce the total behavior of an organism.

Since archaeologists were skeletons, they used bones. Like other
paleontologists, Grant had become an expert in working with bones. and in some places
In a way, he had begun to forget about the untestable—that dinosaurs might actually be
Different animals so that they could have behaviors and social lives based on the ways they were
A secret for their future generations, that, since dinosaurs were
birds;

"Oh my god," Grant said.

He watched as the raptors stood on the beach exactly, watching
ship. And she understood what he was looking at.

"Those animals," Gennard shook his head, "are desperate to escape
here."

"No," Grant said. "They don't want to run at all."

"Don't they know?"

"No," Grant said. "They want to go."


Approaching the darkness.


"go!" Ellie said. "That's great!"

"Yeah," Grant said. She was smiling.

“Where do you think they want to go?” Ellis said.

"| I don't know," Grant said, then thousands of helicopters burst through the fog, making thunder and .
They have heavy internal weapons on the ground. People scattered.
At the alarm, one of the helicopters circled back, followed the fairway, and then turned.
down to the river. A door opened and soldiers in military uniforms came running up.
they. Grant heard voices in Spanish and saw that Muddy was
In the boat with the kids. “Please come with us,” one of the soldiers said in English.
There's no time here."

Grant looked out to sea where the retorts were, but there they were. All that
The animals had disappeared. It was like they had never seen it before. The soldiers were touching him and
He allowed himself to go under the knives and climb up to the main door.
Muldoon turned and yelled in Grant's ear, "They want us out of here now. They're going
Do it now!"

The soldiers pushed Grant, Ellie, and Genord into chairs and helped them into .
Hernios. Tim and Lex waved at him and he was surprised at how young they looked and
exhausted. Lex was smirking over his brother's shoulder.

A police officer came up to Grant and shouted, "Sexur: Are you the captain?"

"No," Grant said. "I'm not the boss."

"Who's in charge, please?"

"|I don't know."

The officer went to Janrod, and asked one question: “Are you the manager?”

"No," Gennard said.

The officer looked at Ellis, but said nothing to him. The door was left open like a helicopter.
Getting up from the beach, Grant turned around to see if he could make one last attempt
raptors, but by then the helicopter was above the palm trees, heading south over the mountain.

Grant leaned over Mildred and cried, "How about the others?"

Muldoon yelled that they already got rid of Harding and some of the staff.
accident. He found her on the mountain near her home. It must fall."

"Is that okay?" Grant said.

"No. Comics found it."

"What about Malcolm?" Grant said.

Mildred shook her head.

Grant was too tired to discern much of anything. He turned and looked back at the door. it
It was getting dark now.


He focused on the edge of the lake and looked at the helicopter and shouted.
Like it has passed.

Somewhere behind them they heard the explosion and then they saw another helicopter
As he walks through the fog toward the evacuation center, moments later, the building is destroyed in a flash
Orange flames, and Lex starts crying, and Ellie puts her arm around her, trying to calm her down
see.

Grant was looking down and took one last look at the hypsolophotodonts.
They fly as gracefully as gazelles, moments before another explosion flashes beneath them.
Their helicopter gained altitude and was then moved out of the ocean.

Grant sat back in his chair. He thought of the dinosaurs standing on the beach.
She wondered where they would go if they succeeded, and she realized that she would never know and she
I was sad and relieved at the same time.

The officer came forward again and focused on her face. "Are you the boss?"

"No," Grant said.

"Please, Sixer, who's in charge?"

"Nobody," Grant said.

The helicopter gained speed as it neared the ground. It was now winter and
The soldiers closed the door. As they did, Grant took one look back and saw the island.
Against the delicious purple of the sky and sea, a deep fog offset the warm white pearls
It failed so quickly, one after another, that the whole island seemed to glow and shrink.
The place glows in the darkness of the night.


initial:


San Jose


The days passed. They were honored by the authorities, and conducted to a luxury hotel in San Jose,… The
They were free to come and go and call whomever they wanted. But they were not allowed to.
from the country. Every day a young man from the American embassy came to them and asked
If they need anything, and explain that Washington is doing everything it can to speed
Let them go. But the obvious fact is that many people are dead in a soil .
Costa Rica. The obvious truth was that environmental disasters could have been avoided. that
The Government of Costa Rica believes it was misled and spied upon by John Hammond and his scheme
For the club. In those cases, the government refused to evacuate the survivors.
urgent. They refused to bury Hammond or Lane Malcolm. They just endured.

Every day Grant seemed to move from one government office to another where he
asked another smart government official. They let him go home.
Word, time and time again. How Grant met John Hammond. Here’s what Grant knew about the project.
How Grant received a fax from New York. Why did Grant go to the island. Which was
This happened on the island.

The same details, over and over, every day. Same word.

For a long time Grant thought they should believe him lying to them and that .
Something they wanted him to say, though he couldn't think what it was. Nevertheless,
It was like they were waiting.

Finally, he was sitting around the hotel pool one afternoon, watching Tim and
Lex splash, when an American walked in cake.

"We've never met," the American said. "My name is Marty Gutierrez. I'm a researcher here
Karara Station.”

"You're the first example of a Prochomygotes," Grant said.

That's it, yes." Gutierrez sat down next to her. "You should go home."

"Yeah," Grant said. "|You only have a few days left before winter starts. In Montana, you
You know, the first batch is coming in August."

Gutierrez said, "Is that why the Hammond Foundation supports the South Goose? Because it does."
Could undamaged genetic material from dinosaurs have been recovered from colder climates?”

"That's what | spiritually, yes."


Gutierrez shook his head. "Mr. Hammond was a smart man."

Grant said nothing. Gutierrez sat down on a pool chair.

“Managers don’t tell you,” Gutierrez said finally. “Because they’re scared, and probably .
I’m angry at you for what you did. But something special is happening .
rural farms."

"Send children?"

"No, thankfully, that's stopped. But something else. This time, at Isma'aloya's house."
To the north, unknown creatures devoured the crops in a peculiar way. they
It is transported daily in a straight line - straight as an arrow - from the coast to
mountains in the woods."

Grant sat upright.

"Like a tour," Gutierrez said. "You wouldn't?"

"What farm?" Grant said.

"No, it was great. They only ate agame beans and soybeans, and sometimes chicken."

Grant said, "Foods high in lysine. What happened to these animals?"

"Perhaps," said Gutierrez, "they got into the forest. In any case, they didn't
find. Of course, finding them in the wild will be difficult. A research group may fund
For many years in the mountains of Ismail, there is nothing to show for it.”

"And we're trapped here because . . ."

Gutierrez raised his hand. "The government is worried. There are probably more animals. More
trouble. They care."

"Do you think there are enough animals?" Grant said.

"|Can't say. Can you?"

"No," Grant said. "I can't say."

"But you doubt?"

Grant shook his head. "Maybe. Yes."

"| Agreed."

Gutierrez rose from his chair. He waved at Tim and Lex as they played in the pool. "maybe
They send the children home.
glasses. "Enjoy your stay with us, Dr. Grant. It's a nice country here."

“You’re telling me we’re not going anywhere?” Grant said.

"None of us are going anywhere, Dr. Grant," Gutierrez said, smiling. And then she turned around and
He walked back towards the entrance of the hotel.



   
